ELINOR WYLLYS.
CHAPTER I.
Enter the house, pr'ythee.
Rogers
.
Had
there been a predecessor of Mr. Downing in the
country, some five-and-twenty years since, to criticise
Wyllys-Roof
,
the home of our friend Elinor, his good taste would
no doubt have suggested many improvements, not only in the
house itself, but also in the grounds which surrounded it.
The building had been erected long before the first Tudor
cottage was transported, Loretto-like, across the Atlantic, and
was even anterior to the days of Grecian porticoes. It was a
comfortable, sensible-looking place, however, such as were
planned some eighty or a hundred years since, by men who
had fortune enough to do as they pleased, and education
enough to be quite superior to all pretension. The house
was a low, irregular, wooden building, of ample size for the
tastes and habits of its inmates, with broad piazzas, which not
only increased its dimensions, but added greatly to the
comfort
and pleasure of the family by whom it was occupied.
The grounds were of the simplest kind. The lawn which
surrounded the house was merely a better sort of meadow,
from which the stones and briars had been removed with
more care than usual, and which, on account of its position,
received the attention of one additional mowing in the course
of the summer. A fine wood, of a natural growth, approached
quite near to the house on the northern side, partially
sheltering
it in that direction, while an avenue of weeping elms led
from the gate to the principal entrance, and a row of locusts,
planted at equal distances, lined the low, rude stone wall
which shut out the highway. One piazza was shaded by
noble willows, while another was faced by a row of cherry
trees, flanked by peach and pear. Fruit trees, although so
common and so lavish of their blessings in this climate, are
often gathered about American country-houses, instead of
being confined to gardens devoted to the purpose, as in
Europe
;
a habit which pleasantly reminds us that civilization
has made a recent conquest over the wilderness in this new
world, and that our forefathers, only a few generations back,
preferred the trees of the orchard to those of the forest, even
for ornament. Fruit trees are indeed beautiful objects when
gay with the blossoms of spring, or rich with the offerings of
summer, and, mingled with others, are always desirable about
a dwelling as simple and unpretending in its character as
Wyllys-Roof. Beneath the windows were roses and other
flowering shrubs; and these, with a few scattered natives of
the soilelm, hickory, sycamore, and tulip treesfarther
from the house, were the only attempts at embellishment that
had been made. The garden, surrounded by a white paling,
was thought an ornamental object, and lay within full view
of the drawing-room windows; and yet it was but a mixture
of the useful and the beautiful, in which the former largely
predominated. As a kitchen-garden it was certainly
excellent
;
but the narrow flower-borders, which surrounded the
ample beds of melons and strawberries, asparagus and
cauliflowers
,
would have appeared meanly furnished in the eyes
of a flower-fancier of the present day. There was not a
hybrid among them, nor a single blossom but what bore a
plain, honest name; and although there were lilies and roses,
pinks and violets in abundance, they would probably have
been all rooted out by your exclusive, fashionable gardener
of the last summer, for they were the commonest varieties
only. There were but two walks on the lawn; one of these
was gravelled, and led to the garden-gate; the other was a
common foot-path leading to the river, where the gentlemen
of the family kept their boats, and where the cattle, who often
grazed on the lawn, went to drink. The grounds were
bounded on one side by a broad river, on the other by a
sufficiently well-travelled highway. What particular river
and highway these were, through what particular state and
county they ran, we do not think it incumbent on us to reveal.
It may easily be inferred, however, that Wyllys-Roof belonged
to one of the older parts of the country, at no great distance
from the seaboard, for the trees that shaded the house were
of a growth that could not have been reached by any new
plantation in a western settlement.
The interior arrangements of Wyllys-Roof corresponded
very naturally with the appearance of things outside. The
ceilings were low, and the apartments small and numerous;
much room had been thrown into broad, airy passages, while
closets and cupboards abounded. The whole of the lower
floor had originally been wainscoted, but Miss Agnes Wyllys
was answerable for several innovations in the principal rooms.
When Mr. Wyllys decided to make his country-place a
permanent
residence, his daughter, who was at the head of his
establishment, fancied that the furniture they had brought
from their house in town could not be advantageously
disposed
of, without cutting folding-doors between the
drawing-rooms
.
It was fortunate that a couple of adjoining rooms
admitted of this arrangement, for at that day, two
drawing-rooms
of equal size, united by wide folding-doors, were
considered
a necessary of life to all American families on
hospitable
thought intent. It seems to have been only very
recently that any other arrangement has been found possible,
an important discovery, which, like many others that have
preceded it, was probably the happy effect of necessity, that
mother of invention. Mr. Wyllys having cut through the
partition, was next persuaded to take down the wainscoting,
and put up in its place a French paper, very pretty in its
way, certainly, but we fear that Miss Agnes had no better
reason to give for these changes than the fact that she was
doing as her neighbours had done before her. Miss Wyllys
was, however, little influenced in general by mere fashion,
and on more important matters could think for herself; this
little weakness in favour of the folding-doors may therefore
be forgiven, and justly ascribed to the character of the age
in which she lived and gave tea-parties.
For several years after they removed permanently to
Wyllys-Roof, the family, strictly speaking, consisted of Mr.
Wyllys, his unmarried daughter, and the usual domestics,
only. They were seldom alone, however; they had
generally
some friend or relative with them, and in summer the
house was often filled to overflowing, during the whole
season
,
with parties of friends, or the different branches of a large
family connection; for the Wyllyses had their full share of
that free spirit of hospitality which seems characteristic of all
classes of Americans. After a time, however, another
member
was received into the family. This was the orphan
daughter of Mr. Wyllys's eldest son, an engaging little girl,
to whom her grandfather and aunt were called upon to fill
the place of the father and mother she had lost. The little
orphan was too young, at the time, to be aware either of the
great affliction which had befallen her, or of her happy lot in
being committed to such kind guardians, in merely
exchanging
one home for another.
The arrival of the little Elinor at Wyllys-Roof was the only
important event in the family for some ten or twelve years;
the Wyllyses were not much given to change, and during
that period things about them remained much as they have just
been described. We defer presenting the family more
especially
to the reader's notice until our young friend Elinor had
reached her seventeenth birth-day, an event which was duly
celebrated. There was to be a little party on the occasion,
Miss Agnes having invited some half-dozen families of the
neighbourhood to pass the evening at Wyllys-Roof.
The weather was very warm, as usual at the last of
August
;
and as the expected guests were late in making their
appearance, Mr. Wyllys had undertaken in the mean time
to beat his daughter at a game of chess. Elinor, mounted on
a footstool, was intent on arranging a sprig of clematis to the
best advantage, in the beautiful dark hair of her cousin Jane
Graham, who was standing for that purpose before a mirror.
A good-looking youth, whom we introduce without farther
ceremony as Harry Hazlehurst, was watching the
chess-players
with some interest. There were also two ladies
sitting
on a sofa, and as both happened at the time to be
inmates of Wyllys-Roof, we may as well mention that the
elderly gentlewoman in a cap was Mrs. Stanley, the widow
of a connection from whom young Hazlehurst had inherited a
large property. Her neighbour, a very pretty woman,
neither
young nor old, was Mrs. George Wyllys, their host's
daughter-in-law, and, as her mourning-dress bespoke her,
also a widow. This lady was now on a visit to Wyllys-Roof
with her young children, whom, as she frequently observed,
she wished to be as much as possible under the influence of
their father's family.
Mr. Wyllys's game was interrupted for a moment, just as
he was about to make a very good move; a servant came to
let him know that a drunken man had been found under a
fence near the house. The fellow, according to Thomas's
story, could not be roused enough to give a straight account
of himself, nor could he be made to move.
Is it any one you know, Thomas? asked Mr. Wyllys.
No, sir, it's no one from hereabouts. I shouldn't wonder
if he was a sailor, by the looks of his trowsers and jacket. I
guess it is some loafer on his way to Longbridge.
What could be done with him? was the question. The
ladies did not seem to like the idea of having a drunken man,
whom no one knew, brought into the house at night.
I dare say it is the same person I heard asking the way
to Wyllys-Roof this morning, when we stopped at the
turnpike-gate
,
observed Mrs. Stanley. He looked at the time
as if he had been drinking.
Elinor suggested that possibly it might be some old sailor,
who fancied he had a claim upon Mr. Wyllys's kindness
Mr. George Wyllys having died a commander in the navy.
Harry volunteered to go out and take a look at him, and
the party in the drawing-room awaited the result of this
reconnoitring
.
At the end of five minutes Hazlehurst returned
with his report.
As far as I can judge by the help of moonlight and a
lantern, it is no very prepossessing personage. He swore at
me roundly for disturbing him, and I take it the fellow is
really a sailor. I asked him what he wanted at Wyllys-Roof,
but we could not make anything out of him. To keep him
from mischief, we locked him up in one of the out-houses.
It is to be hoped in the morning he will be sober enough to
tell his errand.
The matter thus settled, nothing farther was thought of it
at the time, and in another moment the game of chess was
won, and the flower secured in a becoming position. Mrs.
Stanley had been watching Elinor's movements with a smile.
You are an expert hair-dresser; the flowers are much
prettier as you have arranged them, said the lady to her
young friend.
Is it not a great improvement? They looked heavy as
Jane had arranged them beforeI have taken out more than
half, replied Elinor.
Mrs. George Wyllys looked up from the newspaper she
was reading, and suggested a change.
I think the clematis would look better on the other side.
Do you really think so, Aunt Harriet? I flattered
myself
I had been very successful: it strikes me that it looks
very well.
What is it that looks so well, ladies? said Mr. Wyllys,
Vol. I.  2
rising from the chess-table and drawing near the young
people. The flower? Yes, the flower and the face are
both very pretty, my dear. What is it? a honeysuckle?
No indeed, grandpapa, answered Elinor, it is a
clematis
this
is a honeysuckle, a monthly honeysuckle, which
Jane had twisted with it; but to my fancy the clematis is
prettier alone, especially as it is so preciousthe very last
one we could find.
Why don't you put the honeysuckle in your own hair,
Nelly? it is a very pretty flower. Being queen of the
evening
,
you should certainly wear one yourself.
Oh, I never wear flowers, grandpapa; I cannot make
them look well in my hair. This bouquet must proclaim
my dignity to-night.
It is pretty enough, certainly, my child, for any dignity
Is it not rather large? said Harry. Why, Elinor, you
have smothered my humble offering in a whole wilderness
of sweets!
Not quite as bad as that, said Elinor, smilingI only
put with yours, a few Aunt Agnes and Miss Patsey gave me
look at Jane's if you wish to see a bouquet of a reasonably
fashionable size.
Bouquets are worn very large this summer, said Jane
Graham, in a languid tone, resting her beautiful eyes on the
bunch in her hand.
Fashion even in flowers! exclaimed Mr. Wyllys.
So it would seem, replied Elinor, smiling.
And, pray, said Harry, taking a rose from a vase near
him, if a friend were to offer a flower for your belt, since
you will not place one in your hair, would fashion permit it
to be worn?
I don't believe it would, Nelly, said her grandfather.
Elinor looked just a little embarrassed, and a little pleased.
Thank you, she said, taking the rose Harry offered;
and while securing it in her sash, she felt that she coloured.
But the flush was scarcely observed on a cheek as dark as
hers.
Well, Agnes, it is high time your friends came, unless
they expect a rout, said Mr. Wyllys, stepping towards a
window to look out. Who are we to have?
Your new neighbours, sir, the Taylors; your old friends,
the Hubbards, Van Hornes, Bernards
I hope you will like the Taylors, Agnes; but I don't
know much about them. I am glad you thought of asking
them this evening, for he brought me a letter, you remember,
from New York.
As there is a young lady in the family, and a son just
grown up. I thought they might like to dance, replied Miss
Agnes. She then turned to Mrs. Stanley, and asked that
lady, who lived in New York, if she knew anything of these
new neighbours of theirs.
I never heard of them, replied Mrs. Stanley. But
they may be very important people, and make a great deal
of noise, for all that; as I only see my old friends, and live
so quietly myself, I don't even know the names of half the
people who pass for fashionable.
I never suspected our new neighbours of being
fashionable
,
replied Mr. Wyllys; but I hope they will turn out
pleasant, sensible people, for your sake, ladies; and, then, if
Taylor is a chess-player, that will leave nothing farther to be
desired.
Here comes somebody, at last! exclaimed Mrs. George
Wyllys, hearing a carriage. The Van Hornes, I suppose.
I beg your pardon, said Hazlehurst, who was standing
near the window, that is the Taylor equipage; why the
`tastiness' of the Taylor barouche is visible even by
moon-light
.
The party in the carriage, consisting of father and mother,
son and daughter, soon alighted, and appeared in the
drawing-room
.
They were introduced by Mr. Wyllys, and received
politely by his daughter and her niece.
I am gratified, sir, said the tall and thin Mr. Taylor,
with a pompous tone, in having so early an opportunity of
making our ladies mutually acquainted.
We shall hope to see your family often, Mr. Taylor,
replied his host. You must not forget that we are near
neighbours; and we country folk think a great deal of
neighbourhood
,
I assure you.
Yes; of course the restraints of society must be much
greater in a city, than in a more sparsely settled section.
I hope your new purchase suits you on farther
examination
.
The farm is certainly a very good one; but the house,
I should think, must want repairs.
It does, sir; I calculate to build, however, next year.
The present dwelling is much too small.
The house might suit us, I think, observed Mrs. Taylor,
who, with Miss Agnes, had taken a seat, while the young
people were standing, chatting, near them. If husband
would put up a back-building, we should have room enough.
Miss Wyllys remarked, that even a small addition, often
increased very much the convenience of a house.
Certainly, madam; but I apprehend, if I had added
wings and a back-building to the premises, as I first intended,
Mrs. Taylor would still have found the house not sufficiently
spacious. Now our young ladies and gentlemen are growing
up, we must have more room for company.
Well, added his wife, I expect to see a good deal of
tea and dinner company, next summer, with the house as
it is.
The young people will be much obliged to you for your
kind intentions, Mrs. Taylor; ours is not a very gay
neighbourhood
,
said Miss Wyllys.
So I should conclude, remarked Mr. Taylor.
I don't know, Agnes, said her father; if you include
Longbridge in the neighbourhood, I think we may call
ourselves
a gay set.
True, sir, said Miss Agnes; but as we seldom go
there ourselves in the evening, it had not struck me in that
light. But very possibly, Mrs. Taylor and her young ladies
may be more enterprising than Elinor and myself.
Four miles, madam, interposed Mr. Taylor, with a good
vehicle and good horses, is no great distance. Longbridge
seems to be in a very flourishing condition, sir; turning to
Mr. Wyllys.
Yes, the place is looking up; they are very busy just
now. They are building a good deal, this summer.
I observed several tasty mansions, in what may be called
the suburbs; in particular a brick edifice, being erected, I
understand, by Joseph P. Hubbard.
The brick house near the bridge? Yes, it will be the
largest about here. Hubbard is building it more to please
his daughters than himself, I fancy.
It promises a great display of tasteI observe he has
reserved half his lot, in front of the mansion, for a park.
HemYes, there will be just half an acre in it. Does
Hubbard call it a park? asked Mr. Wyllys, with an amused
expression about his eyes.
I applied the term myself, replied the knowing Mr.
Taylor. I was altogether much pleased with the
appearance
of your village, sir. It has a lively business for such a
small placethings really look quite citified there. If I had
seen Mr. Hubbard's mansion, before concluding my bargain
for my present location, I think I should have made him an
offer.
I am very glad you did not, husband. I was brought up
on a farm, Miss Wyllys, and I am very happy that we have
got in the open country. Besides, Mr. Hubbard's house will
be too large for comfort.
Ha, ha! faintly laughed Mr. Taylor; you seem to like
room out of doors better than within, Mrs. Taylor.
At this moment two persons walked quietly into the room,
and were received very kindly by Miss Wyllys and Elinor.
One was a woman of about forty, plainly, but neatly dressed,
2*
with a pleasing face, remarkable for a simple expression of
common sense and goodness. Her manners corresponded
perfectly with her appearance; they were quiet and pleasant.
The lad who accompanied her was a boy of sixteen, small,
and slightly made, with good features, and an uncommonly
spirited and intelligent countenance. They might very
naturally
have been taken for mother and son; but they were, in
fact, brother and sister.
Well, Charlie, my lad, said Mr. Wyllys, placing a hand
on the boy's shoulder, I hear the important matter is at last
under full consideration.
Yes, sir; my friends have all but consented; even sister
Patsey is coming round. It will be all settled next week, I
hope.
I wish you joy of your success, Charlie, cried
Hazlehurst
.
Not yet, if you please, Mr. Hazlehurst, said Miss Patsey
Hubbard, smiling good-naturedly. It is only a conditional
consent, Charles, you must remember. Then turning to
Mr. Wyllys, she addedAll our friends seem to agree with
you, sir, and Miss Wyllys: my uncles think Charles ought
to show what he has done to some experienced painters,
and have their opinions. We feel very anxious on the
subject.
Remember to persevere, young man, if you once begin,
said Mr. Wyllys.
No danger but I shall, sir, said the boy rather proudly.
I hear, Charles, that half the fault of your obstinacy is
thrown upon my shoulders, said Elinor. Those Lives of
the Painters were an unfortunate present; they seem quite to
have turned your head; I am afraid Miss Patsey will not
soon forgive me.
I can't thank you enough for them, Miss Elinoryou
don't know what pleasure I have had with them.
CHAPTER II.
We'll measure them a measure, and begone.
The
arrival of guests again called the ladies away; they
were followed by others, until the drawing-room was
half-filled
with the young people of the neighbourhood, and their
parents. Mrs. Stanley was soon talking with Patsey
Hubbard
,
whom she liked particularly. The tall and thin Mrs.
Bernard, and her friend, the short and fat Mrs. Van Horne,
were regretting with Mrs. George Wyllys, that she should
think the air of Longbridge did not agree with her children;
and lamenting that she should not remain at Wyllys-Roof
until November, according to her first intention. Charlie
was deep in a volume of fine engravings. Young Taylor
was standing in a corner, looking handsome, but awkward,
and out of place. Mr. Taylor, the father, was aiming at
making himself `affable' to everybody he knew; he liked to
be called the `affable' Mr. Taylor. The last of the party to
arrive, were Mr. and Mrs. Clapp; a couple, who were by
no means equally liked by their hosts. The husband was a
Longbridge lawyer, whose views and manners were not
much admired at Wyllys-Roof; and he would probably
never have found his way there, had he not married one of
their old friends and favourites, Kate Hubbard, a younger
sister of Miss Patsey'sone who from childhood had always
been welcome among them. William Cassius Clapp had
curly hair, bright black eyes, and pink cheeksand,
consequently
,
was generally thought an Adonis: his wife was a
diminutive little creature, quite pretty, and very amiable; a
sort of mixture of Miss Patsey and Charlie, without the
more striking qualities of either. Some of her friends had
thought her thrown away upon Clapp; but she seemed
perfectly satisfied after five years' experience, and evidently
believed her husband superior in every way to the common
run of men. Holding it to be gross injustice towards the
individuals whom we bring before the reader, to excite a
prejudice against them in the very first chapter, we shall
leave all the party to speak and act for themselves; merely
endeavouring to fill the part of a `faithful chronicler,'
ourselves
.
Mr. Taylor had been looking, with a mixed expression of
surprise and curiosity, at the person he had heard addressed
as Miss Patsey Hubbard, when the lady remarked his
manner
,
and, smiling quietly, she bowed to him. The bow was
returned; and Mr. Taylor crossed the room, to renew an
acquaintance with the woman, who, three-and-twenty years
before, had refused to become his wife. Mr. Pompey
Taylor
had, however, risen too much in the world, since then
according to his own estimation, at leasthe had become too
rich and too prosperous, not to look back with great
equanimity
,
on what he now considered as a very trifling
occurrence
.
While he was addressing Miss Patsey in his most
polished manner, just marked with an extra-touch of `
affability
,'
for her especial benefit, he could not but wonder that
her countenance should still wear the same placid, contented
air as of old; it seemed, indeed, as if this expression had
only been confirmed by time and trials. He began to think
the accounts he had occasionally heard, of his old flame, must
have been incorrect; it was scarcely possible she should
look so calm, and even cheerful, if her father, the
Presbyterian
minister, had actually left her not only penniless, but
burdened with the support of a bed-ridden step-mother, and
a house full of younger brothers and sisters. We leave him
to satisfy his curiosity as well as he could.
When was there ever an evening too warm for young
people to dance! Elinor's friends had not been in the room
half an hour, before they discovered that they were just the
right number to make a quadrille agreeable. They were
enough to form a double set; and, while they were dancing
the elder part of the company were sitting in groups near the
windows, to catch the evening air, and talking over
neighbourly
matters, or looking on at their young friends.
Don't you think Elinor very graceful? exclaimed Mrs.
Van Horne to her friend, Mrs. Bernard. I like to watch
her, while she is dancing; her movements are all so
pleasing
and easy, never, in the least, exaggerated  but, it is
in her very nature; she has always been the same, from a
little creature.
Yes, replied Mrs. Bernard; but it is a pity her face
should be so ugly; for she has rather a pretty figure
Do you think her really ugly? She does not strike me,
as so very plainthere is nothing repulsive in her face. I
have known girls called pretty, who had something far nearer
coarseness in their features. It is true, I have been
accustomed
to see her from the time she was four years old; and,
I know, she is always thought very plain by strangers.
Why, my dear Mrs. Van Horne, she has not one feature
that can be called good; and her eye-brows are so heavy,
and her complexion is so thick and dark, too!
Yes, it is true, she is very dark; and that is a pity; if
she were only fairer, her features would appear to greater
advantage.
Just look at her now, said Mrs. Bernard, as she is
standing by her cousin, Jane Graham, who is dancing with
your son. Was there ever a greater contrast?
But Jane is so remarkably pretty
Certainly, she is a perfect little beauty; and that is one
reason, perhaps, why Elinor strikes us as so plain; she is so
much with her cousin
Well, said Mrs. Van Horne, if you are going to
quarrel so much, with my little friend's face, we had better
find something else to talk about; for she is a very great
favourite of mine.
And justlyI dare say.But, I am a great admirer
of beauty, you know; and I cannot keep my eyes off Jane's
lovely face.
The conversation then turned upon the Hubbards.
Charlie, it seems, is actually going to be a painter,
observed
Mrs. Bernard. Miss Patsey tells me, he is so bent
on it, that she thinks there is no use in opposing it any
longer; though, Mr. Clapp says, it is a wretched plan.
I hope Charles may succeed; he is a fine boy; and I
shall be very sorry, for Patsey's sake, if he turns out badly.
She is very anxious about him, I know.
They have been so fortunate, with the rest of the family,
that, I hope, they will be able to keep Charlie straight. I
see Miss Patsey is talking to Mrs. Taylor; they are old
friends, perhaps. Do you know anything about these
Taylors
?
Nothing but what my husband told me. He is a
merchant
in New York, and very rich;made his money quite
lately; and the business-men think a good deal of him.
He seems to have a great deal to say for himself. Have
you called on Mrs. Taylor?
We were there yesterday. She is a quiet, plain
woman
.
The young man is good-looking, but very shy and
awkward. The daughter seems very lively.
Yes, and she is quite pretty, too. She will be a belle,
I dare say.
I hope Mrs. Taylor will send her younger children to
Patsey's school.
I wish she may; it will be a good thing for Miss
Patsey
,
and make up her dozen. You know, she will not take
more than twelve, as she keeps the largest room in the house
for her mother.
How kind and faithful Patsey has been to her
step-mother
!
Just as she is, though, to everybody else; and she
does it all in such a quiet, consistent way. I am glad to see
her here to-nightshe enjoys a little society, once in a while;
and yet no one can persuade her to go out, except Miss
Wyllys.
She has come in honour of her pupil's birthday, I
suppose
.
You know, Elinor Wyllys was her first scholar.
By-the-bye
,
do you know what I heard, the other day? They
say, in Longbridge, that Mr. Hazlehurst is engaged to one
of the young ladies here; though, to which, my informant
did not say.
There is no truth in it, you may be surethey are too
much like brother and sister, to think of it. Besides, Mr.
Hazlehurst is going abroad, shortly.
I did not know that. Where is he going?
He told my son, yesterday, that he was going to Europe,
for two years, to take care of his brother, Mr. Robert
Hazlehurst
,
who has never recovered from the fall he had last
winter; and the physicians have ordered him to travel.
At that moment the ladies were joined by Miss Agnes.
I hear, Miss Wyllys, said Mrs. Bernard, that Mr.
Hazlehurst is going to Europe. He will be very much
missed, at Longbridge.
Yes, we shall miss him, here, very much, replied Miss
Wyllys; Harry has been with us more than ever, this
summer
.
But, his brother is not in a state to travel alone, nor
fit to take care of his wife and children, who go with him;
and, although the plan is a sudden one, and interferes with
Harry's law-studies, yet his friends all think a visit to
Europe
may be a great advantage to him.
The ladies agreed that it was a very good arrangement,
and some inquiries were made as to Mr. Robert Hazlehurst's
health; and a discussion of bruises and falls, nerves and
dyspepsia, followed.
Soon after, the quadrille broke up.
Well, Miss Jane, cried Mrs. Bernard, as several young
people drew near, I hear that your sister, Mrs. Robert
Hazlehurst, is going to Europe; if I were you, I would not
be left behind.
I should like to go very well, said the beauty, in a
languid
tone; but, I shall be at school, in New York, next
winter.
Oh, that is a pity! I am sure, you could learn all you
want to know, much better, in Paris. Don't you think she
ought to go, Mr. Hazlehurst?
Certainly, ma'am; everybody should go to Paris, if they
have a chance.
Miss Jane would be such a charming addition to your
party.Two young people together, you would enjoy
yourselves
more, and make it pleasanter for your friends.
Young Hazlehurst made a civil bow to the lady; but he
looked as if he had an opinion of his own on the subject, for
a comical expression crossed his face at the moment. Jane
had turned in another direction, and was slowly lisping an
answer to a very animated question of Miss Adeline
Taylor's
.
Yes; I was at Mrs. G's school, last year; and, I
am going there again.
Well, I positively think I must go there, too, for my
last winter. Mrs. G's school is all the fashion, now.
All the young ladies she turns out, are very lively. Miss
Howard, the great belle, was there, you know, before she
came out. Don't you think it would be an excellent plan,
Mr. Hazlehurst, for your cousin and me to be chums? I
declare, I wish you were going, too, Miss Wyllys.
Thank you. I have never been to school, in my life;
and, it is rather late, to begin now.
Never been to school! What dull times you must have
had at home! You don't know what fine fun we have, at
school; it is next to going into company. I wouldn't stay
at home, for the world. Why didn't you go?
Well, I really don't know why. Perhaps, I should have
wished to go, if I had thought it as pleasant as you seem to
do, Miss Taylor.
And, pray, if I may ask, what made it so very pleasant?
asked Harry Hazlehurst. I should like to be initiated into
the delights of a young ladies' boarding-school. Of course,
they must be very different from the rude enjoyments of
collegians.
Oh! it would take me a year, to tell you all about it.
I shall be most happy to listen all the evening. But,
let me find you a chair, before you commence; you must be
tired of standing, said Harry, with a view to taking a seat
himself.
Me? Oh, no; I never sit down, at a party; I always
stand. You lose half the fun, by sitting down. And,
having secured Harry's attention, the half-fledged belle
turned to another youth, within hailing distance. Now,
what do you think Mr. Hazlehurst has given me to do, for
the next hour, Mr. Van Horne?
I am sure, I don't know. Is it something very difficult?
Listening to his pretty speeches, perhaps, said the other.
Oh dear, no! I don't believe Mr. Hazlehurst can make
a tender speech; I don't believe he has got any heart, said
Miss Adeline, looking an attempt at archness.
And, pray, what makes you think so, Miss Taylor? Do
you judge from my savage expression?
Well, perhaps, you have one; said the young lady,
looking up bewitchingly. I suspect, though, you take
very good care of it.
But this is not fair; you are abusing me, instead of
giving us the delights of your school, as you promised.
Oh, I had forgotten that. But, I should think, you might
guess what fun we havea set of wild girls together.
How should I know anything about it? Pray, be more
explicit.
Well, in the first place, we make a point of getting up
an excitement, at least once a week.
Like our unruly spirits at college, you break the
windows
,
and roll cannon-balls, I suppose.
How you talk! No, indeed. Our last excitement was
Vol. I.  3
about the coat of our Professor of Mathematics. It was such
a quizzical cut, we told Mrs. A., it was morally impossible
for us to attend to the lesson, and study the problems, as
long as the man wore it.
It was unpardonable, in a professor of mathematics, to
wear a coat that was not cut according to rule.
Now wasn't it? Well, you may be sure, we can
always
pitch upon something for an excitement, whenever
we're in the humour for it. And then, we have secrets to
tell about our beauxand we quiz the new scholarsand
we eat candyand we torment Mrs. A; but, I shan't
tell you any more, now; for I must go out on the piazza, and
have a walkit looks so sweet, out there. You shall have
the rest of the story, if you'll come.
And away tripped the young lady, followed, of course,
by the gentlemen.
Mr. Taylor, who had been moving about the room, making
himself popular by a very bland smile, and, what he
considered
very courtly manners, still had time to keep one eye
upon his son, who, after an awkward fashion, seemed
devoting
himself to one or two of the ladies, and the other, upon
his daughter. Adeline will make herself conspicuous,
thought the gratified father.
Liny seems to enjoy herself, was the observation of her
mother, who had been sitting quietly at her daughter's elbow,
listening to the conversation just related.
Two conquests! thought the young lady herself.
A lively girl! was the opinion of young Van Horne.
Fair game! said Harry to himself.
While some of the young people were flirting, others
dancing, Mr. Taylor and Mr. Clapp, whose acquaintance
had commenced on board a steamboat that very morning,
were walking together up and down the hall, which they
had pretty much to themselves. They touched on
business
,
which was pronounced very active; and on politics,
which were declared to be particularly dull, just then: Mr.
Clapp, indeed, thought the people much too quiet
shamefully
blind to their own interests, which always demanded
what he called a state of healthful excitementmeaning an
unreasonable excitement upon any subject whatever. There
can be no doubt that Mr. Clapp honestly believed such a
state of agitation far more conducive than quiet to his own
interest; for he was quite a fluent speaker, and very
ambitious
of a seat in the State Assembly. He belonged to that
school of republicanism, which so completely identifies the
individual with the mass, that it cannot conceive of any
independent
opinions, tastes, or principles; and, very possibly,
he persuaded himself the good of the nation, as well as his
personal advantage, required a fresh brand to be thrown upon
the Longbridge council-fire. Having exchanged opinions
with Mr. Clapp upon politics and the market, Mr. Taylor
proceeded to make some observations and inquiries about the
company; he evidently felt some curiosity regarding his
new neighbours, while his companion seemed well disposed
to give him all the information he desired.
Mr. Wyllys is a man of large property, I conclude,
said the merchant.
Mr. Clapp named the number of thousands usually
given to their host; the amount was much lower than Mr.
Taylor had supposed. He had already discovered that Mr.
Wyllys was highly respected by the Longbridge community
in general, and he had taken it for granted that he must be
the richest man in the neighbourhood; but he now found
that this was far from being the case. Mr. Wyllys, though
in easy circumstances, could not command half as much
money as several business men about him.
There
is a good fortune for you, said Mr. Clapp, the
lady on the sofa; her property does not lie here, though.
The real estate is mostly in Carolina and Philadelphia. Did
you see the young gentleman who has just gone out on the
piazza with your daughterMr. Hazlehurst? At the
demise
of the widow, it all goes to him; but in the mean time
he has only two thousand a yearit will be full twenty,
altogether, if well managed, said Mr. Clapp, running his
fingers through the black locks which his wife thought so
handsome.
Mrs. Stanley is the old lady's name, is it not? The
young gentleman is her grandson, I conclude.
Not at all; only a nephew by marriage, replied the
lawyer, pulling up his collar. He may feel much obliged
to Mr. Stanley for feathering his nest so well. But
Hazlehurst
is a very good fellow; I always liked him from the
time he was a little shaver.
The testator had no children of his own to inherit, I
suppose, remarked Mr. Taylor.
No sir; the only child of the first wife died just before
his fatherthe lady in the other room had no family. Mr.
Stanley had not a single near relation in the world; he
bequeathed
fifty thousand dollars to an Orphan Asylum, and
left his widow a life-estate in one-half the remainder; which,
at her death, goes in a lump, real estate and personals, to
young Hazlehurst, who is the son of an old friend, and a
nephew by marriage.
Some four hundred thousand dollars, I think you said;
that would make a fine capital for a young man to open
business with!
But show me the young man who, with four hundred
thousand to begin with, will not spend it instead of making
more! No, sir; give me a man with small means and a
sharp wit for his stock in trade, rather than a hundred
thousand
down; ten to one the first winds up the better man by
a good round sum. I should not wonder at all to find
myself
a richer man than Harry Hazlehurst by the time I am
fifty.
What splendid operations he might engage in, though!
If he wanted to, he could not touch the money now; it
is all in the widow's hands until he is five-and-twenty,
excepting
the allowance of two thousand a year which she
gives him, now he is of age.
After a little more conversation of the same naturein
which the Van Hornes and the Bernards came in for their
share of the appraisal, Mr. Clapp concluded by the offer of
an introduction.
Shall I introduce Mrs. Stanley to you? I am very well
acquainted. I was raised in the same part of the country she
came from. She is a very agreeable lady in conversation.
Mr. Taylor had not the least objection to make the
acquaintance
of any human being enjoying an estate of four
hundred thousand dollars. He assented, and following Mr.
Clapp into the drawing-room, the introduction took place
without farther preface. Mrs. Stanley had been conversing
with Miss Patsey and Elinor; she was rather taken by
surprise
when Mr. Clapp, advancing before her, said, with a
flourish, Mr. Taylor, Mrs. Stanley. Both the gentlemen
were received by her with as much quiet coolness as was
consistent with civility to her friend's guests. She had lately
been often annoyed by Mr. Clapp's officious attentions, and
was at a loss to account for them, until she remembered he
might be wishing to obtain a share in the management of her
affairs.
Having succeeded in bringing about the introduction, Mr.
Clapp turned to Elinor.
I hear strange stories in Longbridge about you, Miss
Wyllys, said Mr. Clapp.
There was as yet no individual in the little world known
to Elinor, more trying to her temper than the husband of her
friend, Kate Hubbard. There was a smirking impertinence
in Mr. Clapp's manner, of which it seemed impossible for
him to divest himself, for it was often most conspicuous
when he wished to make himself most agreeable; and no
wonder this was the case, for it was a quality natural to him.
The simple feeling of genuine respect and deference, so
grateful to the heart where sincerely felt, was one he had
3*
never had the happiness to know. On the present occasion
Elinor was not a little provoked with him, and something of
the feeling might have been traced in her expression. We
have heard of brilliant black eyes, that never appeared more
beautiful than when flashing with passion. Those of our
friend Elinor were small and grey; indignation, therefore,
may not have been so becoming to them.
Scarcely worth remembering, I fancy, she replied; and
then made some observation about Mrs. Hubbard, to turn the
conversation. The raillery and pleasantry of a man with no
more tact, or true delicacy, than William Cassius Clapp, was
more than even Elinor's sweet temper could have borne.
Mr. Wyllys had taken a seat near Mrs. Taylor.
We have not seen all your young people yet, I believe,
Mrs. Taylor.
Oh, no, sirI have six at home, besides the two here.
Thomas and Adeline are my eldest; the rest are hardly old
enough to go out to parties  though Pompey is nearly
fifteen.
You must bring Mr. Pompey, too, next time. Your
eldest son tells me he has just left Yale.
He graduated last month. I want him to stay at home
now until winter, and then go into business. But his father
has taken a notion of having him go to Europe for six months.
Thomas does not care so much about it; but husband has a
great opinion of a European journey  he talks some of
going himself. Some young men go a whaling to see the
world; but Mr. Taylor thinks Thomas had better have a
chance to go to Paris.
He will probably find Paris the pleasantest trip of the
two, said Mr. Wyllys, smilling. Young Hazlehurst is
going abroad, too; he sails next week, with his brother.
What is the name of Harry's packet, Nelly? asked her
grandfather, taking the young girl's hand affectionately, as
she passed.
Elinor named the vessel; and, from Mrs. Taylor's
answer
,
it appeared, the young men were to sail in the same
ship.
I am glad to hear that your grandson is going to France,
sir; it will be more sociable, for Thomas to have somebody
he knows, in Paris.
They will probably meet there. Harry is not my
grandson, however.
I beg your pardon; but, I understood, that the pretty
young lady, with the white flower in her hair, and the young
gentleman talking to my daughter Adeline, were your
grandchildren
.
Oh, no; Miss Graham is my great-niece; and, as for
Harry, if I remember right, he is no relation at all; though,
we call him cousin. I have a house full of little
grandchildren
,
here, just now, from Baltimore; but they are too
young to be out of the nursery, at this hour. Does Miss
Taylor sing?
No, sir; Adeline performs on the piano; but she has
not any voice for music; which, I am very sorry for, as I
like to hear young people sing.
Perhaps, then, you would like to hear my
grand-daughter
;
she sings me a song every evening, after tea, said Mr.
Wyllys, who, indeed, seemed to think something was
wanting
to an evening, in his own house, unless Elinor gave him
a little music, of which he was passionately fond; though,
like most American gentlemen, of his age, he had no
knowledge
of the art, and no other guide than a good ear, and
good natural taste. Elinor's voice was a full, sweet
contralto
,
which had been cultivated under the best masters in
Philadelphia; and, as she never attempted what she could
not perform with ease and grace, her music always gave
pleasure. One or two of the other ladies followed her, at
the pianoMary Van Horne, and a friend who had come
with her; but their performance was very indifferent. It
was rarely that one heard anything approaching to really
good amateur-music, in this country, fifteen years ago, at the
date of Elinor's seventeenth birthday.
A light supper, and a Virginia reel, concluded the
evening
;
when the party broke up.
I hope you are jealous, Elinor, said Harry Hazlehurst,
as he returned into the house, after having attended Miss
Adeline Taylor to the carriage.
Jealous!Of what, pray?
Of the heart and affections of your humble servant, to be
sure.You must have observed the snare that Miss Taylor
laid for them.
Nonsense.Good night! and Elinor accompanied her
aunt and cousin up stairs.
CHAPTER III.
Her playmate from her youth.
Rogers
.
Elinor
had been in her room for some minutes, and was
standing in thought, before an open window, when she
turned toward a little table near her, and, opening a Bible,
drew from it a letter. She raised it to her lips, and, moving
toward a light, unfolded the sheet. Tears soon blinded her
sight; she was much agitated; then, becoming calmer, she
continued to read. It was a letter of some length, and every
line seemed deeply interesting to the reader. Once she
paused, as if struck by some new thought, and then, again,
she read with some anxiety. She had just finished the last
words, when her door opened, and Miss Agnes entered the
room.
Be calm, my dear child, said her aunt; it is indeed
a precious letter, and one which we both value highly; your
feelings are only natural, dearest; but do not indulge them
to excess. Miss Wyllys, by her gentle, caressing manner,
succeeded in calming Elinor, when, urging her not to sit up
later, she left her niece for the night.
When Miss Agnes was gone, Elinor fell on her knees,
with the letter still in her hand. She remained some time,
apparently in prayer, and then rising calmly, she folded the
sheet, and laid it on the Bible; and, before her head touched
her pillow, the letter was again removed, and placed
beneath
it.
We have not the slightest wish to beguile the reader into
believing that Elinor had a mysterious lover, or a
clandestine
correspondence; and we shall at once mention, that this
letter was one written years previously, by the mother she
had lost; and her good aunt, according to the direction, had
placed it in her niece's hands, on the morning of her
seventeenth
birthday.
When Mr. Wyllys went down to breakfast, the next
morning, he inquired if their drunken visiter, of the previous
night, had shown himself again.
I have just been out, sir, to look after him, said Harry,
and the fellow does not seem to have liked his night's
lodgings. He broke jail, and was off before any of the men
were up this morning; they found the door open, and the
staple offhe must have kicked his way out; which could
easily be done, as the lock was old.
Elinor suggested that it was, perhaps, some one who was
ashamed of the situation in which he had been found.
More probably he was too much accustomed to a lock-up
house, to find it pleasant. But if he really had any business
here, we shall hear of him again, no doubt, said Mr.
Wyllys
.
The affair thus disposed of, the conversation took
another
turn.
Mr. Wyllys, Elinor's grandfather, was decidedly a clever
man. He had held a high position, in his profession, until
he withdrew from it, and had, at one time, honourably
distinguished
himself as a politician. He was well educated,
and well read; his library, at Wyllys-Roof, was, indeed, one
of the best in the country. Moreover, Mr. Wyllys was a
philosopher, a member of the Philosophical Society of
Philadelphia
;
and the papers he read, before that honourable
association, were generally much admired by his audience.
It is even probable that Mr. Wyllys believed himself
endowed
with a good stock of observation and experience in
human nature; but, in spite of all these advantages, we
cannot
help thinking that, although well-versed in natural
philosophy
,
this excellent gentleman proved himself quite
ignorant
of boy and girl nature. Even his daughter, Miss Agnes,
feared her father had been unwise and imprudent on an
occasion which she considered of great importance.
A great deal might be said in favour of Harry Hazlehurst.
Few young men, of his age, were more promising in
character
and abilities. He was clever, and good-tempered; and,
with all the temptations of an easy fortune within his reach,
he had always shown himself firm in principles. There
was one trait in his character, however, which had already
more than once brought him into boyish scrapes, and which
threatened, if not corrected, to be injurious to his career
through life. He was naturally high-spirited; and, having
been indulged by his mother, and seldom controlled by his
male guardian, a brother some ten years older than himself,
Harry was rather disposed to be self-willed, and cherished
some false notions regarding independence of character. His
friends hoped, however, that as he grew older, he would
become wiser. Something of this feeling had been mixed
up with the motives which had lately led him to take a
decided
step for the future.
From a boy, Harry had been more or less the companion
and play-fellow of Elinor Wyllys and Jane Graham, whom
he looked upon as cousins, owing to a near family connexion.
He had always felt very differently, however, towards the
two girls. Jane, a little beauty from her birth, had been an
indolent and peevish child, often annoying Harry by selfish
interference with their plans and amusements. Elinor, on
the contrary, had always been a favourite playmate. She
was an intelligent, generous child, of an uncommonly fine
temper and happy disposition. As for her plain face, the
boy seldom remembered it. They were both gay, clever
children, who suited each other remarkably well, in all their
little ways and fancies. Now, within the last year, it had
struck Harry that his brother Robert and his sister-in-law,
Mrs. Hazlehurst, were very desirous of making a match
between
Jane Graham and himself. He had overheard some
trifling remark on the subject, and had suffered an afternoon's
very stupid teasing and joking, about Jane, from a talkative
old bachelor relation. This was quite sufficient to rouse the
spirit of independence, in a youth of his years and disposition.
When, at length, he heard a proposition that Jane should
accompany them abroad, he went so far as to look upon it
as something very like manuvring.
He
was not a man
to be led by others, in the choice of a wife. Jane might be
a beautyno doubt she wasbut he had no such
extravagant
admiration for mere beauty. There was Elinor, for
instance; she was a very different girl, though without any
beauty; she was just the kind of person he liked. She was
so warm-hearted and generous in her feelingswithout a bit
of nonsense; she was so clevercould catch a thought in a
moment, and always understood and enjoyed a good thing.
Then her manners, too, were charming, so simple and
natural
;
while Jane had no manners at all. Then, everybody
said she was remarkably graceful, in a perfectly natural
way;how well she rode! Jane was even afraid to mount.
And how pleasantly Elinor sangand he was so fond of
music.Jane would do very well to sit and look at all day
long; but, for walking, talking, riding, singing  ay, for
thinking and feeling, Elinor would make precisely such a
companion as a man of sense would wish for. By dint of
dwelling on Elinor's good qualities, and on what he fancied
the plans of his brother and sister-in-law, he came to the
conclusion
that the only thing to be done, under the
circumstances
,
by a man of any characterby a man who had an
opinion of his own, was to go immediately to Mr. Wyllys,
and request his permission to address Elinor.
Harry was a great favourite with his unclefrom a child
the young man had always given this title to Mr. Wyllys
and he had more than once expressed to his daughter, a wish
that Hazlehurst and Elinor might, some years thence, take a
fancy for each other. In the mean time he seemed to look
upon them as children, and left matters to take care of
themselves
.
Harry's proposal was, therefore, quite unexpected
at the moment, and took him by surprise; he seemed to think
Hazlehurst decidedly too young, at presenthe had not yet
acquired his profession. This little difficulty in the opening
of the affair, merely served to rouse Harry's eloquence; and
as his youth was really the only objection against him, he
succeeded, before long, in obtaining Mr. Wyllys's cheerful
consent to his endeavouring, during the next two months, to
interest Elinor in his behalf.
Miss Agnes, when informed of what had passed, was quite
startled; she thought both parties too young to take so
decided
a step. But her father had given his formal consent,
and she could not seriously oppose it; especially when she
remembered that she, also, had more than once indulged the
idea that some five or six years later, Harry would make a
very good husband for her adopted daughter.
No one in the family was more surprised at Harry's
advances
than Elinor herself. They had been so much
together
,
ever since she could remember, and had always been
such good friends, in an open, brother-and-sisterly way, that
even in the last year or two, when indistinct ideas of love
and matrimony had occasionally, like distant events, cast
their shadows before, Harry had never once presented
himself
to her fancy in the light of a suitor. It required a day
or two for her to comprehend the full meaning of Harry's
proceedings; she could say neither yes, nor no. This
hesitation
very much increased Hazlehurst's perseverance; but
her aunt, who looked on anxiously, had stipulated that
nothing
decided should be required of her, until Harry left
them.
In the mean time, a day or two had been sufficient for Mr.
Wyllys to become not only reconciled to the idea, but so
well pleased with the appearance of things, that he amused
himself with looking on at Harry in his new character of a
lover; and generally once a day, had some little joke at the
expense of Elinor's embarrassment. But now, the two
months had passed; Harry was to sail the next week for
Franceand Elinor, the morning after her birth-day, was to
give a decided answer.
It was no longer very difficult to foresee that this answer
would be favourable. In fact, Harry, who was thoroughly
gentlemanly by nature and habit, had made his attentions
just what they ought to have been under the circumstances;
and, with the full approbation of her own friends, and all
Harry's good qualities appearing in their best light, the two
months had proved sufficient to direct Elinor's childish
affection
for him into another and a deeper channel. The letter
she had received on the night of her birth-day, caused a
moment's indecision when, the next morning, after breakfast,
as Mrs. Stanley and Mrs. George Wyllys left the room, her
grandfather playfully asked her what they should do with
Harry?
But she scarcely knew in what shape to express the
thought that arose in her mind, and the feeling merely gave
an additional touch of embarrassment to her manner, which
was only looked upon as quite natural at the moment.
I shall think myself very badly treated, Elinor, said
Harry, observing her hesitation, if you turn me off like a
common acquaintance, after we have been the best friends in
the world for nobody knows how long.
Vol. I.  4
Well, Nelly, said her grandfather, what is it, my
child? Shall we tell Harry to go to Paris and cultivate his
moustaches, and forget everything else?
Oh, no; said Elinor, smiling as she held out her hand
to Hazlehurst, though without looking up: pray, don't come
back a dandy!
The affair was settled. The young people parted with
the understanding that when Hazlehurst returned from
Europe
,
and had acquired his profession, they were to be
married
;
and Harry went to Philadelphia, to join his brother,
and make the last arrangements for their voyage.
Jane, too, left Elinor a few days later; and Miss Wyllys,
who had charge of heras Mr. and Mrs. Graham lived in
Charlestonplaced her at one of the fashionable
boarding-schools
of New York. Miss Adeline Taylor had, in the
mean time, informed her parents that she had changed her
mind as to the school which was to have the honour of
completing
her education: she should
not
return to Mrs. A's,
but go to Mrs. G's, which was a more fashionable
establishment
.
Not that she had anything to complain of at Mrs.
A's; but she thought the young ladies at Mrs. G's
dressed more elegantly, and besides, she felt the impossibility
of remaining separated from Jane Graham, her new bosom
friend. These two young ladies had met twice previously
to the evening they had passed together at Wyllys-Roof;
Adeline had upon one occasion been in the same boat with
Jane, going and coming, between New York and Longbridge,
and she had already done all in her power towards getting
up a desperate intimacy. Her mother, as a matter of course,
did not interfere with the young lady's preference for Mrs.
G's schoolwhy should she? It was Adeline's affair;
she belonged to the submissive class of American parents,
who think it an act of cruelty to influence or control their
children, even long before they have arrived at years of
discretion
.
As for Mr. Taylor, he had discovered that the
daughters of several fashionable families were at Mrs.
G's, and was perfectly satisfied with the change; all
he had to do was, to make out the cheques in one name
instead
of another. Adeline managed the whole affair herself;
and having at last been to a young party, for which she had
been waiting, and having satisfied some lingering scruples
as to the colours of the silk dresses which composed the
winter uniform of the school, and which she at first thought
frightfully unbecoming to her particular style of beauty,
Miss Taylor one morning presented herself at Mrs. G's
door, and was regularly admitted as one of the young band
in fashionable training under that lady's roof. Jane, it is
true, did not show quite as much rapture at the meeting as
Adeline could have wished; but, then, Miss Taylor had
already
discovered that this last bosom-friend was of a calmer
disposition than the dozen who had preceded her.
Harry had not been a day in Philadelphia, before he
announced to his brother, his engagement with Elinor; for
he was much too frank by nature to have any taste for
unnecessary
mystery.
I have a piece of news for you, Robert, he said, as he
entered the drawing-room before dinner, and found his
brother
lying on a sofa.
Good news, I hope, replied Mr. Robert Hazlehurst.
May I not have my share of it? asked Mrs. Hazlehurst,
whom Harry had not observed.
Certainly; it is a piece of good fortune to your humble
servant, in which I hope you will both be interested.
Why, really, Harry, said his sister-in-law, there is a
touch of importance, with a dash of self-complacency and
mystery in your expression, that look a little lover-like.
Have you come to announce that you are determined to offer
yourself to some belle or other before we sail?
The deed is already done, said Harry, colouring a little;
as much, perhaps, from a mischievous satisfaction in the
disappointment
he foresaw, as from any other feeling.
No! said his brother, turning towards him with some
anxiety. Offered yourself  and accepted, then; or, of
course, you would not mention it.
Pray, tell us, Harry, who is to be our new sister, said
Mrs. Hazlehurst, kindly, and with some interest.
I have half a mind to tease you, he replied, smiling.
I never should guess, said Mrs. Hazlehurst. I had
no idea you were attached to any onehad you, Robert?
Not I! It must be somebody at Longbridgehe has
been there more than half his time lately. Come, tell us,
Harry, like a man; who is it? asked Robert Hazlehurst,
naturally feeling interested in his younger brother's choice.
No one precisely at Longbridge, said Harry, smiling.
Who can it be?And actually engaged? added Mrs.
Hazlehurst, who saw that Harry would not explain himself
without being questioned.
Engaged, very decidedly, and positively, I am happy to
say. Is there anything so very wonderful in my having
declared an attachment to Elinor; I am sure I have liked
her better than any one else all my life.
Engaged to Elinor! exclaimed Robert Hazlehurst, much
relieved. I am delighted to hear it. It is a wiser step
than one would always expect from a young gentleman of
your years.
Engaged to Elinor! I wish you joy with all my heart,
repeated his sister-in-law. It had not occurred to me to
think of any one so near and dear to us already; you could
not have done better, Harry, she added, with a perfectly
frank, open smile.
To tell the truth, Hazlehurst was not a little surprised, and
rather mortified by this decided approbationsince it proved
he had been unjust, and that he had deceived himself as to
what he had supposed the wishes of his brother, and the
plans of his sister-in-law. He did not, however, for an
instant
,
regret the step he had taken; his regard for Elinor was
too sincere to allow of any other feeling than that of
satisfaction
,
in remembering their engagement. But it had now
become a matter of indifference whether Jane were to join
the European party or not.
On the appointed day, the Hazlehursts sailed. They
went abroad with more advantages than many others, for
they carried with them good sense, good principles, and a
good education, and were well prepared to enjoy the wide
field of observation that lay before them. There was every
reason to hope, from the encouraging opinions of his
physicians
,
that Mr. Robert Hazlehurst's helath would be entirely
restored by travelling; his wife looked forward to the
excursion
with much pleasure, and Harry was delighted with
the plan. They had an old family friend in Paris, an
excellent
woman, who was in every way qualified to redeem the
promises she had given, of soon making them feel at home
in France. Madame de Bessires was the widow of a
distinguished
emigr
, and had passed a long exile with her
husband in America. They had been for years near
neighbours
of Mr. Wyllys, and this gentleman had had it in his
power, at different times, to render services of some
importance
to his French friends. Madame de Bessires and her
family were grateful for these acts of kindness: she had
known the young people at Wyllys-Roof, and felt an interest
in them all; for their own sakes, as well as from a sincere
respect and regard for Mr. Wyllys and his daughter, this
lady was anxious to show the Hazlehursts every friendly
attention in her power. Under these agreeable auspices,
the party left home, expecting to be absent for a couple of
years.
4*
CHAPTER IV.
Farewell, my lord! Good wishes, praise, and prayers,
Shall Suffolk ever have of Margaret.
Henry VI
.
The
arrival of letters from Harry, often accompanied by
something pretty or useful, as a souvenir for herself, were
the principal events of the next winter, to Elinor. Several
months of the cold weather were passed, as usual, by Mr.
Wyllys and his family, in Philadelphia; and Miss Agnes
thought it time that her niece should make her appearance
in society. But Elinor found less pleasure, than most girls,
in the gay world. She was seldom appreciated, in mixed
company; she was too young, at that time, and too modest,
for her intelligence to be generally known or cared for;
while her personal appearance exposed her to be entirely
overlooked and neglected by strangers; it had indeed
occasionally
been the cause of mortifications, more deeply felt by
Miss Agnes, than by Elinor herself. People talk so lightly,
in what is called general society; heartless remarks are
uttered
with so much careless indifference on all sides, that it
was not surprising some unkind observations should have
reached her ear. It was not until the season that she had
been introduced into a larger circle, that Elinor became
better
aware of her disadvantages in this respect. She had
been so tenderly loved and watched over by her grandfather
and aunt; she was so generally liked by those who had been
hitherto her companions, that she had not been aware of all
the consequences of her position. She knew that her
appearance
was not attractive, while her young friends were
more or less pretty; still, she had thought but little on the
subject, until her introduction into a larger circle led her to
remark the great importance which the world attaches to
mere beauty, in women, at least. But, with this reflection,
came also the gratifying recollection of Harry's regard for
her; and it served indeed to increase very much her
attachment
to him, by giving it an additional feeling of gratitude.
Harry's letters were kind and affectionate, and Elinor
thought them very amusing. It was impossible that an
intelligent, well-educated young man, suddenly transported
from the New, to the Old World, should not find a great
deal to say; and Harry told his adventures very agreeably.
His letters to Elinor were almost as straight-forward and
matter-of-fact, as they might have been if she had already
become his wife. His brother's health was improving; so
much so, that they were talking of leaving Mrs. Hazlehurst,
and her children, in Paris, while Harry and the invalid
made a six weeks' excursion to England. Madame de
Bessi
res
had been all kindness, and they were delighted with
the society they met at her house. Madame de Bessires
remembers you perfectly, said Harry, in one of his letters,
and as she is sure, under Aunt Agnes' care, you must have
grown up with all the good and agreeable qualities that she
loved you for when a child, she agrees with your humble
servant, in thinking him a very lucky fellow, and very
prudent
,
in having secured you before he left home. She is
really a most excellent and charming woman, as kind as
possible to Louisa. Her American friends have every
reason to be satisfied with her recollections of them,
especially
Mr. Wyllys and Aunt Agnes, whom she evidently
appreciates. Her nephew, young de Guivres, and I, are
very good friends already, and often take a gallop together
in the Bois de Boulogne. It is a settled thing, Elinor, dear,
that I am to bring you to France, one of these days; that is
to say, if you have no objections; which, of course, you will
not have. Tom Taylor is here still, and his progressive
steps in civilization are quite amusing, to a looker-on; every
time I see him, I am struck with some new changesome
fresh growth in elegance. I was going to say, that he will
turn out a regular dandy; but he would have to go to
London
for that; he will prove rather a sort of second-rate
petitma
tre
la Parisienne; which is entirely a different creature.
It would do your heart good to see Robert; he eats like a
ploughman, if ploughmen ever devour
poulets  la Marengo
,
or
ortolans  la Provenale
. I wish I could give as good
an account of Creighton, who arrived in the last packet;
poor fellow, he has not revived at all, and, I fear, will never
be better. His wife is with him; as pretty and agreeable
as ever. I hope Bruno behaves well, and remembers that
it is now his chief duty to devote himself to your service.
This was the last letter Elinor received in Philadelphia,
for early in the spring the family returned to the country.
She was never happier than at Wyllys-Roof, and resumed
with delight occupations and amusements, which would have
appeared very insipid to many elegant belles whom she left
behind hersince the mornings were to be passed without
visiting or shopping, the evenings without parties or
flirtations
.
In a quiet country-house, with no other young person
in the family, there was of course, at Wyllys-Roof, very little
excitementthat necessary ingredient of life to many people;
and yet, Elinor had never passed a tedious day there. On
the longest summer morning, or winter evening, she always
found enough to occupy her time and attention.
To her, Wyllys-Roof was home; and that is a word of a
broader and more varied meaning in the country than in a
town. The cares, the sympathies of a country home,
embrace
a wide circle, and bring with them pleasures of their
own. People know enough of all their neighbours, to take
part in any interesting event that may befall them; we are
sorry to hear that A., the shoemaker, is going to move away;
we are glad to find that B., the butcher, has made money
enough to build a new house. One has some acquaintance
with everybody, from the clergyman to the loafer; few are the
faces that one does not know. Even the four-footed animals
of the neighbourhood are not strangers: this is the Doctor's
Newfoundland dog; that is some old lady's tortoise-shell cat.
One knows the horses, as well as the little urchins who ride
them to water; the cows, and those who milk them. And
then, country-folks are nature's freeholders; they enjoy a full
portion of the earth, the air, the sky, with the thousand charms
an ever-merciful Creator has lavished on them. Every
inanimate
objectthis hill, that wood, the brook, the bridge,
C.'s farm-house, and D.'s barnto the very highway, as far
as eye can reach, all form pleasing parts of a country home.
In a city, on the contrary, we live surrounded by strangers.
Home is entirely restricted to our own fire-side. One knows
a neighbour's card, perhaps, but not his face. There may
have been a funeral or a wedding next-door, and we learn it
only from the morning paper. Then, even if a fixture
oneself, how is it possible for human sensibilities to cling
very closely to the row of brick houses opposite, which are
predestined to be burned or pulled down in a few years?
Nor can one be supposed to look with much pleasure at the
omnibus horses, or half-starved pigs that may belong to one's
street. No doubt, that with hearts warm and true, we may
have a
fireside
in town; but
home
with its thousand pleasant
accessories
home
, in its fullest meaning, belongs especially
to the country.
Elinor was a country girl, born and bred. Though
banished from Chesnut Street, she would have been well
satisfied with the usual occupations of a country life, varied
only by quiet walks with her aunt, rides with her grandfather,
chatty meetings with a few young companions, or long visits
from old friends, whose names and faces had been familiar
to her all her life. The first few weeks after her return to
Wyllys-Roof, she had, of course, more than usual to see
and hear. Elinor had been absent from home but a few
months; yet, even in that short space, she found changes
had occurred in the neighbourhoodvaried, as usualsome
of a sad, some of a pleasant nature. Miss Agnes and her
niece found one place vacant among those whom they were
in the habit of seeing often; the father of a family who lived
within sight of their own windows, had died suddenly, and
left a widow and children to struggle with the world: but
they were neither friendless nor repining, and submitted with
humble resignation to their severe affliction, prepared to meet
with faith and hope the additional cares and toils allotted to
them. One of Elinor's young friends, too, was lying on a
sick-bed at Longbridgea beautiful girl of her own age
wasted by consumption; but she was calm and peaceful,
though without hope this side the grave. We shall scarcely
forgive ourselves for making even a distant allusion to one
portion of Elinor's pleasures and labours, although more
especially connected with home; since none could perform
their religious duties with less ostentation, with more
single-hearted
sinceritynone could more carefully follow the
precept
,
to give with simplicity, than Miss Wyllys, and the
niece she had educated.
Of course, the ladies had immediately resumed their
intercourse
with their old friends; and they had many
neighbourly
visits to pay. Not your formal, fashionable
morning-calls
,
lasting just three minutes, when you are so unfortunate
as to find at home the individual you are paying off; no,
indeed; good, honest visits of nearly an hour's length, giving
time to exchange many kindly inquiries as to the health of
all the members of the family, the condition of the garden,
and promises of the crops; and even occasionally allowing
Mr. Wyllys to take a look at some addition to the live-stock,
in the shape of calves, colts, or pigs. Then, Mrs. Bernard
had just moved into a new house, whose comforts and
conveniences
must certainly be shown by herself, and
appreciated
by her friends. Then, Elinor had to kiss, and make
acquaintance with several tiny pieces of humanity, in white
frocks and lace capslittle creatures born during the past
winter; of course, the finest babies one could wish to see,
and the delight of their parents' hearts. Then, Alida Van
Horne was going to be married; as Elinor was to be her
bridesmaid, a great deal of talking and consulting took place
on the occasion, as a matter of course. But, although her
time was fully occupied in many different ways, no day was
too pleasant or too busy for more than one thought to be
given to Harry Hazlehurst.
CHAPTER V.
Anch' io son pittore!
Correggio
.
There
was one subject, in which the family at
Wyllys-Roof
felt particularly interested just then, and that was,
Charlie Hubbard's picture. This piece was to decide finally
the question, whether Charlie should be an artist, or a
merchant's
clerk; a question which he himself considered
all-important
,
and which caused much anxiety to his friends.
The house in which the Hubbards lived was a grey,
wooden cottage, of the smallest size; curious gossips had,
indeed
,
often wondered how it had ever been made to contain
a large family; but some houses, like certain purses,
possess
capabilities of expansion, quite independent of their
apparent
size, and connected by mysterious sympathies with
the heads and hearts of their owners. This cottage belonged to
the most ancient and primitive style of American architecture;
what may be called the comfortable, common sense orderfar
superior, one might suppose, to either Corinthian or
Composite
,
for a farm-house. The roof was low, and unequally
divided, stretching, on one side, with a long, curving slope,
over the southern front; which was scarce seven feet high:
towards the road the building was a little more elevated, for
a dormer-window gave it the dignity of a story and a half.
Not only the roof, but the wallswe have classical authority
for wooden wallswere covered with rounded shingles, long
since grey, and, in spots, moss-grown. Twice the cottage
had escaped a more brilliant exterior; upon one occasion it
had been inhabited by an ambitious family, who talked of a
coat of red paint; fortunately, they moved away, before
concluding
a bargain with the painter. Again, when the
Hubbards
took possession of the `old grey house,' a committee of
ladies actually drove over from Longbridge, with the
intention
of having it whitewashed; but, the experienced old
negro engaged to clean generally, gave it as his opinion, that
the shingles were not worth the compliment. The windows
were very small; more than half the glass was of the old,
blue bull's-eye pattern, no longer to be found at modern
glaziers, and each heavy window-shutter had a half-moon
cut in its upper panel, to let in the daylight. When we
add, that there was a low porch before the door, with a
sweet-briar
on one side, and a snowball on the other, the reader will
have a correct idea of the house inhabited by our friends, the
Hubbards.
The cottage stood within a little door-yard, near the gate
which opened on the lawn of Wyllys-Roof; and,
immediately
opposite the place recently purchased by Mr. Taylor.
Here the family had lived for the last twelve years; and,
from that time, Miss Patsey had been obliged to struggle
against poverty, with a large family of younger brothers and
sisters, dependent, in a great measure, upon her prudence
and exertions.
Mr. Hubbard, the father, a respectable Presbyterian
minister
,
had been, for half his life, in charge of a congregation in
Connecticut, where, by-the-bye, Mr. Pompey Taylor, at that
time a poor clerk, had been an unsuccessful suitor for
Patsey's
hand. After a while, the family had removed to
Longbridge
,
where they had lived very comfortably and usefully,
until, at length, the minister died, leaving his widow and
seven children entirely unprovided for. Happily, they
possessed
warm friends and kind relatives. The old grey house,
with a garden and a little meadow adjoining, was purchased
for his brother's family by Mr. Joseph Hubbard, known to
the young people as Uncle Josie: he was a merchant, in
easy circumstances, and cheerfully gave the thousand
dollars
required. The cottage was furnished by the minister's
congregation. Many useful presents were made, and many
small debts forgiven by kind neighbours. With this humble
outfit the family commenced their new career. Mrs.
Hubbard
,
the second wife, and mother of the three younger
children
,
had lost the use of one hand, by an attack of paralysis.
She had always been a woman of very feeble character; and
although treated with unvarying kindness and respect by her
step-children, could do little towards the government or
assistance
of the family. It was Patsey who toiled, and
managed
,
and thought for them all. With the aid of two
younger sisters, mere children, at first, and an old black
woman, who came once a week to wash, all the work was
done by herself, including baking, ironing, cooking, cleaning,
&c.; and yet Patsey found time to give up four hours a day
to teaching a class of some dozen children, belonging to
several
neighbouring families. This school furnished the only
money that passed through her hands, and contributed the
only regular means of support to the family. They received,
however, much kind assistance, in many different ways;
indeed, otherwise, it would have been scarcely possible to
keep a fireside of their own. There had been, in all,
nine children; but the eldest son, a missionary, died before
his father; the second had already gone to Kentucky, to seek
his fortunes as a physician; he had married young, and,
with children of his own to support, it seemed but little he
could do for his step-mother; he sent for a younger brother,
however, engaging to provide for him entirely. Another son
was educated by his rich Longbridge relative, kind Uncle
Josie; another uncle, a poor old bachelor, known to the
neighbourhood as Uncle Dozie, from a constant habit of
napping
,
Vol. I.  5
did his utmost, in paying the school-bills of his niece
Catherine. In the course of a few years, Uncle Josie's
prot
g
became an assistant in the school where he had been
educated; Kate Hubbard, Uncle Dozie's favourite, married
a quick-witted, but poor, young lawyer, already introduced
to the reader, by the name of Clapp.
Still, there remained in the family two younger daughters,
and Charlie, besides Miss Patsey and Mrs. Hubbard. By
the exertions and guidance of Patsey, the assistance of friends,
and their own good conduct, the young people, in due time,
were all growing up, endowed with good principles, good
educations, and with respectable prospects opening before
them. At the period of our narrative, the third daughter
hoped shortly to become an under-governess in the school
where she had been educated; and Mary, the youngest of
the family, had such a decided taste for music, that it was
thought she would have no difficulty in supporting herself,
by giving lessons, in the course of two or three years. Of
all the family, Charlie was the one that caused his friends
the most anxiety. He was a fine, spirited, intelligent boy;
and Uncle Josie had promised to procure a situation for him,
with his son-in-law, a commission-merchant and auctioneer,
in New York. This plan was very pleasing to Mrs.
Hubbard
and Miss Patsey; but, unfortunately, Charlie seemed
to have no taste for making money, and a fondness for
pictures
and pencils, that amounted almost to a passion. Here
was an unexpected obstacle; Charlie was the pet and spoiled
child of the family. All the rest of the young people had
been quite satisfied with the different means of support that
had offered for each; and they had followed their respective
careers with so much quiet good sense, that Charlie's
remonstrances
against the counting-house, and his strong fancy for
an artist's life, was something quite new, and which Miss
Patsey scarcely knew how to answer. There was nothing
in the least poetical or romantic about Patsey Hubbard, who
was all honest kindness and straight-forward common sense.
She had no feeling whatever for the fine arts; never read a
work of imagination; scarcely knew one tune from another;
and had never looked with pleasure at any picture, but one,
a portrait of her own respected father, which still occupied
the place of honour in their little parlour, nearly covering
one side of the wall. This painting, to speak frankly, was
anything but a valuable work of art, or a good likeness of
the worthy minister. The face was flat and unmeaning,
entirely devoid of expression or relief; the body was stiff
and hard, like sheet-iron, having, also, much the colour of
that material, so far as it was covered by the black
ministerial
coat. One arm was stretched across a table, conspicuous
from a carrot-coloured cloth, and the hand was extended over
a pile of folios; but it looked quite unequal to the task of
opening them. The other arm was disposed of in some
manner satisfactory to the artist, no doubt, but by no means
easy for the spectator to discover, since the brick-coloured
drapery which formed the back-ground to the whole,
certainly
encroached on the side where nature had placed it.
Such as it was, however, Miss Patsey admired this painting
more than any she had ever seen, and its gilt frame was
always carefully covered with green gauze, no longer
necessary
to preserve the gilding, but rather to conceal its
blackened lustre; but Charlie's sister belonged to that class
of amateurs who consider the frame as an integral part of
the work of art. It was, perhaps, the most promising fact
regarding any future hopes of young Hubbard's, as an artist,
that this same portrait was far from satisfying his taste,
uncultivated
as it was. Charlie was, for a long time, so much
ashamed of his passion for drawing, that he carefully
concealed
the little bits of paper on which he made his sketches,
as well as the few old, coarse engravings he had picked up
to copy. But, one day, Miss Patsey accidentally discovered
these treasures between the leaves of a number of the
Longbridge
Freeman, carefully stowed away in an old chest of
drawers in the little garret-room where Charlie slept. She
found there a head of Washington; one of Dr. Blair; a
view of Boston; and an old French print called
L'Et
,
representing
a shepherdess making hay in high-heeled shoes and
a hoop; there were copies of these on bits of paper of all
sizes, done with the pen or lead-pencil; and lastly, a
number
of odd-looking sketches of Charlie's own invention. The
sight of these labours of art, was far from giving Miss Patsey
pleasure, although it accounted for the surprising
disappearance
of her writing-paper, and the extraordinary clipping,
she had remarked, of late, on all notes and letters that were
left lying about, from which every scrap of white paper was
sure to be cut off. She spoke to Charlie on the subject, and,
of course, he had to confess. But he did not reform; on the
contrary, matters soon grew worse, for he began to neglect
his studies. It happened that he passed the whole summer
at home, as the school where his brother had been assistant,
and he himself a pupil, was broken up. At last, Miss
Patsey
talked to him so seriously, about wasting time on trifles,
that Charlie, who was a sensible, warm-hearted boy, and
well aware of the exertions his sister had made for him,
promised
amendment, and actually burnt all his own sketches,
though the precious engravings were still preserved. This
improvement only lasted a while, however, when he again
took to drawing. This time he resolutely respected Miss
Patsey's paper, but that only made matters worse, for he
became more ambitious; he began to sketch from nature;
and, having a special fancy for landscape, he used to carry
his slate and arithmetic into the fields; and, instead of
becoming
more expert in compound interest, he would sit for
hours composing pictures, and attempting every possible
variety in the views of the same little mill-pond, within a
short distance of the house. He soon became quite expert in
the management of his slate and pencil, and showed a good
deal of ingenuity in rubbing in and out the white shading on
the black ground, something in the manner of a
stump-drawing
;
but, of course, these sketches all disappeared
before
Charlie went to take his regular lesson in book-keeping,
from the neighbour who had promised to keep him in
practice
until the winter, when he was to enter the
counting-house
.
At last, however, Charlie determined to have an
explanation
with his mother and sister; he made a clean breast as
to the misdoings on the slate, and boldly coming to the point,
suggested the possibility of his being able to support himself,
one day, as an artist, instead of a commission merchant.
Poor Miss Patsey, this was a sad blow to her! It had been
her cherished ambition to see Charlie an upright, prosperous
merchant; and now that his prospects were brightening, and
a situation was provided for him, that he should be only a
painter! She had a very low opinion of artists, as a class,
and she would almost as soon have expected Charlie to
become a play-actor, or a circus-rider. When the boy found
that both Uncle Josie and Uncle Dozie thought his idea a
very foolish one, that Miss Patsey was very much distressed,
and Mrs. Hubbard could not be made to comprehend the
difference between an artist and a house-painter, he again
abandoned his own cherished plans, and resumed his
commercial
studies. Unfortunately, one day, Elinor was
choosing
a book as a present for her old play-fellow, at a
book-store
in Philadelphia, when she laid her hand on the Lives
of the Painters. These volumes finally upset Charlie's
philosophy; he immediately set to work to convince Miss
Patsey and Uncle Josie, by extracts from the different lives,
that it was very possible to be a good and respectable man,
and not only support himself, but make a fortune, as an artist.
Of course, he took care to skip over all unpleasant points, and
bad examples; but when he came to anything creditable, he
made a note of itand, one day, pursued Miss Patsey into
the cellar, to read to her the fact that Reubens had been an
ambassador.
Miss Patsey confided her anxieties to Mr. Wyllys, who
was already aware of Charlie's propensities, and, indeed,
5*
thought them promising. He advised Mrs. Hubbard and
Patsey, not to oppose the boy's wishes so strongly, but to give
him an opportunity of trying what he really could do; and
as the expense was a very important consideration with the
Hubbards, he made Charlie a present of a palette and colours,
and kindly took him, one day, to Philadelphia, to see Mr.
S, who gave him some advice as to the way in which
he should go to work. This assistance Charlie received,
upon condition that he should also, at the same time, continue
his other studies; and in case any two artists that his friend
might consult, should declare, on seeing his work, that he
did not show talent enough to promise reasonable success, he
was, from that time, to devote himself to business. For a
while, Charlie was a great deal happier than a king. He
immediately began a view of his beloved little mill-pond, and
then attempted one of a small sheet of water in the
neighbourhood
,
called Chewattan Lake. These, after having been
touched and re-touched, he carried, with a portfolio of
drawings
,
to New York, and with a fluttering heart and trembling
hands laid them before two distinguished artists, Mr. C
and Mr. I, to whom Mr. Wyllys had given him letters.
The decision of these gentlemen was not discouraging, upon
the whole; but they found that he had set out wrong in the
arrangement of his colours, and having corrected the mistake,
they proposed his painting another piece in oils, to determine
whether the faults in the first were the result of ignorance,
or of a false eye for colour; for on this point his judges
disagreed
.
It must be confessed that Charlie's clouds might
give some idea of such vapours as they may exist in the moon;
but certainly the tints the youth had given them were very
remarkable for an earthly atmosphere.
It was upon this last pictureanother view of Chewattan
Lakethat Charles was engaged, heart and soul, when the
Wyllyses returned home. One afternoon, Mr. Wyllys
proposed
to Miss Agnes and Elinor, to walk over and call upon
Miss Patsey, and see what their young friend had done.
Here we are, Charlie, my lad; you promised us a look
at your work this week, you know; said Mr. Wyllys, as he
walked into the neat little door-yard before the Hubbards'
house, accompanied by the ladies.
Charlie was at work in the vegetable garden adjoining the
door-yard, weeding the radishes.
Everything looks in very good order here, Charles,
observed Miss Wyllys. You have not given up the garden,
I see, although you have so much to do now.
Your beds and your flowers look as neat as possible,
said Elinor; just as usual. You don't seem to have gone
far enough in your career to have learned that,
un beau
desordre
is the effect of art, she added, smiling.
No, indeed; it is to be hoped I never shall, for that
would throw my mother and sister into despair, at once!
Miss Patsey, who had heard the voices of the party, now
came from the little kitchen, where she had been baking, to
receive her friends.
Elinor has just remarked that things do not look as if
you had an artist in the house; everything is neat as wax,
said Mr. Wyllys, stepping into the little parlour.
Miss Patsey was beginning to resign herself to hearing
Charlie called an artist, although the word had still an
unpleasant
sound to her ear.
Charles is very good, she replied, about keeping his
things in their place; he does not make much litter.
After some inquiries about Mrs. Hubbardwho, it seems,
was taking her afternoon nap  Mr. Wyllys asked to see
Charlie's work.
You must let us look at it, Charles, said Miss Agnes;
we have been waiting, you know, quite impatiently for the
last week.
If we must go up to your
studio
for it, we'll rest awhile
first, said Mr. Wyllys taking a seat.
You mortify me, sir, said Charlie, by using such great
words about my little doings, even in pleasantry. I am half
afraid to show my work; but I will bring it down.
I hope we shall find some improvementthat is all we
can expect at present, my boy. We don't look for a Claude
yet.
Charlie blushed, in the excess of his modesty.
Pray, bring all your sketches, too, said Elinor. Mary
wrote me you were drawing all winter; you must have a
great deal that we have not seen.
They are certainly not worth looking at; but such as
they are, you shall see them.
And don't forget the Arithmetic, too, said Mr. Wyllys,
smiling; we had better look a little into Compound Interest,
of course.
Charlie looked as if that were rather a sore subject, as he
left the room.
While he was gone, a carriage stopped at the little gate.
It proved to be the Taylors; and Mr. Taylor, with his wife,
and a couple of children, walked in. After a general
salutation
had been exchanged, and two additional chairs had
been brought from a bed-room, to accommodate such an
unusual number of visiters, Mr. Taylor turned to Miss Patsey,
and observed, in a jocular way:
It is not etiquette, I believe, to call twice in the same day;
but I hope you will excuse us; for on this occasion, Mrs.
Taylor has come to transact a little business.
As you seem to be engaged, Miss Hubbard, we will put
it off until another time, said Mrs. Taylor.
Just as you please, replied Miss Patsey. I am always
glad to see my friends.
Mr. Taylor, however, liked quick measures, and never
postponed business if he could help it.
We came to see you, this afternoon, about our two
youngest children; if you can conveniently take them into
your school, it would suit us very well.
Charlie, at that moment, returned with his picture in one
hand, and a portfolio in the other. He was rather sorry to
find the Taylors there, for he was far from admiring the
gentleman. Mr. Wyllys was really anxious to see the piece,
and asked to look at it at once. The canvass was placed
near a window, in the proper light, and the covering
removed
.
The Wyllyses were immediately struck with
Charlie's rapid improvement; there was, indeed, no
comparison
between the young man's first attempts at the art,
and this last piece. His friends all congratulated him on his
success, and Charlie was delighted.
This settles the question, I think, Miss Patsey, said Mr.
Wyllys.
I suppose so, said Miss Patsey, with a shake of the
head, and a smile. I think I can see myself that this
picture looks more natural than the first.
Quite a tasty painting, said Mr. Taylor, stepping up
with a decided air towards the canvass. I should conclude,
however, that you would find port
rates
a more advantageous
business.
I like landscapes best, sir, replied the youth; and
turning
to Mr. Wyllys, he added: Mr. S advised me to
please myself as to the subjects I worked upon.
Certainly, answered Mr. Wyllys; and you seem to
prefer my mill-pond, Charlie, to the human face divine.
But, here are sketches of faces, said Elinor, looking
over the portfolio; very good, too;this is excellent
grandpapa, do you know yourself? And Miss Patseyvery
good  Aunt Agnes, too! Why, Charles, you must have
drawn all these from memory.
The sketches Elinor was looking at, were roughly done in
ink or lead-pencil; but were generally good likenesses. Mr.
Wyllys took up one, that had not yet been observed by the
rest of the party; he smiled, and passed it to his
granddaughter
.
Elinor coloured, and her heart beat as she looked
at it, for it was a sketch of Harry. Mr. Taylor was
standing
behind her, and recognised it immediately.
That is Mr. Hazlehurst, if I am not mistaken; and a
very good likeness, Miss Wyllys.
I suppose, your son and Harry have met, in Paris, Mr.
Taylor, said Miss Agnes, by way of turning his attention
from Elinor.
Yes, madam, Thomas mentions having had some
intercourse
with Mr. Hazlehurst, and observes, that he sees him,
almost every day, in the
Tullyrees;
which, Thomas says, is
the
rendy-vuss
of the fashionable world, in Paris.
Will your son return home soon?
Why, no; I think not. He went for six months; but
he calculates, now, to stay some time longer. I am told, Mr.
Hazlehurst will not return until next year;  they might
make the Eurpean
tower
together. But Thomas seems
to like the
caffies
and the
bully-vards
of Paris, too much to
move from that city.
Elinor was going to take another sketch from the table,
when Charlie quickly passed his hand between Mr. Taylor
and herself, and drew the paper away.
I beg your pardonbut it is a wretched thing; I did not
know it was there, said the youth, hastily.
Pray, let me look at it, said Elinor, for, I thought, I
recognised a friend.
You must not see it, indeed, Miss Elinor; I dare say,
you took it for anybody but the right person; said Charlie,
a good deal embarrassed, and hurriedly handing Elinor
something else to look at.
She was surprised at his nervous manner, but said nothing
more.
I honestly think, Charlie, said Mr. Wyllys, who had
been examining the landscape, that Mr. C, and Mr.
I, will tell you to persevere, after this. There is
something
about the water, in your picture, that strikes me as
unusually good.
I am very glad to hear you say so; for there is nothing
I like to paint so much as water. I took great pains with
that part of my piece; but it does not satisfy me yet.
Do you intend to make use of water-colours altogether,
in your paintings? asked Mr. Taylor.
Charlie looked puzzled, and the merchant repeated his
question.
I should think, you would find water-colours cheaper;
but oils must be more durable. Which are most generally
in use among painters?
Charlie, understanding the point, at last, explained that
water-colours, and oils, were two entirely distinct branches
of the art.
Which is your picture, there, done in?
I am learning to paint in oils, sir.
And that por
trate
, overhead, which is your father, I
presume
;
is that in oils, too?
Yes, sir.There are very few pictures, of that size, in
water-colours, I believe. Here is a miniature, in
water-colours
,
which Mrs. Van Horne lent me; I am taking a
large picture, in oils, from it.
Mr. Taylor examined the miniature. It has puzzled me
considerably, he observed, to know how painters could
change the size of an object, and be correct, without
measuring
it off in feet and inches; but, I suppose, that is what you
term perspective.
One is sometimes surprised by the excessive ignorance, on
all matters concerning the fine arts, betrayed in this country,
by men of some education; very clever, in their way, and
quite equal to making a speech or a fortune, any day. In
Europe, just notions, on such matters, are much more widely
spread. But, after all, such a state of things is perfectly
natural; we have hitherto had no means of cultivating the
general taste, in America, having few galleries or even
single works of art, open to the public. With the means,
it is probable, that as we grow older, we shall improve, in
this respect. That there is talent, ay, genius, in the country,
sufficient to produce noble works of art, has been already
proved. Nor can it be doubted, that there is latent feeling,
and taste enough, among the people, to appreciate them, if
it were called forth by cultivation. It is only a brutal and
sluggish nation, who cannot be made to feel, as well as
think. The cultivation necessary, however, is not that which
consists in forcing the whole body of the people to become
conceited smatterers: but that which provides a full supply
of models for mediocrity to copy, and for talent to rival.
It is evident, that common sense requires us to pursue one
of two courses; either to give true talent, in every fieldin
literature, in music, painting, sculpture, architecturesome
share of the honourable encouragement which is its due, or
else honestly to resign all claim to national merit, in these
branches of civilization; leaving the honour to the
individual
.
As neither the government, nor men singly, can do
much toward encouraging the arts, this would seem to be
the very field in which societies might hope to produce great
results. Would it not be a good innovation, if those who
often unite to present some public testimonial of respect to
an individual, should select, instead of the piece of plate,
usual on such occasions, a picture or work of sculpture?
Either, it is to be supposed, if respectable in its way, would
be a more agreeable offering, to a person of education, than
gold or silver in the shape most modern workmen give them.
Under such circumstances, who would not prefer a picture
by Cole or Wier, a statue like Greenough's Medora, Power's
Eve, or Crawford's Orpheus, to all the silver salvers in New
York? Who would not prefer even a copy from some fine
bust or head of antiquity, from some celebrated cabinet
picture
,
to the best medal that has yet been struck in this
country
?
Thoughts like these were passing through Mr. Wyllys's
mind, as he sat looking at Charlie's picture. Mrs. Taylor
had, in the mean time, been making arrangements for her
younger children to enter Miss Patsey's school for the
summer
.
Mr. Taylor having joined the ladies, something was
heard about `terms,' and the affair appeared settled. Miss
Agnes having mentioned to Mrs. Taylor that she had intended
calling on her, but would now postpone it until another day,
she was so strongly urged to accompany them home, that
she consented to do so, aware that the visit should have been
paid some time before. Accordingly, they all left the
Hubbards
together.
It was not often that Miss Patsey's little parlour was so
full, and so much littered, as it had been that afternoon; it
generally looked crowded, if it contained two or three
persons
besides the minister's portrait, and was thought out of
order, if the large rocking-chair, or the clumsy, old-fashioned
tea-table did not stand in the very positions they had occupied
for the last twelve years.
Very different was the aspect of things at Mr. Taylor's.
Not that the rooms were imposing, in size, but the elegance
of the furniture was so very striking. Of course, there were
two drawing-rooms, with folding-doors and Brussels carpets;
while everything corresponded to a fashionable model. Mrs.
Taylor, good soul, cared very little for these vanities of life.
The window-blinds, in her two drawing-rooms, were never
opened, except for some occasional morning visiter or
evening
tea-party; she herself used what she called the `living
room,' where she could have her younger children about her,
and darn as many stockings as she chose. The
drawing-rooms
were opened, however, for the Wyllyses, who were
urged to stay to tea. Miss Agnes declined the invitation,
though Mr. Wyllys and herself remained long enough to
look at the plan of a new house, which Mr. Taylor was to
build shortly; it was to be something quite grand, far
surpassing
anything of the kind in the neighbourhood, for Mr.
Taylor had made a mint of money during the past winter.
Vol. I.  6
CHAPTER VI.
What say'st thou? Wilt thou go along?
Henry VI
.
Jane Graham
joined Elinor at Wyllys-Roof, after having
made her parting curtsey to Mrs. G. Her parents
lived at Charleston; but as her constitution was delicate,
and required a more bracing air than that of Carolina, Jane
had been more than once, for a twelvemonth at a time,
entirely
under Miss Wyllys's charge, and was seldom absent
from Longbridge for more than a few months together. It
was now settled that she was to remain with Elinor until
the autumn, when her parents, who were coming north for
a couple of months, were to carry her back to Charleston.
Miss Adeline Taylor, of course, found it impossible to remain
longer at school, when Jane, her bosom-friend, had left it.
She, too, returned to her family in the country, prepared to
enliven the neighbourhood to the best of her ability. The
intimacy between these two young ladies was only riveted
more closely by the necessity of living under different roofs;
Adeline, indeed, protested that she found the separation so
distressing, that she thought it would be an excellent plan, to
divide the winter together, between Charleston and New
York; Jane to pass the first three months with her, and she,
in her turn, to accompany her friend to Charleston, later in
the season. But Jane thought her mother would now wish
to have her return home as soon as possible, as it was already
nearly a year since she had seen her family. This affair,
however, was not quite decided; Adeline declaring that she
could not bear to give up the idea, hinting that there were
all-important reasons for their remaining together during the
next winter.
Elinor often wondered that her cousin should find so much
pleasure in this intimacy with Miss Taylor, whom she was
far from liking herself; and she could not help thinking that
Adeline was more persevering in pursuit of Jane, than was
agreeable. The dislikes of young girls of seventeen are
seldom violent, however, whatever their likings may be.
She made the best of it, and the three girls were often
together.
One evening, when they had been drinking tea at Mrs.
Taylor's, Elinor was much struck with a change in Jane's
manner, which she had already observed several times of
late, when they had been in society together.. As they were
coming home, and alone together in the carriage, she spoke
to her cousin on the subject.
How gay you were to-night, Jane! I never saw you in
better spirits.
Was I? Well, I'm very tired now; it is almost too
much for me, Elinor, to be so lively.
Was it an effort? Did you not feel well? inquired
Elinor.
I felt very well, indeed, before we went; but it tires me
so to be animated.
If it fatigues you to go out, my dear Jane, we had better
stay at home next time we are asked; but I thought you
wished to go this evening.
So I did. It does not tire me at all to go out; there is
nothing I like so much as going to parties. If one could
only do as they pleasedjust sit still, and look on; not be
laughing and talking all the time, it would be delightful.
That is what I have often done at parties, said Elinor,
smiling; and not from choice either, but from necessity.
Do you really think that a person who is engaged ought
not to talk?
No, indeed; said Elinor, colouring a little, as she
laughed at the inquiry. I meant to say, that I had often
sat still, without talking, at parties, because no one took the
trouble to come and speak to me. Not here, at home, where
everybody knows me, but at large parties in town, last
winter.
Oh, but you never cared about being a belle. Adeline
says everybody knows you are engaged, and it is no matter
what you do or say. But Adeline says, to be a belle, you
must laugh and talk all the time, whether you feel like it or
not; and she thinks you need not be particular what you
talk about, only you must be all the time lively. The young
men won't dance with you, or hand you in to supper, unless
you entertain them. Adeline says she is too high-spirited to
sit by, moping; and so am I, too, I'm sure!
But Jane, you are so very pretty, there is no danger of
your being overlooked.
No, indeed, you are mistaken, said Jane, with perfect
navet. I was at two or three small parties, you know,
in New York, while I was staying with Mrs. Stanley, this
spring; well, I missed more than half the quadrilles, while
those fat Miss Grants, and the Howard girls, were dancing
all the evening. Adeline says it is all because I was not
lively. They don't think anything of you unless you are
all the time talking, and laughing, and moving about; and it
does tire me soI'm almost sick of it already. I'm sure I
shall never be able to be lively at Charleston, in warm
weather. I shan't be a belle, Elinor, I'm afraid! said the
young beauty, with something like a sigh.
Poor Jane! said Elinor, laughing, though she really
felt provoked with Adeline for giving her cousin such
notions; Jane looked half worn-out with the evening's
exertions. And I believed, all the time, that you were in
such good spirits! Charlie and I were looking at you with
surprise; we thought Mr. Van Horne, and John Bernard
must be telling you something very amusing, you were
laughing and talking so much.
No, indeed; it was I, who was trying to amuse the
gentlemen.
But Jane was not destined to try the effect of the Charleston
climate upon the energies of a belle. Her parents arrived
in New York, where she met them. She found letters there
from her sister, Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst, to her mother and
herself, strongly urging the propriety of Jane joining their
party, for the last year of their European visit. Mrs.
Hazlehurst
thought travelling would be of great service to her
sister, in every respect; it would, probably, restore her
health entirely; in Paris she would take lessons from the
best masters, if she wished itbesides enjoying the
advantages
of seeing the Old World; at the same time that, in
her sister's family, she would be as well taken care of, as if
at her father's house, or at Wyllys-Roof. It was an
opportunity
which might not occur again, and Mrs. Hazlehurst
wrote so urgently, that her parents consented to the
arrangement
,
provided Jane, herself, liked the idea. An old friend
of the family, Mrs. Howard, was to sail next month for
France, and would willingly take charge of Mrs. Graham's
daughter during the voyage: everything was settled, it only
remained for Jane, herself, to decide. She was far less
anxious, however, to see the wonders of Europe, than many
other young persons would have been. Elinor congratulated
her warmly upon her good fortune, and dwelt upon the
pleasure she would, no doubt, enjoy; still, Jane appeared
rather indifferent to the plan, and it would probably have
been abandoned, had it not been for two circumstances.
Her father thought the voyage and change of air might
have a happy effect on her health, and improve it
permanently
;
and, at the same time, Miss Adeline Taylor threw
the whole weight of her influence into the scales; she had
a long private interview with Jane, which seemed to decide
the matter. The arrangements were made, and the first of
September, Jane, accompanied by her parents, Miss Agnes,
and Elinor, went on board the Hvre packet, and was placed
under the care of Mr. and Mrs. Howard. Though the
separation
took place under such happy auspices, there were
some tears shed, of course. Elinor felt quite sad at parting
6*
from her young friend, to whom she was warmly attached;
but time and tide soon separated the cousins, and the last
farewell, and waving of handkerchiefs, were exchanged.
Elinor had placed in Jane's hands a small package, and
a letter, for Harry. The last we do not think ourselves
privileged to open; but the little box we know to have
contained
a purse of her own knitting, and a lock of hair,
which was sent at the special request of Harry, as he
intended
to have it placed in a ring by a Paris jeweller. Jane's
baggage contained, moreover, in addition to her own
paraphernalia
,
several articles that one would not expect to find
among a young lady's trunks and hat-boxes. She carried
with her a barrel of buckwheat, a keg of cranberries, and a
couple of jars of ginger  dainties for which, it appeared,
some American friends of the Hazlehursts had sighed, even
amid all the delicacies of Paris.
In a few weeks, the family at Wyllys-Roof had the
pleasure
of hearing of Jane's safe arrival in Paris. The good
news came through Harry, and we shall give his letter, since
it was the last Elinor received from him in some months.
Place Vendme
,
October
, 18.
My Dearest Elinor
:
You will be glad to hear that Jane passed the barriers,
this morning, with the Howards. She has just finished a
letter to Mrs. Graham; and, as she dislikes writing so much,
has given me leave to announce her arrival to all at
Wyllys-Roof
.
As Jane enters Paris on one side, I leave it in the
opposite direction, for, the day after to-morrow, I am off for
Constantinople; a movement which will, no doubt, astonish
you, though, I am sure, you will wish me joy of such
pleasant
prospects. This letter will probably be the last you
will hear of me, for some time; not but what I shall write as
usual, but these long overland mails, through countries
where they suspect revolution or plague, in every letter,
often fail to do their duty. In fact, I delayed my journey a
week or two, expressly to see Jane, and have a good supply
of Longbridge news before setting out. Everybody tells me,
I must expect to lose more than half my letters, both ways.
This is bad enough, to be sure; but a journey to Greece and
Constantinople, would be too full of delights, without some
serious drawback. I believe Jane is more tired by
answering
our questions, and hearing what we have to tell her, than
by her voyage. I cannot help wishing, my dear Elinor,
that it were you who had arrived in Paris, instead of our
pretty little cousin. How I should delight in showing you
my favourite view, the quais and the island, from the Pont
Royalthe Louvre, too, and the Madeleine. As for Jane,
she will, doubtless, find her chief pleasures at Delilles', and
the Tuileries  buying finery, and showing it off: it has
often puzzled me to find out which some ladies most enjoy.
We are to be a party of four of us, on our eastern
expedition
.
In the first place, Ellsworth, whom you may have
seen; a very clever fellow, and brother-in-law to poor
Creighton. By-the-bye, Mrs. Creighton is still here, and
has been living, very quietly, with her brother, since her
husband's death; she is now going to the Howards, who are
her connexions, I believe; so says Louisa, at least.
Ellsworth
,
you know, poor fellow, lost his wife about a year ago;
he has left his little girl with her mother's friends, and has
come abroad for a year or two. Having been in Europe
before, he was very glad to make one, in our party to the
East, where he has not yet been. I mention him first, for
he is the most agreeable of our set. There is not much to
be said on the chapter of young Brown; and, I must
confess
,
that I don't quite agree with Col. Stryker, in the very
good opinion he evidently entertains of himself. By-the-bye,
American Colonels are as plenty, now-a-days, as the `
Marquis'
used to be, at Versailles, in the time of the Grand
Louis. Some simple European folk, actually believe that
each of these gentry has his regiment  in the garrison
of `Nieu Yorck,' I suppose; it would puzzle them, I
think, to find the army, if they were to cross the Atlantic; I
don't remember to have seen one of Uncle Sam's soldiers for
five years before I left home.
Many thanks, dearest Elinor, for the contents of your
box; you cannot doubt but they will accompany your
preux
chevalier
on his pilgrimage. This Eastern movement has
been such a sudden one, that I have still a thousand things
to do, which will oblige me to make my letter shorter than
I wish. Ellsworth is waiting for me, at this moment. We
expect to be gone six, or, possibly, eight months. I shall
write again from Marseilles; and, I hope, the letter from
thence will reach you. Pull Bruno's ears for me, and don't
let him forget his master; which will be one way, my dear,
kind Elinor, of obliging you to remember that individual also.
Best respects to Mr. Wyllys and Aunt Agnes, with much
love for yourself, dearest Elinor, from
Your affectionate, present and
futur
,
H. H.
P. S.Many remembrances for Mrs. Stanley, if she is
with you; I wrote to her last month.
CHAPTER VII.
What tidings send our scouts? I pr'ythee, speak.
Henry VI
.
About
the middle of the following March, the season, by
courtesy, called spring, but when winter sometimes reigns
de facto
, in the neighbourhood to which Wyllys-Roof
belonged
,
Mr. Wyllys proposed, one morning, to drive his
granddaughter to Longbridge, with the double object of
making the most of a late fall of snow, and procuring the
mail an hour earlier than usual.
The light cutter slipped through a track in which there
was quite as much mud as snow, and, it seemed, as if most
people preferred staying at home, to moving over roads in
that half-and-half condition: they met no one they knew,
excepting Dr. Van Horne.
I was sure you would be out this morning, Mr. Wyllys,
cried the Doctor, as they met, your sleigh is always the
first and the last on the road.
You generally keep me company, I find, doctor. I am
going for the mail. How far have you been, this morning?
To Longbridge, sir; but, with this sun, the snow will
hardly carry you there and home again; and yet, I dare say,
you will find something worth having, in the mail, for I saw
letters in your box; and there is a French packet in.
Indeed! We'll make the best of our way, then, at
once; and, wishing the doctor good morning, Mr. Wyllys
drove off. We shall have letters from Paris, I hope, Nelly,
said her grandfather.
Certainly, I hope so, replied Elinor; Jane's last
letter
was shamefully short. I had half a mind not to answer
it; and so I told her; but my scolding has not had time to
reach her yet.
Jenny is no great letter-writer; and she is very busy
enjoying her year in Paris, I suppose. But I shall be
glad to have a sight of Harry's handwriting again. Where
was it he wrote from last, in December?
From Beyroot, sir. He was to be in Paris early in the
spring.
Well, I hope we shall hear something from him to-day.
Before long, I suppose, we shall have the young gentleman
at Wyllys-Roof, trying to persuade you that he wants your
help in reading Blackstone. But, don't believe him, Nelly;
I shan't give you up for a year to come.
There is time enough to think of all that, said Elinor,
blushing a little.
Yes, time enough! and we can judge what sort of a
lawyer he will make, by the way in which he handles the
subject. As it is a bad cause, he ought to find a great deal
to say on the occasion. Suppose he manages the matter so
well, as to bring your aunt and myself over to his side, what
would you say?
I can only say now, grandpapa, that I cannot bear to
think of the time when I shall have to leave Aunt Agnes
and yourself, replied Elinor, with feeling. Pray, don't
let us talk about it yet; I shall be very well satisfied with
things as they are, for a long time to come.
Well, you may be satisfied to have Harry in Egypt; but
I should like to see him here, once in a while. When is it
they are to be home?
The last of the summer, sir. They sail in August, that
Louisa may see Mrs. Graham before she goes south.
You have had a different sort of a winter, my child, from
Harry and Jane.
It has been a pleasant winter to me, and to all three, I
hope.
Yes; Jenny has had all the gaietyHarry all the
adventure
and
you, all the sobriety. But it was your own
wish, my dear, that has kept us in the country, this winter.
The last six months had, indeed, passed very differently to
the young people. Jane had been dancing away her
evenings
on the parquets of Paris; and dividing her mornings
between walks to the Tuileries, drives to the Bois de
Boulogne
,
and visits to the shops. As for the lessons which had,
at one time, entered into the plan, they had never been even
commenced. Jane was too indolent to take pleasure in
anything
of the kind; and her companions, the daughters of
Mrs. Howard, led her into so much gaiety, that she really
seemed to have little time for anything else. Mrs. Robert
Hazlehurst thought, indeed, that her sister was quite too
dissipated
;
still, Jane seemed to enjoy it so much, she looked
so well and happy, and Mrs. Howard was such an obliging
chaperon, that the same course was pursued, week after
week; although Mrs. Hazlehurst, herself, who had an infant
a few weeks old, seldom accompanied her.
Elinor, in the mean time, was passing the quietest of
country lives at Wyllys-Roof, where the family remained all
winter. Even the letters, which the previous year had given
her so much pleasure, had been wanting during the past
season. Jane never wrote oftener than was absolutely
necessary
;
and only two of Harry's letters reached their destination.
There was a package from Europe, however, in the
Longbridge
Post-Office, on the morning of the sleigh-drive we
have alluded to. It contained a long letter from Harry,
written at Smyrna, announcing that he hoped to be in Paris
some time in March; and one from Mrs. Hazlehurst,
informing
her friends of their plans for the summerincluding an
excursion to Switzerlandafter which they were to return
home late in August.
The very day Elinor received these letters, Harry returned
to Paris. After pitching his tent among Grecian ruins, and
riding on camels over the sands of Egypt and Syria, he had
returned to France through Turkey and Austria; thinking
himself a very lucky fellow to have seen so much of what
the world contains, worth seeing.
He found his brother entirely recovered, as well as he had
been before the accident which had injured him. He was
called upon to admire the little niece born during his absence;
she was a sweet little baby, and Mrs. Hazlehurst had named
her Elinor, after her future sister-in-lawa kind attention
for which Harry was much obliged to her, and which, he
declared, would make the child a favourite with him.
Jane was there, of course, and glad to see Harry, of course.
Hazlehurst had scarcely taken possession of a comfortable
fauteuil in his brother's drawing-room, before the thought
occurred to him, that all the party looked much as usual,
excepting Jane. During the first evening, he became
convinced
that she was certainly altered by the air of Paris.
How very much she had improved in appearance and
manner! He had never before thought her so very beautiful
as many others had donebut he must now retract all he
had ever said on the subject. He supposed the good taste
with which she was dressed must have some effect; but it
seemed as if her beauty were now in its perfection. When
he last saw her, there was something almost childish in her
appearance and expression, which she had now lost entirely.
He was struck with the air of finish about her whole person,
from the rich glossy lustre on her dark hair, to the pearly
tint of her complexion. She was, indeed, a beatiful creature.
What a sensation such a face must create among the
enthusiastic
Parisians! Then, she must have more feeling than
he had given her credit for; she had received him quite
kindly, and seemed really glad to see him again.
Daily observation, while living under the same roof, only
confirmed Harry in this new opinion of Jane. He began to
admire the languid grace of her movements; and he
discovered
that it is very possible to have too much warmth of
manner, and that some women certainly fatigue one by their
animation. He must tell the family at Wyllys-Roof how
much Jane had improved. He found he was not mistaken
in supposing that she must produce an impression wherever
she was seen. Whether they were walking in the
Tuileries
of a morning, or went into society in the evening, the
effect was always the same; he saw her everywhere followed
by very evident and open admiration. And no wonder; her
beauty threw a charm over all her actions: it was even a
pleasure to accompany her in shopping excursionswhich
he used to look upon as the greatest tax that a lady could
impose upon his gallantry; but then, few persons looked so
beautiful as Jane, when selecting a muslin, or trying on a
hat. He soon became proud of a place at her side, and
much more vain of her beauty than she was herself.
I must let them know at Longbridge, he thought,
what a sensation Jane is making. She is, indeed, a beauty
to be proud of. I saw nothing like her in Greece. She
does credit to the country. Harry thought it patriotic to
admire her, and to lose no opportunity of enjoying the effect
of her beauties among the gay world of Paris. American
patriotism, as we all know, often takes singular shapes.
Jane and himself became more intimate, and on more
friendly terms than they had ever yet been. She seemed,
indeed, to prefer him, as a
cavaliere servente
, to any of her
other admirers, American or European. But that might
easily be accounted for, on the score of connexion. Of
course, Harry was grateful for this preference, and after a
while he even began to look upon the excessive devotion of
one or two of her admirers, as impertinence on their part.
About this timesome weeks after his return
Hazlehurst
gave himself very much to the study of sthetics.
The beautiful, the harmonious, alone attracted him; he
could not endure anything approaching to coarseness. He
wandered up and down the galleries of the Louvre,
delighting
more in the beautiful faces of the Italian masters, in the
Nymphs and Muses of the old Greeks, than he had ever
done before. He became quite a connoisseur. He had no
taste for the merely pretty; perfect beauty he admired with
his whole soul, but anything short of it was only to be
tolerated
.
He felt the fact, if he did not reason on the discovery,
that beauty in the very highest degree, carries with itwe
do not say the expressionbut the stamp of dignity, and
even of intelligence. Such was the impression produced by
Jane's perfectly classical head and features. It was
impossible
,
as you gazed upon her smooth polished forehead, and
noble dark eyes, to believe her wanting in character, or
intellect
.
Then, Harry remembered that talent of the highest
order bears a calm aspect; not frothy, sparkling cleverness,
which takes so well with the vulgar; not wit, exactly; but
that result of a well-balanced mind, in which all the faculties
harmonize so well, that they leave no one particularly
prominent
.
He had been much struck, lately, with several
Vol. I.  7
remarks of Jane'sthey showed a depth of observation, a
fund of good sense, which he had not formerly supposed
her to possess; but then, of old, he used to be unpardonably
unjust to Jane. She was certainly improved, too; her
friends at Longbridge would be gratified by the change.
This course of sthetics gradually carried Harry so far,
that after a profound study of the subject in general, and of
Jane's features in particular, he became a convert to the
opinion of the German philosopher, who affirms that The
Beautiful is greater than the Good. There have been
disputes
,
we believe, on the subject of this axiom, some critics
giving it a deep mystical sense, others, again, attempting to
explain it in different ways. Our friend Hazlehurst, though
a pretty good German scholar, seemed disposed to adopt the
idea in its simplest interpretation.
Things were in this train, when the family set out for
Switzerland.
CHAPTER VI.
Her dress, and novels, visits, and success.
Crabbe
.
Longbridge
was quite a pleasant village, and surrounded
by a pretty country. Like most other American rural towns,
it received, in the warmest months, a large accession to its
population; for it seems to be a matter of course, that
everybody
who is able to do so, runs away from brick walls in the
months of July and August, and selects some village in
which to rusticate, and set the fashions, enjoy the dust and
the fire-flies, fresh peaches, and home-made ice-cream.
Longbridge, in addition to the usual advantages of pure air,
and brown fields, in the month of August, had something of
a reputation as a place for bathing; and its three taverns,
and various boarding-houses, were generally well filled with
families from New York and Philadelphia, during the very
warm weather.
Among others, during the season to which we allude, the
Grahams were there, anxiously awaiting the arrival of the
Hazlehurst party from Europe; for letters had been received,
informing their friends that they might be expected at any
moment. The Wyllys carriage was now seen at
Longbridge
every day, either at the house where their relatives,
the Grahams, had taken lodgings for the season, or before
the door of a neat little cottage, recently purchased by Mr.
Wyllys for the widow of his youngest son, Mrs. George
Wyllys. This lady, to whom the reader has been already
introduced, had been left, with four children, almost entirely
dependent on her father-in-law. Her character was
somewhat
of a medley. She was a good-hearted woman, attached
to her husband's family, and always asking advice of her
friends, particularly Mr. Wyllys, and Miss Agnes, for whom
she had a sincere respect. She was pretty, lady-like, rather
clever, and a pleasant companion to persons not particularly
interested in her welfare. On indifferent topics she could
converse with as much good sense as the rest of the world;
but her own affairs she mismanaged terribly. All her other
good qualities seemed unsettled by a certain infusion of
caprice, and jealousy of influence; and yet she really meant
well, and fancied herself a very prudent woman. She
thought she was capable of making any sacrifice for those
she loved, and therefore believed herself a model in all the
relations of life. As a mother, she had a system of
education
,
the theory of which was excellent; but there was little
consistency in its practice. As regards money-matters, she
talked and thought so much about economy, that she took it
for granted that she practised it. After having passed the
first years of her widowhood with her own family in
Baltimore
,
she had lately become convinced that her income was
not sufficient to allow her living in a large town, without
running in debt. Mr. Wyllys was unfortunately too well
aware that his daughter-in-law's difficulties were not the
result of Baltimore prices, but of her own mismanagement.
Franklin advises his friends to take care of the pence, and
the pounds will take care of themselves: but this rule is by
no means infallible. Perhaps there is no species of
extravagance
more common, than that often practised by
well-disposed
people, which consists in being penny-wise,
pound-foolish
;
they will save a hundred cents on as many different
occasions, and throw away twenty dollars on one object.
It happens that such persons often succeed in persuading
themselves that they are models of prudence, and self-denial.
Such was Mrs. George Wyllys's plan; and, unfortunately,
she not only brought trouble on herself, but was a constant
source of anxiety to her father-in-law, who endeavoured, in
vain, to counteract the evil: but every succeeding year brought
a repetition of the difficulties of the former.
At present, Mrs. Wyllys was bent upon economy in a
cottage, with new furniture, purchased at a high price, at
New York auctions; and it was in vain to oppose her plan, so
convinced was she, that duty alone could have induced her
to leave her own family and old friends in Baltimore.
We must make the best of it, Agnes, said Mr. Wyllys,
it will be pleasant, at least, to have Harriet and her little
people near usand we may be of use to the children.
Miss Agnes agreed to the first part of her father's remark,
but was far from feeling sanguine as to their being of any
advantage to the children. It was a part of Mrs. Wyllys's
system, to consult her friends far more frequently than was
necessary, upon the education of her family, at the same
time that it also entered into her plan to follow their advice
very seldom indeed.
As for Elinor, she was very well pleased with her aunt's
arrival in the neighbourhood; of course, she was too young
and inexperienced to know the exact state of matters, and
she was attached to Mrs. Wyllys, and fond of her little
cousins.
One afternoon, Mrs. Wyllys had persuaded Miss Agnes
and Elinor to drink tea with her, and not return home until
the evening. The ladies were sitting together, in Mrs.
Wyllys's
pleasant little parlour, engaged with their needles, while
the children were playing under the windows, in the shady
door-yard.
Shall I put the bow on the right or left side, Elinor?
asked Mrs. Wyllys, who was re-trimming a hat for one of
her little girls.
It looks very well as you have it now, Aunt; replied
her niece.
Perhaps it does; there is a stain, however, on the other
side, which must be covered, replied the lady, changing
the bow. This riband was very cheap, Agnes, she added,
showing it to her sister-in-law. Only twenty cents a yard.
I bought the whole piece, although I shall not want it until
next spring.
Quite cheap, said Miss Agnes, looking at the riband;
but I don't know what you will do with so much of it.
Oh, I shall find some use for it; in a large family,
nothing
comes amiss.
A pretty, little girl, about eight years old, ran into the
room, and, skipping up to her mother, whispered, Here
comes a carriage, mamma, and some ladies.
Who is it, Elinor? asked Mrs. Wyllys, of her niece,
who was sitting near the window.
The Hubbards, she replied.
What, Patsey Hubbard?
Oh, no; her cousins  very different persons. The
Longbridge Hubbards, whose acquaintance you have not yet
made.
Two ladies, radiant with elegance, entered the room, and
were introduced, by Miss Agnes, to her sister-in-law, as Mrs.
7*
Hilson, and Miss Emmeline Hubbard. They were both
young; quite pretty; very fashionably dressed; very silly
in their expressions, and much alike, in every respect.
After a few preliminary speeches, Mrs. Hilson remarked.
that she was very glad Mrs. Wyllys had come to join their
rustic circle.
Thank you, replied the lady; Longbridge is a
favourite
place of mine; but I have not yet seen many traces of
rusticity, here.
Why, no, Julianna, observed Miss Emmeline, I don't
think our village is at all a rustic place. We have too many
advantages of communication with the city for that.
It is true, said Mrs. Hilson, Longbridge has always
been a very aristocratic place. You know, Miss Wyllys,
turning to Miss Agnes, we have our `West-End,' and our
`exclusives.'
I was not aware of it; but then I am really a rustic,
Miss Wyllys added, smiling.
Yes, it is unfortunate, you should be so far from the
village
.
Emmeline and I often pity you, Miss Elinor, for being
so far from genteel society.
That is scarcely worth while, I assure you, for we have
several pleasant families, within a short distance.
But only a very small circle, however. Now we have
quite a large set of aristocratic people, in the village. Some
of our inhabitants are very refined, I assure you, Mrs.
Wyllys
.
The lady bowed.
You will find your two next neighbours, Mrs. Bibbs and
Mrs. Tibbs, very fascinating ladies, observed Miss
Emmeline
.
Mrs. Bibbs is one of our beauties; and Mrs. Tibbs.
our most elegant dresser.
Emmeline is going over the Court Calendar, for you,
already, said Mrs. Hilson, laughing fashionably.
Are these ladies the wives of judges? inquired Mrs.
Wyllys.
Oh, no; Mrs. Tibbs is the lady of our physician, and
Mrs. Bibbs is a `marchande,'she is a very fascinating lady,
and has a fine flow of conversation. She was a great belle,
at Saratoga, a year or two since; you may, perhaps, have
met her there? inquired Mrs. Hilson.
Not that I know of; but I have not been at Saratoga for
years.
Is it possible? I cannot live without three weeks at
Saratoga, and a fortnight at Rockaway, every year. Before
I ordered my wedding-dress, I made Mr. Hilson promise I
should have my own way about that. I said to him, one
day, `Alonzo, before the settlements are drawn up, I shall
require you to pledge yourself to six weeks, every year,
between
Saratoga and Rockaway.'
You are fond of a gay life, I suppose.
Very naturally; having lived in the world of fashion
from my cradle, I do not think I could breathe any other
atmosphere. It must be a great change for you, Mrs.
Wyllys
,
from all the pleasures of a city-life to a small circle like
ours.
A change, certainly; but a pleasant one, I hope.
It will be a relief to you, to find so much aristocracy
among us. We have a certain
clique
, that, I think, must
satisfy the most refined taste, and will console you, I hope,
for the loss of genteel society in Baltimore.
Thank you. I shall scarcely miss any but my friends.
I go out very little.
I regret to hear that.We must try to persuade you to
change your determination, and mingle more with society.
I feel confident, that our West-End clique must satisfy the
most refined taste. We expect to have a great deal of gaiety,
this fall; but, just at present, we have a scarcity of beaux.
What has become of young Mr. Taylor; he was to have
been home by this time. Do you hear anything of him, Miss
Wyllys? inquired Miss Emmeline.
His family expect him soon, I believe.
I hope he will arrive before our summer parties are over.
Mr. and Mrs. Hazlehurst, too, and Miss Graham, when shall
we have the pleasure of seeing them?
We expect them every day.
I hope, said Mrs. Hilson, they will arrive while I am
here, which will be longer than usual, this season, for they
are painting our suit of apartments in the city. When I
came, Alonzo told Emmeline to keep me until October, and
she has promised me a round of entertainments, while I am
with her; so that I feel particularly interested in the arrival
of your friends.
Miss Graham will dash a great deal, no doubt, when she
comes back, said Miss Emmeline; I quite long to see
her. Miss Taylor must be expecting her impatiently.
By-the-bye
,
I understand, Mr. Taylor's new furniture is now all
arrived. His villa, as well as his city-house, will be very
stylish.
Mr. Taylor is a very tasty gentleman, observed Mrs.
Hilson. He seems to be very talented, in every way;
formed to figure in fashionable life, as well as in business.
His new house is a magnificent edifice.
Your father tells me, he has quite finished his own house,
Mrs. Hilson; you must be glad to get rid of the workmen,
remarked Miss Wyllys.
Yesthey have been long enough about it; but Pa has
old-fashioned notions about having everything substantial,
and well done; he said Emmeline and I might choose the
plan, and have everything as we liked; but he must have
his own time to do it in. However, it is a delightful
mansion
,
now. It has every convenience of the most fashionable
houses in the city; plate-glass, and folding-doors, and
marble
chimneys to the garret. Just such a house as I should
like in New York; though, to tell the truth, I would not
keep house for the world.
Julianna is so delightfully situated, in her
boarding-house
,
Mrs. Wyllys, that she has nothing to wish for.
Yes, we have every luxury of fashionable life, united to
a very aristocratic set of boarders; and Mrs. Stone, herself,
is an extremely fascinating lady. Indeed, I have been
spoilt; I don't think I could endure the drudgery of
house-keeping
,
now; though I once told Alonzo, if he would
give me a four-story house, up town, with a marble front, I
would try.
You must find the situation of your father's new house
pleasanter than that he has left, observed Miss Agnes.
By no means.That is a serious objection to our new
mansion. Standing surrounded by the park, on three sides,
removes us so far from the street.
I should have thought you would find it pleasant
to be removed farther from the noise and dust. What is
your cousin Charles doing? I suppose you see him often, in
town.
I really do not know what has become of him, said
Mrs. Hilson, languidly; for she always felt rather mortified
by any allusion to her unfashionable relations. Though
Charles is in the city now, studying painting, yet I never
see him. He told Mr. Hilson that he called sometimes, but
I have never seen his card; in a large boarding-house like
ours, with a family of forty or fifty people, there is often
great confusion about visits. But, Emmeline, we are making
a very unfashionable call. I am quite ashamed, Mrs.
Wyllys: but we will relieve yon nowI see our carriage
has returned. And after an exchange of curtsies, the ladies
glided out of the room. Miss Emmeline, as she passed,
touched the curly head of one of the children, exclaiming as
she did so, fascinating cherub! and then both vanished.
We have said that these two sisters were very much alike.
Mrs. Hilson, however, was the most distinguished of the
two, for she carried the family follies several degrees farther
than Miss Emmeline. Taken altogether, she was an absurd
compound. Personally, she was thoroughly American,
very pretty and delicate in form and features, and thus far
appeared to great advantage; but she had, also, an affected
mincing manner, and drawling voice. Of course, her dress
was as Parisian as possible; everything she wore was a
faithful copy from Le Courier des Dames. Her feelings
and opinions, Mrs. Hilson was proud to call English in the
extreme, for she had chosen to imbibe a great love of
aristocracy
,
and many other things which she did not in the
least understand. She had a set of common-place phrases
of this description in constant use, having borrowed them
from an intimate friend, living in the same boarding-house,
a Mrs. Bagman, an Englishwoman, of a very equivocal
position. Then, she read nothing but English novels; these
were her only source of amusement and instruction in the
way of books; and as she followed the example of Mrs.
Bagman, in rejecting every tale that had not its due share of
lords and ladies, she called herself fastidious in the
selection
.
She was a great talker, and not a day passed but what
cockney sentiments fell from her pretty little mouth, in
drawling tones, from under a fanciful Parisian coffure.
John Bull would have stared, however, if called upon to
acknowledge her as a daughter; for Yankee vulgarity and
English vulgarity are very different in characterthe first
having the most pretension, the last the most coarseness.
These ladies had scarcely driven from the door, before
Mrs. Wyllys exclaimed: Is it possible, Agnes, that these
Hubbards are a good specimen of the Longbridge people!
No, indeed; one such family is quite enough for any
place.
How ridiculous they are! How can you tolerate them?
Now, pray, Aunt Agnes, said Elinor, do not say one
word in their favour.
No; as regards the ladies of the family, one can say
little. They are not perhaps, by nature, as ridiculous as
they have made themselves. Time may do something for
them. But their father is a very worthy, respectable man;
you must have seen him at our house last summer. Don't
you remember one day two uncles of Patsey Hubbard
dining with us?
Yes, I do remember them; one Charles Hubbard called
Uncle Josey, and he seemed quite a sensible man; the other
fell asleep I know, the one they called Uncle Dozie.
The napping uncle is the old bachelor; Uncle Josie is
the father of these ladies.
He seemed a sensible man; how came he to have such
daughters?
They are very like their mother, who died a year or two
since.
They are very disagreeable, certainly. How often shall
we be required to encounter this desperate elegance? I
almost begin to repent having fixed myself at Longbridge.
And between Mrs. Bibbs, and Mrs. Tibbs, too! said
Elinor, laughing. However, for your consolation, Aunt,
I can assure you these two ladies are far from being so very
`fascinating' as the Hubbards. Mrs. Hilson and her sister
rise high above the rest of us in that respectthey are,
decidedly
,
`our Corinthian capital.'
You will find the Van Hornes, the Bernards, and several
other families, very pleasant neighbours, on farther
acquaintance
,
said Miss Agnes. You have really been unfortunate
in this specimen.
And where did these ladies contrive to pick up so much
absurdity?
With a miserable education to begin with, no other
reading than the worst novels, and the chance association of
second-rate boarding-houses, that point, I think, is easily
accounted for, said Miss Agnes.
The conversation was interrupted by the hurried return
of Mr. Wyllys, who held a newspaper in his hand.
They have arrived! cried Elinor, springing from her
chair, as she saw her grandfather enter the gate.
Good news! said Mr. Wyllys, as he joined the ladies.
The Erie is in, and our friends with her! They must
have arrived in the night, and to-morrow morning we shall
have them here.
Of course, all the family were gratified by the good news.
Elinor was quite agitated, though her aunt had the pleasure
of seeing her look very happy.
Here it is, said Mr. Wyllys, reading from the paper
the arrival of  `the Packet Ship Erie, Capt. Funck, from
Hvre, consigned to   & Co.;' that you won't care
about. But here is the list of passengers: `Mr. Johnson,
Mrs. Johnson, and a dozen Masters and Misses Johnson, from
Natchez;'strangers, you will say, but here are
acquaintances
:
`Mrs. Creighton, Mr. Francis Ellsworth, and
servant
,
of Phil.; Mr. and Mrs. Robert Hazleworth, and family,
of Phil.; Miss Graham, of Phil.; Madame Gigot, of Paris:'
wait a moment, Nelly, all in good time. `Capt. Flint, of British
Army; Achille Bureau, of Paris; T. Davis, of Charleston;
Dr. Brackett, of St. Louis;' and, though last, not least in
our estimation, `W. Hazleworth, of Phil.; with
seventy-nine
in the steerage.' Of course, for W. Hazleworth, read
H. Hazlehurst; they never spell a name right. We shall
have them all here to-morrow I hope, Nelly.
If Elinor said little, she thought and felt a great deal.
They were still talking over the arrival, when Mrs.
Wyllys's
little girl came skipping in, again, and said; Here
comes a gentleman, mamma. She was followed in an
instant, by a young man, who, in a hurried, eager manner,
had kissed the hand of Miss Agnes, and Elinor's cheek,
before either had time to exclaim Harry!
It was, in fact, Hazlehurst, still in his travelling-cap. They
had arrived in the night, he said, and the rest of the party
was to follow him the next day.
CHAPTER IX.
How taught shall I return?
Crabbe
.
Of
course, Harry was established at Wyllys-Roof. And,
after a few days passed with her parents at Longbridge,
Elinor persuaded Jane to pay her a short visit.
It is a pleasant moment, for people of mature years, when
they can sit idly by, as affectionate observers, while a gay
party of young people, in whom they are interested, are
chatting familiarly together, with the lively tone and light
spirits of youth, free alike from the restraints of childhood,
and the cares of middle age. Every varied shade of
character
,
unconsciously betrayed by the young groupthe playful
remarkthe just observationthe pleasing acquirement
an act of good-naturea graceful motionthe bright eye
and the careless smileay, even the proof of inexperience
and want of worldly wisdomall is attractive to the partial
friends. They feel such a moment to be the reward of
many a previous hour of care and anxiety; it is their happy
privilege to mark each improvement in person, mind and
heartthe fruit of past labours and prayersthe cheering
promise amid the doubts of the future. Happy they, who
can look upon the young people committed to their charge,
with the consciousness that no important duty towards them
has been neglected; happy the young person, who, with a
clear conscience and an open countenance, can meet the
approving smile of a parent; thrice happy the youth, who,
having taken a false step at the beginning of his career, has
had the courage and wisdom to turn, ere too late; that
precious
approbation of wise and true friends, may still be fully
his; he has turned from danger, temptation and shame, into
the sure and safe path that leads to everything most to be
valued, even in this world.
Vol. I.  8
As for our friends at Wyllys-Roof, the joy of re-union,
after a long absence, gave additional zest to the first pleasant
meetings of the young people, in whom Miss Agnes and Mr.
Wyllys were so warmly interested. Elinor was in gay
spiritseven Jane was more animated than usual, in her
expressions and manners. As for Harry, he was decidedly
improved; the last two years had done a great deal for him.
He was now a clever, well-educated, agreeable young man
of three-and-twenty, whose judgment and taste were much
improved by travelling.
A very good-looking fellow, too, Agnes, remarked Mr.
Wyllys.
It was easy to gather, from the natural, healthful tone of
his conversation, that in more important points, while he had
gained much, he had lost nothing by wider observation of
the world.
As for Jane, Miss Agnes had not expected much from her,
and she was pleased with the changes she observed. Her
young kinswoman's temper seemed to have become more
even than formerly, and she was quite as much pleased to
return to her family, as she ought to have been. It appeared
natural, that everybody who saw Jane should be satisfied
with looking at her. Beauty like hers disarmed their
attempts
at severity, and disposed them to indulgence. It
seemed scarcely reasonable to expect any striking quality, or
great virtue, with beauty so rare. But if the Wyllyses had
thought her beautiful before she left them, they were really
astonished to find how much it had been possible for her to
gain in appearance. Her face was now perfectly lovely, in
the finest style of beauty. Miss Wyllys was pleased to find
her manners much improved; a change from the society of
Adeline Taylor, and her lively young friends, to that of older
and better-bred people, had been of great advantage. Jane's
labours of liveliness had annoyed Miss Agnes not a little;
and more than once she had ventured a remark on the
subject
;
but her young relative had been too well advised, by
Adeline and her school-companions, to believe that Miss
Wyllys could possibly know, as well as themselves, what
were the fashionable airs and graces of the day. Since her
visit to Paris, however, Jane's manner, without her being
aware of it herself, had become much more quiet and
natural
.
During the last twelvemonth, she had not found it
necessary
to make perpetual exertions to attract, or retain
admirers. She had learned to look upon the attentions of
society as a matter of course.
The observations of Mr. Wyllys and his daughter were
not all confined to the two young travellers; they watched
the graceful movements of Elinor, and listened with interest
to the gay remarks made in her pleasant voice. She had
never been in better spirits, and was evidently happy. Elinor
was really attached to Jane; and yet, never were two girls
less alike, not only in person, but in mind and disposition.
Jane's beauty was a great charm, in Elinor's eyes. The
homeliness of her own features only increased her admiration
for those of her cousin, who had always filled, with her, the
place of a younger sister and pet, although the difference
in their ages was very trifling. If these feelings were not
returned as warmly as they deserved, Elinor had never
seemed to expect that they should be; it was not in Jane's
nature to do so. That Harry's arrival should have made her
happy, was, of course, only natural; she betrayed, at times,
a touch of embarrassment towards him, when Aunt Agnes
had smiled too openly, or Mr. Wyllys had rallied too
strongly; but it was graceful, like every shade in her
manner.
Miss Agnes was well aware that the last two years had
not been lost with Elinor, although passed in quiet every-day
life. She knew, from close observation, that the character
of her adopted child had been gradually approaching nearer
to all she wished it to be. As the two young girls sat
chatting
together, Miss Wyllys could not but mark the striking
difference in their appearance; but she also felt that if Jane's
loveliness were a charm, even to her, knowing Elinor
thoroughly
,
she loved her far more deeply for the want of
beauty. But, of course, the world would have decided
differently
.
The morning after Jane's arrival at Wyllys-Roof, the
young people were engaged in one of the gay conversations
we have alluded to, when Mr. Wyllys called off Hazlehurst's
attention.
Harry, what was that clumsy contrivance about the
French horses, you were describing to Van Horne, last night?
I wanted to ask you, at the time, but you began to talk with
Miss Patsey. You said something about a wooden collar,
I think.
Harry changed his seat, for one nearer Mr. Wyllys, and
began a long explanation of the harness used by the French
teamsters.
I have several engravings in my trunks, that will show
you my meaning, sir, better than words can do.
I should like to see them. But, are these wooden wings
to the collars, as you describe them, used throughout France,
or only in Normandy, and the neighbourhood of Paris?
We saw them wherever we went. All the carters and
farmers seem to use them. They have, besides, a great deal
of clumsy, useless ornament, and they contrive to want twice
as much tackle as we do.
The gentlemen continued to discuss the subject of horses
and harness, Harry relating, for Mr. Wyllys's amusement,
many observations he had made, on these matters, in the
different countries where he had been.
Jane had brought down, from her room, an arm-full of
pretty things, evidently Parisian. She had just given Elinor
a very pretty bag, which Miss Agnes was called upon to
admire.
My dear Aunt, cried Elinor, do look at this; Jane,
I think we must call it a
sac
`bag' sounds too heavy.
Look at the materialthe finest cachemere. And then the
colour, so rich and so delicate at the same time.
Yes; it is a very pretty shade of
ponceau
, said Jane.
And then the shape! so Parisian! And the ornaments
It is very pretty, my dear, said Miss Wyllys, after due
examination.
That is the way with everything that comes from Paris,
said Elinor; it is always so complete; not one part good
and others clumsyor good in quality, but ugly in form and
colour. The French seem to have an instinct about these
things; they throw a grace about everything.
Yes; they have a perfect taste, said Jane.
While I was up-stairs, with Louisa, yesterday, said
Elinor, we talked over Paris all the morning, Aunt Agnes.
I was amused with a great deal she told me. Louisa says,
there is a fitness in all that a French-woman does and says,
and even in everything she wearsthat her dress is always
consistentalways appropriate to the occasion.
That is true, replied Jane; their dress is always of a
piece.
And yet, Louisa insists upon it, that they do not bestow
more time and thought upon the subject, than the women of
other countriesand, certainly, not so much money.
Everything is so easy to be had, and so much cheaper,
in Paris, said Jane.
But, she remarked, that they are never ashamed to wear
a pretty thing merely because it is cheap; nor to make
themselves comfortable, by wearing thick shoes in the mud,
and a coarse, warm shawl in a fog.
We have not much mud or fog to trouble us, in this
country; said Miss Agnes.
No, aunt; but we have hard showers in summer, and
cold weather in winter; in spite of which, you know, our
ladies must always be dressed like fairies.
I have often heard Madame de Bessires praise the good
sense of her countrywomen, on those subjects, observed
Miss Wyllys.
Louisa maintains that the French-women have a great
8*
deal of common sense; she says, that is the foundation of
their good taste; and, I suppose, after all, good taste is only
good sense refined.
I suppose it is, my dear. Louisa seems to have come
back even more of a French-woman than you, Jane,
observed
Miss Agnes.
Oh! I like the French very well, Aunt Agnes.
But Louisa is quite eloquent on the subject.
She was so very fortunate, Aunt, in having so kind a
friend in Paris, as Madame de Bessires. Louisa describes
the de Bessires as living in a delightful set of peopleshe
mentioned half a dozen persons whom she met habitually
there, as not only amiable, and highly accomplished, and
well-bred, but high-principled, too. She says she used
often to wish you could know them, Aunt Agnes.
I can readily believe anything good of the intimate
friends of Madame de Bessires, for I never knew a woman
whose character was more worthy of respect. It was a
great loss to us, when she returned to France. She was
very fond of you, Elinor.
How kind in a person of Madame de Bessires' age, to
remember me! I long to see the letter she wrote me;
Robert says I shall have it, certainly, to-morrow, when all
their baggage will be at Longbridge.
Madame de Bessires often spoke of you, Elinor, said
Jane. She bid me ask if you remembered all the pet
names she used to call you, but I forgot to mention it when
I wrote.
Just as you forget many other things, naughty girl; I
must say you are anything but a model correspondent, Jenny,
dear.
Well, I can't help itI do dislike so to write!
You need not tell me that, said Elinor, laughing. But
I do remember all Madame de Bessires' kind names very
well. It was sometimes,
mon lapin, mon lapin dor, mon
chou, ma mre
they all sounded pleasantly to me, she
spoke them so kindly. But sometimes to vex me, the other
children  Master Harry among others  used to translate
them; and, though
rabbit
, and
golden rabbit
, sounded very
well in English, I did not care to be called
cabbage
.
Did you like the young people you met in Paris, Jane?
asked Miss Wyllys.
Oh, yes; the young men don't trouble you to entertain
them, and the girls are very good-natured and pleasant.
Louisa seems to think the French girls are charming
so graceful, and pleasing, and modest; really accomplished,
and well educated, too, she saysall that young women
ought to be.
Yes, she says that she hopes her little girls will be as
well educated as Madame de Bessires' grand-daughters,
said Jane.
Well, I hope my little namesake may answer her mother's
expectations. She is a sweet little puss now, at any rate.
Louisa was quite vexed yesterday, with Mrs. Van Horne,
who asked her if the French girls were not all artful, and
hypocritical. She answered her, that, on the contrary, those
she saw the most frequently, were modest, ingenuous, and
thoroughly well-principled in every way, besides being very
accomplished. She laid great stress on one point, the respect
invariably paid by the young to the old, not only among the
women, but the men, too.
Yes, observed Miss Agnes; I remember to have
heard the same remark from Madame de Bessires; she
observed, that after having been in many different countries,
she could justly claim for her own, that in no other was so
much deference paid to age as in France.
That agrees precisely with Louisa's opinion. She says
it is a striking feature in French society, and appears
thoroughly
part of their character  not at all assumed for
appearance sake.
It is a duty too little remembered in this country. It
seems to be only in our very best families that the subject is
properly attended to, said Miss Agnes.
Louisa likes the manners of the men for the same reason;
she says that in society they are always respectful and
obliging, whatever other agreeable or disagreeable qualities
they may have. She remarked, that she had never met with
a rude Frenchman in society; but she had, repeatedly, met
with rude Englishmen, in very good company.
What fault, pray, did Louisa find with the Englishmen
you met, Jane? asked Miss Agnes.
There is a certain set, who say and do rude things.
I should not have thought that, said Miss Wyllys.
Oh, they have a way of making themselves disagreeable;
now, a Frenchman never tries to be disagreeable.
One would think no one would try that, said Elinor.
The English do, though, I assure you; at least a certain
set. I don't believe any other people do. I remember one
evening, Harry was very angry with a certain Mr. Ellery,
son of a Lord Greystone, who used to come to our house
quite often last spring. Do you remember him, Harry?
she added, as Hazlehurst again approached the table covered
with French knicknacks, where the girls were sitting.
Whom were you talking about? he asked.
Mr. Ellery;do you remember his manner?
Ellery?To be sure I do!Insufferable coxcomb!
Pray, what was his great offence? asked Elinor,
laughing.
Harry coloured violently. Oh, it was his intolerable
English manner. I have known him stretch himself out
nearly full length on a sofa, on which Jane or Louisa was
sitting, and stare at them, with the most sickening expression,
for half an hour at a time.
Half an hour, Harry! how can you talk so? Half a
minute, you mean.
Well, until he drove you away, at any rate. I was
often surprised that you could endure it as long as you did.
But happily, Louisa cooled him off after a while; though I
had a strong inclination to undertake the job myself.
It was much better as it was; it was Louisa's place to
do it, observed Miss Agnes.
But I thought you liked the English, said Elinor, with
some surprise. You were speaking very highly of several
of your English friends, last night.
I do like the better sort very much. They are fine,
manly fellows, as ever breathed.
What people did you like best? asked Miss Agnes.
A man who does not cherish prejudice, must naturally
like the best qualities and the best individuals of all nations.
But have you no preference?
There cannot be a doubt, that society is more agreeable
in France, in Paris, than elsewhere.
Are not the French too artificial?
I honestly do not think them more so than the English.
English simplicity often has a very artificial twist; with the
French it is just the reverse; art becomes a second-nature,
with them.
We hear the French accused of selfishness
I think you would find both French and English more
selfish than we are. But they have different ways of
showing
it. The Englishman is exclusive, and reserved; the
Frenchman egotistical. Reserve may seem dignified; but
it often covers a great deal of cold self-love; while French
egotismnot
egosme
is often mingled with much navet
and bonhommie. Both nations, however, are more selfish
than the Italians, or Germans, I should say.
Still, you seem to like the French the best of the two.
Well, the French generally treat Americans more civilly
than the English. John Bull is very fond of giving himself
airs of superiority, after a disagreeable fashion of his own.
Now a Frenchman fancies himself so much more civilized
than the rest of the world, that he has a good-natured feeling
towards everybody but John Bull: he thinks he can afford
to be amiable and friendly.
If you are speaking of the best people in each country,
however, said Mr. Wyllys; that is not the surest way
of judging national character. We must take the average.
I am aware of that, sir.
At any rate, you don't seem to have liked this Mr. Ellery,
said Elinor.
Not in the least; I used to think him excessively
impertinent
,
exclaimed Harry, and as his choler rose, while
certain
recollections passed through his mind, he coloured again.
To change the subject, he took up the bag the young ladies
had been admiring.
What fanciful name may belong to this piece of finery;
for, of course, it is not a bag? he asked.
Oh, it is too useful, not to have a straight-forward,
common
name; you may call it a
sac
, though, if you like. I
could not think of anything more imaginative; can you,
Jane?
I dare say, there is another name; but I have forgotten
it; everything has a name of its own, in Paris.
Your table looks like a fancy-shop, Aunt Agnes,
continued
Hazlehurst; gloves, bags, purses, boxes, muslins,
portfolios, and twenty other things, jumbled together.
What sort of wood is the work-box that you chose for
Miss Patsey? asked Elinor. I am very glad you thought
of her.
Harry does not seem to have forgotten any of his friends,
while in Paris, said Miss Agnes.
Hazlehurst looked down.
It is some dark wood; not rose-wood, however. It is
rather plain; but a serviceable-looking box, he said.
Just the thing for Miss Patsey, observed Elinor.
Here, Elinor, said Jane, is the cape I spoke of; and
she unfolded a paper, and drew from it a piece of muslin
which had evidently received a very pretty shape, fine
embroidery
,
and tasteful bows of riband from some Parisian
hand. This is the one I spoke of.Is it not much prettier
than any you have seen?
Elinor received the cape from her cousin, who was
unusually
animated in its praises; it was held up to the light;
then laid on the table; the delicacy of the work was admired;
then the form, and the ribands; and, at last, Elinor threw it
over Jane's shoulders, observing, at the same time, that it was
particularly becoming to her. Harry seemed determined
not to look; and, in order to resist any inclination he may
have felt, to do so, he resolutely took up a Review, and
began turning over its pages. The young ladies'
admiration
of the cape lasted several minutes, and, at length, Elinor
called upon the rest of the party to admire how becoming it
was.
Well, really, exclaimed Harry, looking rather cross,
probably at being disturbed in his reading, young ladies'
love of finery seems quite inexhaustible; it is sometimes
incomprehensible to the duller perceptions of the male sex.
Don't be saucy! said Elinor.
Why, you can't deny the fact, that you and Jane have
been doing nothing else, all the morning, but tumble over
this Paris finery?
I beg your pardonwe have been talking quite sensibly,
too; have we not, Aunt Agnes?
Much as usual, I believe, my dear, replied Miss
Wyllys.
Pray observe, that the table contains something besides
finery; here are some very good French and Italian books;
but, I suppose, you will say, those you selected yourself.
I certainly did, said Harry; and the music, too.
Well, I have half a mind not to tell you, that we like the
books and the music quite as well as anything here, said
Elinor, colouring; and then, as if almost fearing that she
had betrayed her feelings, she continued, in a gay tone.
But, why are you so severe upon us this morning?
Unpalatable truth, I suppose, said Harry, shrugging
his shoulders.
Pray, remember, sir, that if finery be thrown away upon
the noble sex, at the present day, it was not always so. Let
me refer you to certain kings, who, not content with
studying
their own dresses, have condescended to compose those of
their queens, too. Remember how many great heroes
your Turennes and Marlboroughshave appeared in
diamonds
and satin, velvet and feathers!
But that was two hundred years ago.
They were heroes, nevertheless; and, I suppose,
une
fois caporal, toujours caporal
. But, if you prefer
something
nearer to our own time, figure to yourself Horace
Walpole
,
and General Conway, some half-century since,
consulting
,
in their correspondence, upon the particular shade
of satin best suited to their complexionswhether pea-green,
or white, were the most favourable.
Hazlehurst laughed.
There it is, in white and black! said Elinor. Just
remember Goldsmith, strutting about Temple Gardens, in
his blush-coloured satin, and fancying everybody in love
with him, too!
Quarter! quarter! Nelly, cried her grandfather,
laughing
.
True, I must confess, said Harry, smiling; but that was
more than fifty years ago. The world has grown wiser, now.
Has it?
Look at our sober coats, to-daythe last Paris fashions,
too!
Yesbut what is the reason? cried Elinor, laughing
herself. You have just found out that finery, and a showy
exterior, are of no use to youthey do not increase your
influence with the ladies! We do not value a man more
for a showy exterior!
I submit, said Harry; but he coloured, and seemed to
Miss Agnes, more embarrassed by Elinor's remark than was
necessary. He threw down his book, however, and crossed
the room to take a place near her.
What are you going to do this morning? he said,
quietly.
A walk was proposed, and soon after the young people,
accompanied by Bruno, set out together.
CHAPTER X.
Fashion, leader of a chattering train.
Cowper
.
Miss Patsey's
mother was more unwell than usual; and
after breakfast the following morning, Elinor prepared a little
basket of particularly fine peaches, which she proposed
carrying
to Mrs. Hubbard, herself. Harry offered to accompany
her, and Jane was persuaded to join them; although in
general, she disliked every kind of motion except dancing.
The travellers had already seen Miss Patsey and her
youngest sister, and they were now so fortunate as to find
Charlie at home. He had come from New York, the
evening
before, and, of course, was much pleased to see his
young friends; indeed, he showed so much emotion at the
meeting, as to change colour when he first saw the three
cousins enter the little gate.
Why, Charlie, you have grown in inches as well as in
dignity, since we parted, said Hazlehurst, shaking him
warmly by the hand.
I shall never arrive at any great elevation either way,
replied the youth, after shaking hands also with Jane.
I don't know that; you have grown half a foot since I
saw you, and you have done wonders I hear, as a painter.
Mr. Wyllys, and Elinor, are both great admirers of your
pictures.
Vol. I.  9
Wonders are comparative, you know; I believe I have
accomplished more, for instance, than my mother anticipated,
for she thought I was going to devote myself to signs and
window-blinds.
That is your account of the matter. But don't suppose
I have not learned that Mr. Charles Hubbard is looked upon
as one of our most promising young artists, and that several
of his pictures are thought the best of their kind that have
been painted this side the Atlantic.
You are very much improved in flattery by a visit to
Paris, said Charlie, smiling.
Only sober truth, as you must well know, Mr. Charles
Hubbard. I hope you have something here for us to look
at; I am really very impatient to see some of your pictures.
I wish you could have enjoyed half the fine works of art
that I have seen in the last two years.
Hubbard replied that he had strong hopes of going abroad
himself before long, thanks to the liberality of his uncle,
and the promise of several orders from different gentlemen.
Harry congratulated him warmly, though he regretted that
Charlie should think of leaving home just as he himself
returned.
The young ladies paid their visit to Mrs. Hubbard in her
bed-room, while Harry and Charlie talked over a hundred
different things together; and after engaging Charles to dine
at Wyllys-Roof, they walked home again.
Miss Patsey's parlour really looks neater and smaller
than ever, observed Harry. And I don't think I have
seen such an honest, good-natured, pleasant face as her's,
since I left Longbridge. She seems satisfied now, with the
idea of Charlie's being an artist.
She is resigned to it, rather, said Elinor, now that the
matter is entirely settled.
Charlie looks pale, observed Harry; he has grown
though, and he is no longer so very slight as he used to be.
He seems to be well, replied Elinor; but at times his
spirits are not good. He has been much interested in your
movementsquite anxious about your return.
Charlie is a right good fellow, said Harry; I was in
hopes to see a great deal of him, this winter. At this
moment Jane dropped a glove; of course Harry picked it
up, and he continued silent after doing so.
There, you see, is Mr. Taylor's new house, observed
Elinor, as an opening in a grove of young trees allowed a
full view of a house of some size, and very great pretensions.
Jane looked at the home of her friend Adeline with
interest
Harry
exclaimed, What architecture!
Don't abuse it, said Elinor, for I assure you `Mr.
Taylor's splendid mansion'  `Mr. Taylor's magnificent
seat' is very much admired.
Just as the party reached the piazza of Wyllys-Roof, Mr.
Taylor's barouche drove up to the door, and in an instant
Miss Adeline Taylor had thrown herself, and her fashionable
morning-dress, into Jane's arms.
I was so glad to find you were staying here! she
exclaimed
.
Pa and I only arrived from Saratoga last night;
I did not expect you for a month to come.
We had a very short passage for the season, said Jane,
returning the embrace quite cordially.
We seem to have taken all our friends rather by
surprise
,
Miss Taylor, said Harry.
Well, if I had been in your place, I should have staid in
Paris till the last minute;  though, I dare say,
you
were
in a hurry to get back to Longbridge, Mr. Hazlehurst; no
doubt you wanted to see
me
very much. But I wonder that
Jane did not contrive to stay there.
Harry looked a little embarrassed, and Jane, too, coloured
a little; though there seemed to be no very good reason that
either should do so.
Did you find Saratoga pleasant, this summer, Miss
Taylor? asked Elinor, drawing a chair near the bench
where the two friends were sitting, hand in hand.
Oh, delightful!Every house full, from the cellar to the
garret. How often I wished for you, Jane! if it was only
earlier in the season I would make pa take us there again,
just for the pleasure of showing off your new French
fashionsyou would be the greatest belle of the season.
We need not inquire who was the belle, said Elinor;
such important news reaches even sober, home-staying
people like us.
Oh, we had half a dozen belles  all lively, pretty
girls. There was a young gentleman, from Savannah, at
Congress Hall, who wrote some verses about us, and called
us the `Chime of Bells;' it was a sort of imitation of `Those
Evening Bells,' and was published in the Saratoga papers.
But if Jane had been there, I don't think we should have
stood much chance.
You think the poet would have rung a bob-major, for
Jane?
Certainly; with her trunks full of things from Paris,
she would have carried all before her.
I don't think Jane has brought a very large share of
finery with her, said Elinor.
No, indeed, said Harry; only five trunks and three
boxes, which I had the honour of getting through the
Custom-House
.
But part of it was for her friends, said Elinor.
You would have needed a large supply, I can tell you,
Jane, said Miss Adeline, if you had wanted to out-dash
us; for we determined this season, some half-dozen of us,
to out-do the young ladies who were there last year.
Did you succeed? said Hazlehurst.
To be sure we did. We made a firm resolve not only to
change our dress six times every day, but never to wear the
same dress twice. We drove several families away by that
manuvre; but you have no idea what fun it was to us, who
entered into the spirit of the thing. For two days, though,
we were in great trepidation. There were a couple of
Baltimore girls there, great dashers, who would not enter
into our agreement; and the spiteful things actually changed
their dress seven times, the two first days.
Seven changes! said Elinor; how did they manage
that?
Why, they came down to breakfast in a white dress;
after breakfast they would drive in another, of course; then
they would show themselves in the drawing-room, after
driving, in a pink muslin, perhaps; at dinner, they wore
another; then, after dinner, they would change again; in
the evening they wore party-dresses, of course; and after
they went up stairs, they would visit each other in what
they called dress night-wrappers. Now, wasn't it mean in
them?
Very, said Harry, laughing.
To be sure it was. Changing six times was no more
than was necessary; all we `evening bells' did, was never
to wear the same dress twice. Would you believe it, after
putting such a bold face on the matter, the third day they
disappeared suddenly! We had a good crow, I can tell
you. There was a poor little innocent there, at the same
time, from Boston, who tried to beat us on another tack, as
Lieut. Johnson said; they called her the blue-bell. Well,
she never changed her dress, morning, noon, or nightand
just to spite us. But, dear me, we only laughedwe didn't
care a fig for her; though she was very pretty, she couldn't
get a man to speak to her, excepting one old fossil professor,
who wore spectacles, and walked up and down with her on
the piazza all the time.
She was no worthy rival for the Chime of Bells! said
Harry.
Certainly not. But I can tell you, that after we had
been there a week, two of the Chime were in great danger,
and one of them no less a person than your humble servant;
the other was Anne Hunter  Jane, you remember Anne
Hunter, who was at Mrs. G's with us? Well, Anne
9*
and I were in great trouble, one day. Now, Mr.
Hazlehurst
,
I hope you can keep a secret.
A lady's secret?Can you doubt me, Miss Taylor?
Well, mind now, you never mention it; but, Anne and
I got down to our last dozen dresses, and we were pledged
to stay a week longer. This was Monday, and on Thursday
there was to be a pic-nic, given expressly to the Chime of
Bells. At first, I thought I was the only one in such a
deplorable state; but, happily, I discovered that Anne, whose
room was next to mine, was no better off. And now, how
do you suppose we managed?
Pray, what did you do? said Elinor, laughing.
To tell the truth, I sat down and cried; for I am
high-spirited
,
and I could not bear the thoughts of such a
mortification
.
But Anne is an excellent manager, you know,
Jane
Yes, I remember her.
Anne had a plan that carried all off triumphantly. She
proposed to me, to persuade the other three `evening bells,'
that to do honour to the pic-nic, we should be dressed alike,
in a sort of uniform. Well, of course, the others agreed;
but then, how to find the five dresses alike! Of course, we
couldn't wear anything made in Saratoga. The poet had
entreated us, in a sonnet, to be all dressed in white; so we
fixed upon white batiste  but, how to get them, was the
question.
I am all curiosity said Elinor.
Oh! it was beautifully done.Anne proposed we should
each write an advertisement for a trusty escort to New York,
and post it up on the curtains of the ladies' drawing-room.
What fun we had, while we were writing the advertisements!
We took an opportunity, when we and our beaux had the
drawing-room to ourselves, to vote the gentlemen out of it.
After a while, they went; but, what do you suppose the
wretches did, Mr. Hazlehurst?
Nothing ungallant, I trust.
Yes; to spite us, they crowded to the windows on the
piazza, till we dropped the blinds. Well, for a time, we
thought we were safe; but suddenly Anne Hunter shouted
out, and there comfortably seated in a tree close to the end
window, where the blind was broken, we saw one of the
young gentlemen with a note-book in his hand! We vowed
we wouldn't be defeated, so we pinned up our
pocket-handkerchiefs
together, and, fortunately, they covered the
peephole
;
and so we shut him out, at last.
Your perseverance, under such obstacles, was truly
surprising
,
Miss Taylor; said Hazlehurst.
Was it not? We soon wrote our advertisements. Mine
was very short: `Wanted, an agreeable youth, as escort
between this and New York, apply this evening, at five
o'clock.' Some were very long and ridiculous; one was in
verse. Well, after we had written them, we opened the doors
and windows, and the young gentlemen flocked in again. Then
we went in procession, and pinned them up on the curtains.
Such a time as we hadtalking and gigglingwe were in
such a gale, that, at last, some of the married ladies came
out to see what was the matter. But, the best fun of all,
was choosing our escorts; a great many offered, and then
we examined them.
I hope they had suitable qualifications for the office.
Oh, yes.I took Mr. Hunter, Anne's brother. Well,
sure enough, we all set out together, the next morning; staid
one day in the city; and, Thursday morning, we re-appeared
with the dresses. Of course, Anne and I had taken the
opportunity to get a fresh supply, besides the white batiste.
We had a most delightful pic-nic. I forgot to say, that Anne's
escort, the Marquis Foletti, was missing; she had to do
without himshe gave him up for lost, or absconded, and
we allowed her to choose another beauwhen suddenly,
just as we were mourning over the Marquis, he appeared
on the ground, and threw himself on his knees, and made
us laugh more than ever. Anne had chosen him, because
he had the handsomest moustaches at Saratoga; but he could
not speak English very well, and had got on board the
wrong boat. What times we had! Jane, I wish you had
been there!
Your faithful esquires were rewarded, no doubt, by the
gallantry of the deed itself, Miss Taylor, said Harry.
Of course; but we nevertheless gave them, besides, full
permission to say and do just what they pleased, all that day
and you can't think how much nonsense we talked. Each
gentleman took the advertisement of the lady he had escorted,
and pinned it over his heart. There were several foreigners
there, and you can't think how they enjoyed it; they had
never had such a frolic with young ladies before, and they
thought it delightful; though, to be sure, they got at last to
be rather too free; and then we had to put a stop to it.
Elinor looked at Jane, to see if she seemed to sympathize
in Adeline's story; but her cousin's beautiful face was still
bright with the glow of pleasure from meeting her friend;
no other thought or feeling was to be traced there.
I don't believe they have any such fun in Paris, Mr.
Hazlehurst.
Not exactly.  They have a pleasantry of their own,
however, which is quite agreeable.
I don't think I should like it. They say, a young lady
dares not speak to gentlemen, nor walk with them, nor have
the least bit of a flirtation. How stupid it must be!
But the French girls do talk to gentlemen, I assure you,
replied Jane, only they are not intimate with everybody.
The young men are very attentive, too; they treat young
girls with much more respect, Louisa says, than in
America
.
Who cares for respect! I want to laugh and amuse
myself, and have my own way, exclaimed Adeline.
It is growing quite warm hereyou will find it
pleasanter
in the drawing-room, Miss Taylor; said Elinor, not
caring to listen any longer to Jane's giddy friend.
Well, if you please, I'll run up to Jane s room, and look
at the fashions  I am dying to see some of her capes and
collars. By-the-bye, I had forgotten two very important
things. Here is a note for your aunt, Miss Elinor; some
private communication from Ma; the coachman will take
the answer. And then, I came over to ask you all to drink
tea with us, this evening, very sociably; nobody but your
own family and three or four friends!
The invitation was accepted, as a matter of course.
Good morning, Mr. Hazlehurst; I expect to be shut up
with Jane, for three hours to come; I have really talked
myself out of breath; but that is always the way, with me,
as you know, of old. And the two girls, hand-in-hand, ran
lightly up stairs, where Elinor, making an excuse of Mrs.
Taylor's note, left them to a confidential tte--tte.
CHAPTER XI.
A soldier may be anything, if brave;
So may a merchant if not quite a knave.
Cowper
.
Trade his delight and hope; and, if alive,
Doubt I have none, that Barnaby will thrive.
Crabbe
.
We
have really been very remiss in omitting so long to
notice the rapid strides with which Mr. Pompey Taylor had
advanced on the road to fame and fortune, during the two
years in which we have lost sight of him. He might have
addressed, to the reader, the remark that the Emperor
Napoleon
applied to his secretary, after the conquest of Prussia
and Austria: J'ai fait des progrs immenses depuis que
Bourienne m'a quitt!
It is a rule, in composition, it was so, at least, when people
wrote by rule, to compare the little with the great. If we
were to follow the direction, it would be easy to prove that
these two individuals, the conqueror, Napoleon, and the
speculator
,
Taylor, were not too widely separated for many
points of resemblance to be traced between them. Ambition
was the ruling passion of both; and both were alike
insatiable
.
Bonaparte added kingdom to kingdom; Taylor,
house to house; the emperor might believe himself equal to
ruling half the world; the merchant felt capable of owning
the other half. The one raised army after army; the other
fitted out vessel after vessel. The energies of both were
inexhaustible, and both aimed at an ever-receding goal;
while each, in his own way, soon reached a height never
dreamed of by the mothers who rocked their cradles. Nor
would it be justice to Mr. Taylor, to suppose, that the love of
money, alone, was the main-spring of his actions; he, too,
was spurred on by the love of glory; dollars and cents were
not the end, with him; he looked upon his thousands, in
gold and paper, as Napoleon did upon his thousands in flesh
and blood  they were but the instruments which were to
open the road to fame. The man of commerce, and the man
of war, were alike lavish of their treasures, when the object
of their lives was in view. If one was the boldest of
generals
,
the other was the most enterprising of merchants; and
Fortune favoured the daring of both. In short, Mr. Taylor
was no common, plodding trader, content with moderate
gains and safe investments, and fixing his hopes on
probabilities
he
pursued traffic with the passion of a gambler, united
to the close calculation of a miser; and yet, he spent freely
what he had acquired easily.
There are merchants, who, by their education, their
integrity
,
their talents and their liberality, are an honour to the
profession; but Mr. Pompey Taylor was not of the number.
We have all heard the anecdote of the young man addicted
to the sin of swearing, whose conversation, during dinner,
was taken down in short-hand, and, when read afterwards,
shocked the individual himself. Could the thoughts and
words of Mr. Taylor, during a single day, have been as fairly
registered, perhaps he himself would have been astonished
to find how very large a portion of them were given to gain
and speculation, in some shape or other. At social meetings,
whether dinners or evening parties, he seldom talked long
on any other subject: he has been known to utter the word
`stocks,' just as he entered a church, on Sunday; while a
question about certain lots was the first sentence which
passed his lips, as he crossed the threshold on his way out.
Eating his meals under his own roof; walking down
Broadway
to Wall-Street, every morning, at nine o'clock, and back
again every afternoon at three; still the echo of Mr. Taylor's
thoughts and words was `dollars,' `stocks,' and `lots'`lots,'
`stocks,' and `dollars.' He had a value for everything in
dollarshis jokes turned upon stocksand his dreams were
filled with lots. Let it not be supposed, however, that
Mr. Pompey Taylor was born with the phrenological organ
of the love of money more strongly developed than other
human beings. By no means. He was endowed by nature
with faculties and feelings as varied as other men. But,
from the time he could first walk and talk, precept and
example
had gradually turned all his faculties in one direction;
for, such had been the opinions and views of his father and
elder brothers; and there was no other impulse in his
nature or education, sufficiently strong to give a different
bent to his energies. Under other circumstances, Pompey
Taylor might have been a quick-witted lawyer, a supple
politician, a daring soldier, or, with a different moral training,
he might have been something far superior to either; but
the field of commerce was the only one that opened to him,
at his entrance into life; and it was too well adapted to the
man, such as nature and education had made him, to be
neglected
.
He found full scope, in such a sphere, for all his
energies of body and mindhe delighted in its labours and
its rewards.
Mr. Taylor had forgotten, if he had ever known the fact,
that the best pleasures of this world even, are those which
money cannot purchase, the severest wants those which it
cannot supply. He had no conception of any consideration
equal to that which riches give. Beauty unadorned was no
beauty in his eyes; and he chiefly valued talent as a means
of making good investments and wily speculations. He
looked upon Science as the hand-maiden of Commerce;
Armies and Navies existed only to defend a nation's wealth,
not its liberties, or its honour. The seat of his patriotism
was in his pocket; and the only internal improvement
in which he was interested, was that which opened new
facilities for acquiring money. It is surprising how totally
such a mind becomes unfitted to enjoy and admire any great
or noble quality in the abstract; in spite of a quick wit and
keen organs, such men become the most one-sided beings,
perhaps, in the whole human family. To moral beauty Mr.
Taylor seemed quite blind; his mental vision resembled the
physical sight of those individuals whose eyes, though
perfect
in every other respect, are incapable of receiving any
impression of an object tinged with bluethe colour of the
heavens. Even the few ideas he had upon religious subjects
partook of the character of loss and gain; the simple spirit
of true piety could never enter into a mind in the state of
his. And yet, Mr. Taylor was looked upon as a happy
man. Fortunate he certainly was, for wealth and luxury
had risen around him almost as readily as if possessed of
Aladdin's lamp. Had he been actually in possession of this
gift of the genii, he could scarcely have found a wish to
gratify, as money had already provided him with all it can
supply in this country, and the pursuit of wealth itself was
his delight. Deprived of this, Othello's occupation were
gone.
Justice to Mr. Taylor would require that we should follow
him to the counting-house, for it was there that he appeared
in the most brilliant light. His talents were undoubted; his
sagacity, his skill, and his daring were great; and his
undertakings
were generally successful. Thus far all appeared
very well; but those who looked closer into the matter would
have found that his integrity was anything but
unimpeachable
,
his love of money far surpassing his love of truth and
justice. This part of his career must be left, however, to
other hands; it is only what he was in social and domestic
life, that the merchant appears among our Longbridge friends.
The first few months after he had removed to New York,
the utmost extent of Mr. Taylor's ambitious dreams had been
the possession of a brick house in Broadway, on a lot of
ground twenty-three feet by seventy. According to the
favourite rule of New York architecture, the rule of three,
the building was to be three stories high, and three windows
wide. But the end of the first ninety days in Wall-Street,
brought an accession of several thousands, and the brilliant
promise of so many more, that this plan was enlarged several
inches each way. As every succeeding season brought an
increase of wealth and ambition, the projected dwelling
grew at last to be taller and broader by several feet, until, at
length, it had reached the limits which magnificence usually
attains on the island of Manhattan. Had Mr. Taylor built
his house in Philadelphia, or almost any other American
town, he might have laid rather a broader foundation for his
habitation; but New York houses, as a rule, are the narrowest
and the tallest in the land. Some of those three-story
dwellings, however, whatever may be their architectural
defects, contain inmates who are as much to be desired for
friends as any others in the world. But to return to Mr.
Taylor's new house; we have said that it was one of the
proud few which could boast its four stories and its four
windows. He was perfectly satisfied with the result when
finished, for his house from the garret to the cellar was a
faithful copy of one opposite to him, which had been built
some months earlier, and was pronounced the house of the
season.
Vol. I.  10
The American people may have been perfectly original
in their constitution, but in most other respects they are
particularly imitative. An observer, at a first glance, wonders
that so much cleverness should be wasted in mere imitation;
but it is, after all, the simple result of the position of the
country. An intelligent people, we are furnished by books
with more ideas than we have models on which to shape
them. In an old state of society, there is always a class
who labour after originality, and are proud to be called
eccentric; but a young nation, cut off from the rest of the
civilized world, must necessarily be imitative in its character
until it has arrived at maturity. This spirit of imitation, to
a certain extent an advantage, is, to be sure, often carried to
a laughable extent when it loses sight of common sense.
People seem to forget the fact that propriety must always be
the first step to true elegance. As a proof of it, we see
men who appear to have consulted their neighbours' tastes,
habits, and means, instead of their own, in building the
house they themselves are to inhabit; like Mr. Taylor,
without any very good reason, they imitate their opposite
neighbour. Again, it is surprising to see what time and
toil are spent in following every variation of fashion in dress,
by many women who certainly can ill afford it; we do not
mean fashion in its general outlines, but in its most trifling
details. If one could watch the progress of an idle fancy of
this nature, from the moment it springs from the caprice of
some European lgante, with more time and money than
she knows how to throw away, until it becomes a necessity
to an American housemaid, earning a dollar a weekwe
have no doubt the period would be found surprisingly short.
The habit of imitation just alluded to, is more striking
perhaps in architecture than in anything else, for in that
shape it is always before our eyes; and no place in the
country is more marked with it than New York. In no
town in the world are there as many dwellings so much
alike; and this fact is not the result of necessity, or of any
plan of architectural unityit is not that the plan first hit
upon proved to be the most rational, or best suited to the
spot and its inhabitantsbut it is chiefly the consequence of
a spirit of imitation.
To return to our story: this new house of Mr. Taylor,
this successful imitation of his opposite neighbour, had been
opened the first of May, the general moving day in New
York. It was fitted up in the richest manner, young Taylor
having received carte blanche from his father to purchase
handsome furniture in Paris. Rosewood and satin, gilt
bronzes and Svres vases, were all of the best kindand
Mr. Taylor was perfectly satisfied with the effect of his two
drawing-rooms. It was determined they should be shown
off during the following winter, by a succession of dinners
and parties. He had already tried his hand at entertaining;
after having eaten a dozen great dinners with different
commercial
notabilities, he had given one himself just before
leaving town. The affair, a man-dinner, of course, had
gone off brilliantlythanks to his beautiful porcelaine de
Svres, his candelabras and his pergnes, his English plate
and English glass; all of which showed off to great
advantage
the best of the good things abounding in the New York
market, cooked by a Frenchman, and washed down by wines
from the most famous vineyards of France, Germany, and
Spain. His entertainment was pronounced as handsome as
any given that winter in town; and Mr. Taylor determined
that it should be only the first of a long series.
His country-house rivalled his establishment in town. By
his first plan, he had intended that it should equal that of
Mr. Hubbard, at Longbridge; but eighteen months had
made a material change in his affairs, which produced
corresponding
alterations in the building. First one large wing
was added, then another; Mr. Hubbard's house had but one
Corinthian portico, Mr. Taylor's had two. He was born in
a house which had been painted only on one front, and he
was now of the opinion of the old tar, who purchased a
handsome jacket like his commanding officer, but ordered
the back as well as the front to be made of satin, and meeting
the admiral, pulled up his coat-tails to show that there was
no sham. Mr. Taylor could not outdo the plate-glass,
and mahogany doors of Mr. Hubbard's house, but he had
great satisfaction in showing him his portico on the south
front, and in proving there was no sham. When the wings
were added, they were completely surrounded on three sides
by a colonnade. Mr. Taylor having happened, just at the
moment, to make thirty thousand dollars by one successful
speculation, he sent orders to the master-builder for a double
set of columns; and as a consequence, the colonnade was so
very conspicuous that it became the pride of the
neighbourhood
.
Mr. Taylor, himself, was so much struck with the
first view, when completed, that he decided to name
the place Colonnade Manor. There is no accounting
for taste in names, we suppose, any more than in other
matters. Like No. five hundred and  Broadway,
Colonnade
Manor was furnished with rosewood and satin from
Paris.
Mrs. Taylor, good soul, entered very little into the spirit
of this magnificence. She still sat in her nursery with her
younger children as much as possible, darning all the
stockings
of the family; an occupation which Adeline thought
very ungenteel, for she never condescended to use her
needle at all. To make Mrs. Taylor a fine lady had been
one of the least successful of Mr. Taylor's efforts; she was
much too honest by nature to assume a character for which
she was so little qualified. There was but one way in which
she could succeed in interesting herself in all the parade
which gratified Mr. Taylor's taste; she found it gave
pleasure
to her husband and children, and she endeavoured to
make the best of it. She wore the fine dresses purchased
for her by Adeline, and drove out once in a while in her
handsome carriage, to pay at least a few of the many visits
urged by Mr. Taylor. Among the new acquaintances she
had made in the last ten years, there were few Mrs. Taylor
liked as well as Miss Wyllys; and Miss Agnes, in her turn,
respected all that was honest and straight-forward in the
character of her new neighbour; indeed, the whole family
at Wyllys-Roof very much preferred her to the more
pretending
husband and daughter. The note, of which Adeline
was the bearer, was an application to Miss Wyllys for
advice in some domestic difficulty. It ran as follows:
My Dear Miss Wyllys
:
You have been so kind to me, ever since we moved into
your neighbourhood, that I hope you will excuse me for
asking your assistance, this morning. I have been a good
deal plagued in my kitchen ever since we came into the
country this spring. My cook and chamber-maid, who are
sisters, are always finding some excuse for wanting to go to
the city; and last night they got a letter, or pretended to get
one from New York, saying that their father was very sick;
and as I didn't know but it might be true, I couldn't refuse
them, and they have gone for a weekthough I won't be
sure it was not for a mere frolic. As it happened, Mr.
Taylor and Adeline came back from Saratoga, last night,
and brought a house-full of company with them; an old
friend of mine whom I had not seen for years, and some new
acquaintances of Adeline's. To make matters worse, my
nurse, a faithful, good girl, who has lived with me for years,
was taken sick this morning; and John, the waiter, had a
quarrel with the coachman, and went off in a huff. You
know such things always come together. So I have now
only the coachman and his daughter, a little girl of twelve,
in the house; happily they are both willing, and can do a
little of everything. If you know of anybody that I can
find to take the place of cook, or housemaid, I shall be truly
obliged to you for giving the coachman their names and
directions.
Adeline is to have a little party this evening; she met
10*
several of our Longbridge friends on board the boat yesterday,
and took that opportunity of asking them, as she is very
anxious to make the house pleasant to her company. I dare
say she has already invited all your family, and I shall be
very sorry if you are not able to come, for we always miss
you more than any others of our neighbours.
Hoping you will excuse the trouble I give you, I remain,
dear Madam,
Very respectfully and truly yours,
Hester Taylor
.
Miss Wyllys had no sooner read the note, than, full of
sympathy for Mrs. Taylor's difficulties, she held a
consultation
with her female factotum, Elinor's nurse, or Mammy
as she was called. All the men, women, and children in
the neighbourhood, who might possibly possess some
qualifications
for the duties of cook, chamber-maid, or footman,
were run over in Miss Agnes' mind; and she succeeded at
last, by including one superannuated old woman, and another
child of ten, in making out a list of some dozen names for
her neighbour's benefit. The whole morning was spent by
the coachman, scouring the country with the Taylor barouche
and horsesfor no time was to be spent in changing harness
in pursuit of Dianthy This, and Araminty That. Mrs.
Taylor, of course, awaited his return with trembling anxiety;
the Saratoga party had gone off to fish, escorted by Mr.
Taylor and a younger daughter; Adeline having taken that
opportunity to go to see Jane, excusing herself from
accompanying
the fishing set, on account of the arrival of this
very intimate friend of hers. The mistress of the house,
after having administered a dose of medicine to the sick
nurse, and sent the little girl of twelve to make the beds and
sweep, gave one melancholy look at things in the kitchen,
and then remembered that she could no longer leave this
particular old friend of her's alone in the drawing-room.
While talking over past times, Mrs. Taylor chose a
rocking-chair
commanding a view of the approach to the house:
just at the moment when she began to fear the horses had
run away, killed the coachman, and broken the carriage,
she saw the barouche driving up the avenue, but, alas,
sans
cook! She kept her seat womanfully, and heard out the
end of a long story which the old friend was relating about
a family of relations. But at length Mrs. Taylor found that
the moment for action had come; and giving her friend the
choice of her own knitting-work, or a walk in the garden
with her youngest child, a pretty prattling little boy, she
excused
herself for a few moments, under pretext of looking
after the sick nurse. The old friend was quite a talkative
person, and one to whom a listener was very necessary; she
preferred the little boy to the knitting-work, and set out to
look at the garden.
Mrs. Taylor instantly disappeared in the direction of the
kitchen.
Well, John!
Well, marm, I couldn't pick up nobody, for love or
money.
Didn't Miss Wyllys know of any one in the
neighbourhood
?
Yes, marm, I have got a list here; but some of 'em had
got places already; there was two that was sick; one,
Araminty
Carpenter, I guess, would have suited Mrs. Taylor
very well, for, I know the young woman's father; but she
has gone over to Longbridge, to work at the Union Hotel,
for a week. There was one name written so I couldn't
make it out; and two of 'em I couldn't find; folks couldn't
tell me where they lived. There is a young thing down at
the Mill, who looks handy, but doesn't know anything of
cooking; but, I engaged her to come to-morrow, and Mrs.
Taylor can see if she suits.
Why didn't you bring her with you at once, John?
She couldn't come, no ways, till to-morrow; she was
washing; and, if she left the work, there was no one to do
it.
Let it not be supposed that Mrs. Taylor sunk under these
difficulties. The fishing-party returned; and, by means
known only to herself, the coachman, and the little girl of
twelve, a dinner, much as usual, was provided for her guests,
who were left in happy ignorance of the desertion in the
kitchen.
It must be surprising, to those unaccustomed to such
things, to observe with what courage and cheerfulness the
mistress of an American family encounters the peculiar evils
of her lotevils undreamt of by persons in the same station
in any other part of the world. Her energies seem to rise
with the obstacles that call them out; she is full of
expedients
full
of activity; and, unless fairly worn out by
exertions
for which she has not the physical strength, always
manages to keep up appearances, and provide for the comfort
of her household, until her troubles are surmounted, for the
time being, and she gathers strength, in a moment of respite,
for fresh difficulties, when they present themselves. Even
her husband and sons are seldom aware of the full extent of
her toils and vexations. Many persons are ignorant of the
number of virtues that are included, at such moments, in that
of hospitality; could a plain, unvarnished account, be made
out, of the difficulties surmounted, at some time or other, by
most American matrons, the world would wonder at their
fortitude and perseverance. Not that difficulties like those
of our friend, Mrs. Taylor, are of constant duration, but they
occur oftener than the uninitiated are aware of. Yet even
obstacles like these seem never to interfere with that constant
intercourse, from tea-parties to visits of weeks, which are
exchanged between all American families and their friends.
But then no people in the world are more truly hospitable
none are more social in their feelings, than the inhabitants
of these United States.
CHAPTER XII.
Come, come; deal justly with me; come,
Come; nay, speak!
Hamlet
.
Madam, the guests are come, supper served up, you called, my
young lady asked for, the nurse cursed in the pantry, and everything
in extremity.
Romeo and Juliet
.
Of
course, nothing interfered with the party at Colonnade
Manor. Thanks to Mrs. Taylor, the coachman and the
little
girl of twelvequite a womanly, precocious, little thing,
by-the-wayall went off very well. Some curious person,
uninitiated in similar domestic mysteries, may wish to know
how things were managed at such a trying crisis. Well, in
the first place, Mrs. Taylor congratulated herself that her
guests had been asked to `spend the evening,' and not
invited
`to tea.' This was a piece of good luck, which
diminished
her cares, and prevented the deep mortification she
must have felt had the tea and coffee been cold. The
coachman
,
of course, officiated as footman; a duty to which he
was already somewhat accustomed. The little girl of twelve
began the evening as ladies'-maid, appearing in the
dressing-room
in that capacity, helping the ladies to take off their
shawls and smooth the folds of their dresses, before they
made their entrance in the drawing-rooms. The company
soon collectedabout fifty or sixty persons, altogetherand
in party dress; each having been invited quite sociably, by
Miss Adeline. They were not at all surprised to see each
other, however, for they had often already practised the same
agreeable deception, themselves. The company once
assembled
,
the little girl of twelve rolled up her sleeves, and took
her station in the pantry, where she replenished the
cake-baskets
,
the lemonade and sangaree-glasses handed about by
her father, the coachman. A supper-table was already
spread in the dining-room; it had been very prettily
ornamented
with flowers by Adeline, and her Saratoga friends;
and a plentiful supply of fruits, ices, jellies, syllabubs, creams,
and other delicacies for a light supper, had been prepared, in
the course of the morning, by Mrs. Taylor and her
coadjutors
,
the coachman and the little girl of twelve. The
talkative
old friend had been admitted behind the scenes so far, as
to learn that the mistress of the house would be obliged to
make all the good things herself; and she had shown that,
besides telling a long story, she could make very excellent
sponge-cake; for, unfortunately, it was discovered that it
would be necessary to increase the supply of that delicacy.
Adeline did her share; while her Saratoga friends were taking
a morning siesta, with a novel in their hands, she had made
the syllabub, and prepared the fruit. These arrangements
having been made, the little girl of twelve had received
orders to station herself near at hand, where she could be
sent of errands up and down stairs. The coachman was told
to take his place by the side-table, ready to be called upon,
if necessary. Mrs. Taylor herselfalas! that we should be
obliged to reveal the fact, expected to slip out of the
drawing-room
at about half-past ten, and superintend the delicate
operation
of removing the jellies from their moulds; this would
require ten minutes to do, and she hoped to make her exit
and ingress unnoticed; a matter easily managed, in summer,
when the doors and windows are all open, and couples
arm-in-arm
,
are loitering about, in and out in all directions. This
task performed, when she had returned to the public notice,
some ten minutes after having seen everything in its place,
the coachman was expected to appear at the drawing-room
door, with composed manner, to announce that supper was
readya fact she was prepared to hear with the expression
of sublime indifference, required by etiquette. From that
moment, everything would become easy; for, of course, the
gentlemen would, as usual, take care of the ladies first, and
then help themselves. The gallant way in which these
light, standing suppers are always managed, among us, is,
by-the-bye, a pleasant and sensible arrangement; nothing
better could be devised, under the circumstances. The plan
of operations thus sketched, we may as well say, at once,
that everything succeeded to admiration.
The evening was pronounced very pleasant; and, as
several
of our friends were present, we shall follow them. There
was a great deal of talking and laughing; a reasonable
quantity of flirtation; and, once or twice, some romping in
the corner of the room where Miss Adeline happened to be
at the time. Among those who had excused themselves
from accepting the invitation, were Mr. and Mrs. Robert
Hazlehurst, who disliked the idea of going so far, and Mr.
and Mrs. Graham, the lady being detained at home by a
headach, the gentleman by a particular dislike to Mr. Taylor,
who, he thought, had behaved in an ungentlemanly manner
about a mortgage, in which they both happened to be
interested
.
Mr. Graham was a man of a violent temper, and
unsocial habits, generally taking little pains to conceal his
feelings; and accordingly, his manner to Mr. Taylor was
anything but flattering, though their acquaintance, at best,
was but trifling. Mrs. Graham also disliked the whole
family; and yet the intimacy between Jane and Adeline was
allowed to continue, as a sort of matter of course, between
school companions.
Miss Wyllys accompanied her niece to the party  she
generally made it a point to go with Elinor; for, she had
old-fashioned notions on the subject, and thought that the
presence of their elders was an advantage and a protection that
well-educated young girls have a right to expect from their
friends. She seldom spoke on the matter, however, but
contented herself with giving, what she thought, a good
example. Both Miss Agnes and Elinor were rather
surprised
to find that Jane's partiality for her giddy friend
Adeline
,
had not been in the least diminished, by her visit to
Europe. Miss Wyllys disapproved of the intimacy; but, as
Jane's mother had no objections, she herself could say
nothing
.
The two young ladies were a great deal together, in
the course of the evening, as became bosom-friends after a
long separation. Mrs. Taylor's old friend, the talkative lady,
was introduced to several of the elder portion of the company,
and was thus happily provided with listeners. Miss
Adeline's
fashionable acquaintances from Saratoga, were also
supplied, each with a couple of attendant beaux, upon whom
to try the effect of their charms. Everything thus happily
arranged, Miss Adeline proposed a `march,' which was
managed as usual. Young Van Horne, who had some
musical capabilities, was placed at the piano, and played
Washington's March, when the young people paired off in
a line, and began to walk, moving in time up and down the
two drawing-rooms, through the folding-doorseach
gentleman
,
of course, offering his arm to a lady;
chaque chacun,
avec sa chacune
. Adeline was not quite satisfied with her
cavalier, Charlie Hubbard; she did not care much about
him, at any time; and, on the present occasion, he seemed
less interested in listening to her own conversation, than in
watching the movements of some one else; who it was, she
could not say. She reproached him with this inattention.
I declare, I don't believe you hear half I say. I never
saw anybody like you.
Charlie blushed a little, rallied, and devoted himself more
exclusively to the duty of being entertained. After the
second or third turn in the march, Adeline discovered
Hazlehurst
,
who, instead of being in motion with the rest, was
leaning in a door-way. As she passed him, she snapped
her embroidered handkerchief in that direction, and
summoned
him to join the `promenade.' Harry excused
himself
by saying, he was afraid he could not find any one to
walk with him.
How can you talk so! There is Miss Wyllys, I declare;
I had not seen her before.And Adeline crossed the room
to a window where Elinor was sitting quietly as a looker-on,
having just escaped from a long conversation with the
talkative
old friend.
Now, Miss Wyllys, I am sure you must wish to
promenade
!
Would you like to walk? quietly asked Hazlehurst,
who had followed Miss Taylor.
No, indeed, said Elinor, smiling and shaking her head
good-naturedly. I have had one long walk, already, this
afternoon, and much prefer sitting still, just now.
You should follow Jane's example; you see, she is
promenading
,
and, I dare say, she took the walk with you,
too, said Adeline.
Did you ever know Jane take a long walk, when she
could help it? asked Elinor, smiling. I had really rather
sit still, Miss Taylor.
Adeline, finding that on this occasion she could not succeed
in setting all her friends in motion, which she generally
endeavoured
to do, returned to the ranks; leaving Elinor to do
as she chose. Hazlehurst took a seat by her, and made
some inquiries about several of their old acquaintances in the
room.
Don't you think those two young ladies both very pretty,
Mr. Hazlehurst, said Dr. Van Horne, approaching the spot
where Harry was standing near Elinor, after having given
up his chair to one of the Saratoga belles, when the march
was finished.
Which do you mean, sir? asked Harry.
Miss Taylor and Miss Graham, who are standing
together
near the piano.
Yes, replied Hazlehurst, Miss Taylor is even prettier
than I had supposed she would be.
She will not compare, however, with Miss Jane. To
my mind, Miss Graham answers the idea of perfect beauty.
In all your travels, did you meet with a face that you thought
more beautiful?
Vol. I.  11
I believe not, said Harry, laconically, and slowly
colouring
at the same time.
Is it Jane you were speaking of, Doctor? inquired
Elinor
,
turning towards him. Don't you think she has come
back twice as beautiful as she was last year? It is really
a pleasure to look at a face like hers.
I am afraid, it will prove rather a dangerous pleasure,
Miss Elinor, to some of the beaux, this winter.
No doubt she will be very much admired; but she takes
it all very quietly. I don't believe your great beauties as
much disposed to vanity as other people.
Perhaps not; replied the doctor, drawing near her.
A great deal depends on education. But what do the
travellers tell you about the sights they have seen, Miss
Elinor?
Oh, we have only gone as far as the first chapter of their
travels, she replied. They have not half said their say
yet.
Well, I should like to have a talk with you on the
subject
,
Mr. Hazlehurst. I was in hopes of meeting your
brother here, to-night, but he has not come, I find; I shall
have to bore you with my questions, unless you want to dance
this jig, or whatever it is, they are beginning.
Not at all, my dear sir; I shall be glad to answer any
questions of yours.
Thank you. Suppose we improve the opportunity, Miss
Elinor, and give him a sharp cross-examination; do you
think he would bear it?
I hope so, said Elinor, smiling quietly, as if she felt
very easy on the subject.
Don't trust him too far. I dare say you have not been
half severe enough upon him, said Dr. Van Horne, who
had a very high opinion of Harry. But to speak seriously,
Mr. Hazlehurst, I don't at all like a notion my son Ben has
of going to Europe.
What is your objection?
I doubt if it is at all an advantage to send most young
men to Europe. I've seen so many come back conceited,
and dissatisfied, and good-for-nothing, that I can't make up
my mind to spoil Ben by the same process. He tries very
hard to persuade me, that now-a-days, no doctor is fit to be
trusted who has not finished off in Paris; but we managed
without it thirty years ago.
You must know much more than I do on that subject,
doctor, said Hazlehurst, taking a seat on the other side of
Elinor.
Of course, I know more about the hospitals. But as I
have never been abroad myself, I don't know what effect a
sight of the Old World has on one. It seems to me it ruins
a great many young fellows.
And it improves a great many, said Hazlehurst.
I am by no means so sure of that. It improves some, I
grant you; but I think the chances are that it is an injury.
We have happened to see a great deal, lately, of two young
chaps, nephews of mine, who came home last spring. Three
years ago they went abroad, sober, sensible, well-behaved
lads enough, and now they have both come back, worse
than good-for-nothing. There was Rockwell, he used to be
a plain, straight-forward, smooth-faced fellow; and now he
has come home bristling with whiskers, and beard, and
moustaches, and a cut across the forehead, that he got in a
duel in Berlin. Worse than all, his brain is so befogged,
and mystified, that he can't see anything straight to save his
life; and yet, forsooth, my gentleman is going to set the
nation to rights with some new system of his own.
I know nothing of the German Universities, doctor,
from my own observation; but I should think it might be
a dangerous thing to send a young man there unless he
was well supplied with sound common sense of his own.
Well, there is Bill Hartley, again, who staid all the time
in Paris. He has come back a regular grumbler. If you
would believe him, there is not a single thing worth having,
from one end of the Union to the other. He is disgusted
with everything, and only last night said that our climate
wants fog! Now, I think it is much better to go plodding
on at home, than to travel for the sake of bringing back
such enlarged views as make yourself and your friends
uncomfortable
for the rest of your days.
But it is a man's own fault, my dear sir, if he brings
back more bad than good with him. The fact is, you will
generally find the good a man brings home, in proportion to
the good he took abroad.
I'm not so sure of that. I used to think Rockwell was
quite a promising young man at one time. But that is not
the question. If, after all, though it does sharpen a man's
wits, it only makes him discontented for the rest of his life,
I maintain that such a state of improvement is not to be
desired
.
If things are really better and pleasanter in Europe,
I don't want to know it. It would make me dissatisfied,
unless I was to be a renegade, and give up the country I
was born in; would you have a man do that?
Never! said Harry. I hold that it is a sort of
desertion
,
to give up the post where Providence has placed us,
unless in extreme cases; and I believe a man can live a
more useful and more honourable life there than elsewhere.
But I think travelling a very great advantage, nevertheless.
The very power of comparison, of which you complain, is
a source of great intellectual pleasure, and must be useful if
properly employed, since it helps us to reach the truth.
The doctor shook his head. I want you just to tell me
how much of this grumbling and fault-finding is conceit, and
how much is the natural consequence of travelling? Is
everything really superior in Europe to what we have here?
Everything? No; said Harry, laughing. But you
would seem to think a man dissatisfied, doctor, if he did not,
on the contrary, proclaim that everything is immeasurably
better in this country than in any other on the globe. Now,
confess, is not that your standard of patriotism?
Ah, you are shifting your ground, young gentleman.
But we shall bring you to the point presently. Now tell
us honestly, were you not disappointed with the looks of
things when you came back?
If by disappointed, you mean that many things as I see
them now, strike me as very inferior to objects of the same
description in Europe, I do not scruple to say they do.
When I landed, I said to myself,
`The streets are narrow and the buildings mean;
Did I, or fancy, leave them broad and clean?'
I feared so! and the doctor looked much as a pious
Mahometan might be supposed to do, if he were to see a
Frank seize the Grand Turk by the beard. I should have
thought better of you, he added.
My dear sir, said Harry, laughing, how could I help
it! I must defend myself from any desire to be disappointed,
I assure you. On the contrary, I wish very sincerely that
everything in my native country were as good as possible in
its way; that the architecture of the public buildings were
of the noblest kind; the private houses the most pleasant
and convenient; the streets the best paved, and best lighted
in the world. But I don't conceive that the way to bring
this about is to maintain
le pistolet  la gorge
, that perfection
has already been attained in all these particulars. To speak
frankly, it strikes me as the height of puerihity to wish to
deceive oneself upon such subjects. On the contrary, I
think it is the duty of every man, so far as he has the
opportunity
,
to aim at correct notions on everything within his
reach.
Well, remarked the doctor, you only confirm me in
my opinion. I shall be more unwilling than ever to let Ben
go; since even you, Harry Hazlehurst, who are a good deal
better than most young men, confess the harm travelling has
done you.
But, my dear sir, I confess no such thing. I'm conscious
that travelling has been a great benefit to me in many ways.
11*
I shall be a happier and better man for what I have seen, all
my life, I trust, since many of my opinions are built on a
better foundation than they were before.
If I were you, I would not let him say so, Miss Elinor.
His friends won't like to hear it; and I, for one, am very
sorry that you are not as good an American as I took you
for.
It is quite a new idea to me, doctor, said Hazlehurst,
that mental blindness and vanity are necessary parts of the
American character. We, who claim to be so enlightened!
I should be sorry to be convinced that your view is correct.
I have always believed that true patriotism consisted in
serving one's country, not in serving oneself by flattering
one's countrymen. I must give my testimony on these
subjects, when called for, as well as on any other, honestly,
and to the best of my ability.
Do you know, doctor, said Elinor, poor Harry has
had to fight several battles on this subject already. Mrs.
Bernard attacked him the other evening, because he said the
mountains in Switzerland were higher than the White
Mountains. Now we have only to look in a geography to
see that they are so.
But one don't like to hear such things, Miss Elinor.
Mrs. Bernard asked him if he had seen anything finer
than the White Mountains; what could he say? It seems
to me just as possible for a man to love his country, and see
faults in it, as it does for him to love his wife and children,
without believing them to be the most perfect specimens of
the human family, in body and mind, that ever existed. You
will allow that a man may be a very good and kind husband
and father, without maintaining everywhere that his wife
and daughters surpass all their sex, in every possible
particular
?
You will not, surely, deny, doctor, said Hazlehurst,
that it is reasonable to suppose that Europe possesses some
advantages of an advanced state of civilization, that we have
not yet attained to? We have done much for a young
people, but we have the means of doing much more; and it
will be our own fault if we don't improve.
We shall improve, I dare say.
Do you expect us to go beyond perfection, then?'
I can't see the use of talking about disagreeable subjects.
But even the most disagreeable truths have their uses.
That may be; and yet I believe you would have been
happier if you had staid at home. While he was away
from you, Miss Elinor, I am afraid he learned some of those
disagreeable truths which it would have been better for him
not to have discovered.
Harry stooped to pick up a glove, and remained silent for
a moment.
Shortly after, supper was announced; and, although the
coachman was not quite as much at home in the pantry as
in the stable, yet everything was very successfully managed.
It is really mortifying to hear a man like Dr. Van Horne,
fancy it patriotic to foster conceited ignorance and childish
vanity, on all national subjects, exclaimed Harry, as he
took his seat in the carriage, after handing the ladies in.
And that is not the worst of it; for, of course, if respectable,
independent men talk in that tone, there will be no end to
the fulsome, nauseating, vulgar flatteries that will be poured
upon us by those whose interest it is to flatter!
I heard part of your conversation, and, I must confess,
the doctor did not show his usual good sense, observed
Miss Agnes.
You are really quite indignant against the doctor, said
Elinor.
Not only against him, but against all who are willing,
like him, to encourage such a miserable perversion of truth.
Believe them, and you make patriotism anything, and
everything
,
but a virtue.
CHAPTER XIII.
Why, how now, count? Wherefore are you so sad?
Shakspeare
.
Well
, Jenny, you are going to leave us to-day, it seems.
said Mr. Wyllys, the next morning, at breakfast. I am
sorry for it; but, I suppose your mother has a better right to
you than we have.
I promised mamma I would not stay after to-day, sir.
Aunt Agnes is to carry me over to Longbridge, before
dinner
.
You must come back again, as often as you can, child.
It always seems to me, that Harry and you belong here, as
much as you do anywhere else. How long do you suppose
your mother will stay at Longbridge?
We are going to New York next week. Father wishes
to be in Charleston early in October.
I can't bear to think of your going so soon. If you are
once in Carolina, I suppose, we shan't see you again until
next June; but, mind, you are to pass all next summer
with us, said Elinor.
That is to say, Nelly, if she has no more important
engagement
,
added Mr. Wyllys, smiling.
Even a very important engagement need not interfere,
said Miss Agnes. We shall be very happy, Jane, to see
any Charleston friend you may see fit to bring with you.
I don't think there is the least danger that any
Charleston
friend will come with me; said Jane, blushing a little.
Have you selected a friend from some other place,
Jenny? asked her uncle.
Oh, no, sir! was the answer; but her colour continued
to rise, and she appeared a little uneasy. As for Harry, he
had taken no part in the conversation, but seemed very busy
with his knife and fork.
Pray remember, Jane, said Elinor, I am to have
timely notice of a wedding, in my capacity of bridesmaid.
Who knows, Nelly, but you may call upon Jane first.
You have fixed upon your friend, I take it; eh, Harry?
I hope so; Hazlehurst replied, in a low voice, and he
drank off a cup of hot coffee with such rapidity, that Miss
Wyllys looked at him with astonishment.
Elinor made no answer, for she was already at the other
end of the room, talking gaily to her birds.
As Harry rose from table and walked into the next room,
he tried to feel very glad that Jane was to leave them that
day; he sat down, and took up a paper; but, instead of
reading it, silently followed a train of thought by no means
agreeable.
In the course of the morning, according to the
arrangement
which had been made, Harry drove the ladies to
Longbridge
.
He thought he had never passed a more unpleasant
morning in his life. He felt relieved when Elinor, instead
of taking a seat with him, chose one inside, with her Aunt
and Jane; though his heart smote him whenever her sweet,
cheerful voice fell upon his ear. He tried to believe,
however
,
that it was in spite of himself he had been captivated
by Jane's beauty. Was he not, at that very moment,
carrying
her, at full speed, towards her father's, and doing his
best to hope that they should meet but once or twice again,
for months to come? Under such circumstances, was not a
man in love to be pitied? For some weeks, Hazlehurst had
not been able to conceal from himself, that if he occupied the
position of the lover of Elinor, he felt like the lover of Jane.
As he drove on, in moody silence, the party in the carriage
at length remarked, that he had not joined in their
conversation
at all.
Harry does not talk so much as he used to; observed
Miss Wyllys; don't you think he has grown silent, Jane?'
Perhaps he has, she replied; but it never struck me,
before.
Do you hear, Harry? said Elinor: Aunt Agnes
thinks the air of Paris has made you silent. It ought surely
to have had a very different effect.
This detestable road requires all a man's attention to
keep out of the ruts; he replied. I wish we had gone
the other way.
If Aunt Agnes has no objection, we can come back by
the river road, said Elinor. But your coachmanship is
so good, you have carried us along very smoothly; if the
road is bad, we have not felt it.
Harry muttered something about holes and ruts, which
was not heard very distinctly.
Out of humour, too; very unusual! thought Miss
Agnes
.
There was a something unnatural in his manner,
which began to give her a little uneasiness; for she saw no
good way of accounting for it.
The ladies were driven to the door of the Bellevue Hotel,
where the Grahams had rooms. They found several visiters
with Mrs. Graham, among whom, the most conspicuous, and
the least agreeable, were Mrs. Hilson and her sister, both
redolent of Broadway, elegant and fashionable in the
extreme
;
looking, it is true, very pretty, but talking, as usual,
very absurdly.
Mrs. Graham had scarcely kissed her daughter, before
Mrs. Hilson gave Elinor an important piece of information.
I am so delighted, Miss Wyllys, to hear this good
news
My cousins' return, do you mean? Did you not know
they had arrived?
Oh, yes; we heard that, of course, last week; but I
allude to this morning's good news, which I have just heard
from this fascinating little creature; added the lady,
catching
one of Mrs. Graham's younger children, as it slipped
past her.
Elinor looked surprised, when Mrs. Hilson condescended
to explain.
Mrs. Graham is to pass the winter in New York, I hear.
Indeed! exclaimed Elinor, turning with joyful
eagerness
towards Mrs. Graham. Are you really going to stay
so near us?
Mrs. Graham was thus obliged to inform her friends of
the change in her plans; she would, of course, have
preferred
waiting until alone with Miss Agnes and Elinor, to do
so; but, Mrs. Hilson's officiousness obliged her to say
something
immediately. One of her children, a little boy, had
been suffering with some disease of the spine, during the
last year, and a consultation of physicians, held the day
before, in New York, had decided that a sea-voyage, or a
long journey, was more than the poor little fellow could bear,
in the present state of his health, as he had been much worse,
during the last three months, since the Grahams had been
at Longbridge. It was therefore settled that Mrs. Graham,
Jane, and the younger children, were to remain in New York,
while the boy was under the care of Dr. S, in whom his
parents had great confidence. Mr. Graham and his oldest
boy were to pass part of the winter on their plantation, and
then return to his family.
Miss Wyllys and Elinor, though regretting the cause, were,
of course, much pleased with this arrangement; Jane, too,
appeared perfectly satisfied.
I should not be surprised, Miss Graham, continued Mrs.
Hilson, if some of your New York admirers had bribed
Dr. S I'm sure, we are very much obliged to him
for having detained you. I hope you will be somewhere
near us, in the city. Emmeline is to pass part of the winter
with me; and, I dare say, you will be very intimate. I wish,
Mrs. Graham we could persuade you to come to our
boarding-house
.
Mrs. Stone is really a fascinating lady, herself;
and she always manages to have a charming clique at her
house.Quite exclusive, I assure you.
I hope to find more private lodgingsI have too many
little people for a boarding-house.
Not at all. Mrs. Stone could give you an excellent
nursery
.
She has several lovely little darlings, herself. Her
little Algernon would make a very good beau for your
youngest little Miss. What do you say, my dear, catching
the child again; won't you set your cap for Algernon?
The little girl opened her large, dark eyes without
answering
.
Mrs. Hilson, and her sister now rose to take leave of
Mrs. Graham, repeating, however, before they went, the
invitation they had already given, to a ball for the next week.
It was to be a house-warming, and a grand affair. The
ladies then flitted away on tip-toe.
The door had scarcely closed behind them, before Mrs.
George Wyllys, who had been sitting as far from them as
possible, began to exclaim upon the absurdity of the whole
Hubbard family.
They are really intolerable, Agnes; she said to her
sister-in-law. They attack me upon all occasions. They
brought Mrs. Bibbs and Mrs. Tibbs to see me, and joined me
in the street, yesterday: they are almost enough to drive me
away from Longbridge. I can't imagine what makes them
so attentive to meplain, sober body, as I amwhat can
they aim at?
They aim at universal fascination, I suppose; said
Elinor, laughing.
And must we really go to this house-warming? asked
Mrs. Wyllys.
Elinor and I have already accepted the invitation; said
Miss Agnes. My father wished us to go, for he really has a
great respect for Mr. Hubbard.
Well, I can't say that the gentlemen strike me as so
much superior to the ladies of the family. `Uncle Josie'
seems to admire his daughter's nonsense; and `Uncle
Dozie'
never opens his lips.
There is not a shade of fascination about them,
however
,
said Elinor.
I grant you that, said Mrs. Wyllys, smiling. I shall
decline the invitation, though, I think.
That you can do very easily; said Miss Agnes.
The ladies then followed Mrs. Graham to an adjoining
room, to see the little invalid, and talk over the new
arrangement
for the winter.
It was fortunate for Harry, that they had left the
drawing-room
before he entered it; for he no sooner appeared at the
door, than the same little chatter-box, who had betrayed the
change in her mother's plans to Mrs. Hilson, ran up to him
to tell the great news that they were not going back to
Charleston, but were to stay in New York all winter, `
mamma
,
and Jane, and all of them, except papa and Edward.'
The varying expression of surprise, pleasure, and distress,
that passed over Hazlehurst's face, as he received the
intelligence
,
would have astonished and perplexed Miss Agnes,
had she seen it. He had depended upon Jane's absence to
lighten the course which he felt it was his duty to pursue;
and now she was to be in New York! Of course, she
would be half her time with Elinor, as usual. And, if he
had already found it so difficult, since they had all been
together
,
to conceal the true state of his feelings, how should
he succeed in persevering in the same task for months?
He determined, at least, to leave Longbridge, for a time,
and remain in Philadelphia, until the Grahams were settled
in New York.
The same evening, as the family at Wyllys-Roof, and
himself, were sitting together, he announced his intention.
Can I do anything for you, in Philadelphia, Elinor? he
asked; I shall have to go to town, to-morrow, and may be
detained a week or ten days.
Are you really going to town?I did not know you were
thinking of it. I wish I had known it this morning, for I
am very much in want of worsteds for the chair-pattern Jane
brought me; but, unfortunately, I left it at Aunt Wyllys's
Did you say you were going to-morrow?
Yes, I must be off in the morning.
Then I must give up my pattern, for the present.
Is there nothing else I can do for you?
Vol. I.  12
Nothing, thank youunless you bring some new books;
which, we will leave to your taste, to choose.
Is not this rather a sudden move, Harry? said Mr.
Wyllys, who had just finished a game of chess with Miss
Agnes. I haven't heard you mention it before?
I intended to put it off, sir; but, on thinking the matter
over, I find I had better go at once.
I wish you would look about you a little, for lodgings
for us; it is time we secured them. I suppose, you will
want us to go to town early, this winter, Nelly, won't you?
It will not do for Master Harry to be wasting half his time
here, after he has once taken seriously to law; you know he
will have two mistresses to wait upon, this winter.
It is to be hoped they will not interfere with each other,
said Miss Agnes, smiling.
That is what they generally do, my dear. By-the-bye,
Nelly, I suppose Louisa will have Jane in Philadelphia, with
her, part of the winter.
Yes, sir, after Christmas; it is already settled, much to
my joy.
So much the better! said her grandfather.
So much the worse! thought Hazlehurst.
Your Paris party will be all together again, Harry?
continued Mr. Wyllys.
Yes, sir; was Hazlehurst's laconic reply. `I wish I
could forget it,' thought he. So much had he been annoyed,
throughout the day, that he soon after took up a candle, and,
wishing the family good-night, went to his own room.
I am afraid Harry is not well, said Miss Wyllys, after
he had left them. He seems out of spirits.
Elinor looked up from her work.
Now you speak of it, replied Mr. Wyllys, I think he
does seem rather out of sorts.
Nothing more was said on the subject; but some
unpleasant
thoughts suggested themselves to Miss Wyllys; for,
during the last day or two, Hazlehurst's manner had
repeatedly
struck her as unnatural, and she feared that something
weighed upon his mind. As for Elinor, her nature was as
far as possible from being suspicious; and, least of all,
would she have mistrusted Harry; she merely reproached
herself for having laughed once or twice, during the day, at
his expense, when he had been very absent. She
remembered
he seemed a little annoyed, at the time, though he
never used to mind such things`I am afraid he thought it
unkind, if he was not well,' she said to herself, and
determined
to make amends, the next morning, by presiding at
his early breakfast, before he set out.
CHAPTER XIV.
What loud uproar, bursts from that door?
Coleridge
.
We
shall follow the example of the good people of
Longbridge
,
its party-going inhabitants, at least, and discard, for
the moment, all other topics, in order to give due justice to
the expected ball at the Hubbards. It was understood that
this house-warming was to be the most brilliant affair, of its
kind, that had taken place, in the neighbourhood, within the
memory of man. Mrs. Hilson and Miss Emmeline Hubbard
had staked their reputations, for elegance and fashion, upon
the occasion. The list of invitations was larger than any yet
issued at Longbridge, and all the preparations were on a
proportionate scale of grandeur.
About ten days before the eventful evening, Mrs. Hilson
and Miss Emmeline were closeted with their intimate friends,
Mrs. Bibbs and Mrs. Tibbs, engaged in drawing up a plan
of operations for the occasion. Probably the `city-lady,' as
Mrs. Hilson always called herself, had invited the two friends
as counsellors, more with a view of astonishing them by a
display of her own views of magnificence, than from any
idea that their suggestions would be of importance.
Miss Emmeline was seated, pencil in hand, with several
sheets of paper before her, all ready, to take notes of the
directions as they were settled. Mrs. Bibbs and Mrs. Tibbs
were placed on a sofa; and Mrs. Hilson threw herself into
a rocking-chair.
In the first place, Emmeline, said the `city-lady,' we
must have boned turkey: put down boned turkey.
I thought you were going to make out the list of
invitations
first, said the sister.
Just put down the boned turkey, for that is absolutely
necessary; and then we can run over the names.
Miss Emmeline wrote as she was directed. A long list
of names was then put down; there had already been a
private family meeting upon the subject, at which, after many
endeavours of Mrs. Hilson to unite the two advantages of
extreme exclusiveism, and the largest number of invitations
ever heard of at Longbridge, Mr. Hubbard had decided the
matter by insisting that his daughters should ask every person
who had ever been a guest at their house before, and all
those from whom they themselves had accepted invitations.
Don't talk to me of fashionable people, and exclusives
and inclusivesI choose to have all my old neighbours, do
you hear, girls, and any one else you please.
This was the only point upon which their father insisted;
and as he left the expense of the arrangements entirely to
themselves, the ladies thought it most prudent not to argue
the matter. Instead, therefore, of aiming at having their
party very select, it was now agreed that it should be very
general.
It will be a regular mob, said Mrs. Hilson, as she
finished reading to her sister scraps of lists of which her lap
was full; but with so large a visiting circle as ours, it was
not to be avoided, I suppose. Have you put down the boned
turkey, Emmeline? that at least will give to the
entertainment
an aristocratic character, at once.
Yes, to be sure, here it is, said Emmeline, taking up
another sheet of paper. We must have boned turkey, of
course.
Now it so happened that neither Mrs. Bibbs nor Mrs.
Tibbs, though such fascinating ladies, had ever seen, tasted,
or heard of boned turkey before. But, of course, they did
not confess such shameful ignorance. Boned turkey had
never yet figured at a party at Longbridge. We say figured
at a party, and we speak advisedly, as all must know who
are aware of the all-important position occupied at an
American
party by the refreshments, in the opinion of both host
and guests. The brilliancy of the lights, the excellence of
the music, the wit and gallantry of the gentlemen, the grace
and beauty of the ladieswould be of no avail in giving
fame to a party if the refreshments were not as abundant,
and as varied as possible. It is true these good things are
generally excellent in their way, which is probably one
reason why they receive so much attention. The highest
distinction to be attained in these matters is the introduction
of some new delicacy; next to this, is the honour of being
one of the first to follow so brilliant an example; but, of
course, those unfortunate individuals who have neglected to
procure the favourite dainty of the season, after it has once
appeared on fashionable tables, lose all claim to honourable
mention, and sink beneath notice. In this way, each dish
has its day; a year or two since,
Charlotte Russe
was
indispensable
at an entertainment; last winter
Bombes
were in
high request; and at the period of the Hubbard
house-warming
,
Boned Turkey
had received the place of honour
on the New York supper-tables. People could neither flirt
nor dance, they could talk neither pure nonsense, nor pure
speculation, without the Boned Turkey in perspective. The
fashion had indeed spread so far, that it had at last reached
what Mrs. Hilson generally called her
clique
.
12*
Pa thinks we shall have some difficulty in getting boned
turkey at this season; it is rather early; but I am determined
to have it if money can procure it. You know I am very
ambitious, Mrs. TibbsI am not easily satisfied.
Mrs. Tibbs, a pretty little woman with light hair, wearing
a fashionable lilac muslin, assented, of course.
Taking for granted then, that we have the boned turkey,
what shall we put down next? asked Miss Emmeline.
Terrapin-soup, pickled-oysters, lobsters, chicken-salad, and
anything in the way of game that can be found in the
market; do you think that will do for the substantial dishes,
Mrs. Bibbs?
Mrs. Bibbs, a pretty little woman with black hair, wearing
a fashionable green muslin, assented, of course.
I think that will do, Emmeline, said Mrs. Hilson; a
large supply of each, you know. By-the-bye we must have
four dishes of boned turkey; nothing so mean as to have a
small quantity.
Then followed a long list of lighter delicacies; gallons of
ice-cream with every possible variety of flavour; flour and
eggs, cream and sugar, prepared in every way known to
New York confectioners. Kisses and Mottoes were insisted
upon. Then came the fruits, beginning with peaches and
grapes, and concluding with bananas and other tropical
productions
,
until at length even Mrs. Hilson's ambition was
thus far satisfied.
I think our set-out will have quite an aristocratic
appearance
,
Emmeline; including, of course, the boned turkey.
Then we must have coloured candles, they are so much more
tastyall green and pink. Alonzo will secure the orchestra,
the best in the city; 's band. We must have two
dressing-rooms in the third story, one for the gentlemen, one
for the ladiesand a little fainting-room besides; the small
east room will do for thatwe can put in it the easy-chair,
with the white batiste cover I brought over from the city,
with a pitcher of iced-water, and restoratives, all ready. It
is always best, Mrs. Bibbs, to have a pretty little
fainting-room
prepared beforehandit makes the thing more
complete
.
The lady in the green muslin agreed entirely with Mrs.
Hilson; she though it would be unpardonable not to have
a fainting-room.
The third story will be reserved for the dressing-rooms,
the second entirely devoted to the supper and refreshments,
and the first floor given up to the dancers and promenaders.
I declare I shan't know how to look if we can't procure the
boned turkey.
The lady in the lilac muslin agreed that when everything
else was so genteel, it would be unfortunate indeed to fail in
the boned turkey.
The disposition of the furniture, the variety of lemonades,
&c., was then settled, as well as other minor matters, when
the four ladies sat down to write the invitations on the very
elegant and fanciful note-paper prepared for the occasion.
The first thing
I
shall do, Emmeline, will be to write a
letter expressly to Alonzo, to insist upon the confectioner's
procuring the boned turkey.
We shall pass over the labours of the ensuing week,
devoted to the execution of what had been planned. Various
were the rumours floating about Longbridge in the interval;
it was asserted by some persons that a steamboat was to bring
to Longbridge all the fashionable people in New York; that
it was to be a sort of Mass-Meeting of the Aristocracy.
By others, all the fiddlers in New York and Philadelphia
were said to be engaged. In fact, however, nothing was
really known about the matter. Mrs. Bibbs and Mrs. Tibbs
had confided all the details to a score of friends only, and
every one of these had, as usual, spread abroad a different
version of the story. We have it, however, on the best
authority, that every day that week a letter in Mrs. Hilson's
handwriting, directed to the most fashionable cook and
confectioner
in New York, passed through the Longbridge
post-office
,
and we happen to know that they were all written
upon the negotiation for the boned turkey, which at that
season it was not easy to procure in perfection.
The eventful evening arrived at length. The fanciful
note-papers had all reached their destination, the pink and
green candles were lighted, the fainting-room was prepared,
the kisses and mottoes had arrived, and though last, surely
not least, four dishes of boned turkey were already on the
supper-table. Mrs. Bibbs and Mrs. Tibbs had gone the
rounds with the two ladies of the house, and admired
everything
,
after which they returned to the drawing-room. Mrs.
Bibbs in blue, and Mrs. Tibbs in pink, were placed in full
array on a sofa. Mrs. Hilson and Miss Emmeline stationed
themselves in a curtseying position, awaiting their guests.
Mr. and Mrs. Clapp, with Miss Patsey and Charlie, were
the first to arrive. Our friend, Patsey, looked pleasant,
good-natured, and neatly dressed, as usual; the silk she
wore was indeed the handsomest thing of the kind she had
ever ownedit was a present from Uncle Josie, who had
insisted upon her coming to his house-warming. Patsey's
toilette, however, though so much more elegant than usual,
looked like plainness and simplicity itself, compared with the
gauzes and flowers, the laces and ribbons of Mrs. Tibbs and
Mrs. Bibbs, who were sitting on the sofa beside her.
Presently, a thin, dark, sober-looking young man walked
in at a side-door; it was Alonzo, Mrs. Hilson's husband.
Honest, warm-hearted Mr. Hubbard soon followed, looking
as usual, in a very good humour, and much pleased with
the holiday he had provided for his daughters, and the
satisfaction
of seeing all his old friends in his new house, which
he had prepared for himself. If ever there was a man who
spoilt his children, it was Mr. Joseph Hubbard. Had he had
sons, it might possibly have been different; but his wife had been
a very silly, very pretty, very frivolous woman; the daughters
resembled her in every respect, and Mr. Hubbard seemed to
have adopted the opinion that women were never otherwise
than silly and frivolous. He loved his daughters, laughed
at their nonsense, was indulgent to their folly, and let them
do precisely as they pleased; which, as he had made a
fortune, it was in his power to do. As for Uncle Dozie, the
bacheler brother, who had lived all his life with Mr. Joseph
Hubbard, he was already in the drawing-room, seated in a
corner, with folded arms, taking a nap. It was singular
what a talent for napping this old gentleman possessed; he
had been known to doze over a new book, pronounced by
the papers thrillingly interesting, and intensely exciting;
he has slept during a political speech, reported as one
continued
stream of enchaining eloquence, delivered amid
thunders of applause; and now, under the blaze of astral
lamps, and pink and green candles, while the musicians
were tuning their fiddles, and producing all sorts of discordant
sounds, he was dozing as quietly as if in his own rocking-chair.
Uncle Dozie seldom talked when he could help it; the chief
business and pleasure of his life consisted in superintending
his brother's vegetable-garden; he had never been known
to take a nap among his beets and cabbages, which he
seemed to admire as much as he did his nieces. The
vegetables
,
indeed, engrossed so much of his care and attention,
that three times in the course of his life, he had lost by
carelessness
a comfortable little independence which his brother
had made for him.
The company began to pour in. Mrs. Taylor and the
talkative old friend were among the earliest, and took their
seats on the sofa, near Miss Patsey, Mrs. Bibbs, and Mrs.
Tibbs. Adeline, with the Saratoga fashionables, soon
followed
;
having remained longer in the dressing-room, in
order to wait until each could appear with a beau to lean on.
The Longbridge lite arrived in large numbers; Uncle
Dozie woke up, and Uncle Josie shook hands as his friends
wished him many happy years in his new house. Miss
Emmeline and Mrs. Hilson flitted hither and thither; while
the dark and sober-looking Alonzo occasionally bent his
head gently on one side, to receive some private
communications
and directions from his more elegant moiety. No
one was received by the ladies of the house with more
fascinating
smiles, than a tall, slim Englishman, with a very
bushy head of hair, who had made Mrs. Hilson's
acquaintance
at their boarding-house not long since, and being tired
of occupying a third or fourth-rate position in his own
country, was now determined to show off what he thought
airs of the first water, in this. He was just the attendant in
whom Mrs. Hilson gloried.
I think the West-End is fully represented here, this
evening, Emmeline, said the fair lady as she tripped past
her sister, followed by Captain Kockney, after the rooms
were uncomfortably full.
Some very pretty women 'ere, Mrs. 'Ilson, observed
Captain Kockney; that's really a lovely creature just
come in, and what a piece of ugliness it is alongside of her.
Miss Graham? Yes, she is our great beauty. Shall I
introduce you?
Not now, for pity's sake; wait till that ugly face has
moved out of sight.
Do you think Miss Wyllys so very ugly? Perhaps she
is; but she is one of our country neighbours, and I have
seen her so frequently that I am accustomed to her
appearence
indeed
we are quite intimate. When one knows her,
her conversation is excessively delightful; though she wants
more association with city-life to appear to advantage.
Now, pray don't introduce me there, I beg. I saw too
many ugly women the last season I was at 'ome. Our
colonel had three daughters, 'orrid frights, but of course we
had to do the civil by them. It almost tempted me to sell
out; they were parvenues, toothat made the matter worse,
you know.
Oh, yes, I hate parvenoos; I am thoroughly aristocratic
in my nature. Indeed, it is a great misfortune for me that I
am so, one is obliged, in this country, to come so often in
contact with plebeians! I am afraid you must suffer from
the same cause, while travelling in the United States.
What, from the plebeians? Oh, I made up my mind to
that before I came, you know; I believe I shall enjoy the
change for a time. One doesn't expect anything else from
you Yankees; and then I had a surfeit of aristocracy in
London, the last season. We had half-a-dozen crowned
heads there; and first one met them everywhere in town,
you know, and then at every country-house.
How delightful it must be to live surrounded by royalty
in that way!
There you're quite out. It's a great bore; one has to
mind their p's and q's at court, you knowI never go to
Windsor if I can help it.
Well, I should never tire of a courtI am thoroughly
patrician in my disposition. I have a good right to such
tastes, Captain Kockney, for I have a great deal of noble
blood in my veins.
Now, really! what family do you belong to?
The duke of Percy; a noble family of Scotland. Pa's
name is Joseph P. Hubbard. Don't you pity people who
have no nobility in their families?
'Pon my soul, I don't know how a man feels under such
circumstances. It's a queer sensation, I dare say.
Dr. Van Horne, continued Mrs. Hilson, to a young
man who came up to make his bow to her, I have a great
mind to ask a favour of you. Will you undertake to bleed
me?
I should be sorry if you required my services in that
way, Mrs. Hilson.
Ah, but it would be a real obligation; I want to get rid
of all but my Percy blood. Perhaps you don't know that
our family is distinguished by its descent?
From `old Mother Hubbard,' thought young Van
Horne; but he merely bowed.
Yes, our ancestors were dukes of Percy, who were
beheaded in Scotland for being faithful to their king. It is
very possible we might claim the title of a Scotch Peer.
Mrs. Hilson had read too many English novels, not to have
a supply of such phrases at command. If you could only
find the right vein, I would insist upon your taking away all
but my patrician blood.
Would not the operation leave you too perfect, Mrs.
Hilson?
Perhaps it might make me vain. But it could scarcely
unfit me more for living in a republic. How I wish we
were governed by a despot!don't you?
Not in the least,`but I wish you were,' the young
man added, to himself, as he moved away towards Jane and
Elinor, who were in a corner talking to his sisters. All
the fools in this country are not travelled fools, as I wish my
father would remember, he continued, as he edged his way
through the crowd.
And he that aye has lived free
May not well know the misery,
The wrath, the strife, the hate, and all,
That's compassed in the name of thrall.
You have mustered quite a pretty set of little plebeians
'ere to-night. Now, that's quite a nice-looking little creature
standing by the door, continued Captain Kockney; what
do you call her?
Her name is TaylorAdeline Taylor; they belong to
the aristocracy too; shall I introduce you?
Is she married? If she is, I've no objections; but if she
isn't, I had rather not. It's such a bore, you know, talking
to girlsbread-and-butter misses!
How ungallant you are!
Ungallant! Why? I suppose you know it's a settled
thing that none of
us
talk to girls in society. Most of them
are so milk-and-water, and the rest are so deep, they're
always fancying a man means something. Why, last spring
we cut Lord Adolphus Fitz Flummery, of
ours
, just because
he made a fool of himself, dangling after the girls.
But don't gentlemen ever speak to an unmarried lady
in England?
The saps dobut not your knowing ones. We make
an exception though, in favour of a regular beauty, such as
that little girl on the other side of the room; that Thomson
girl, didn't you call her.?
Miss Grahamyou are difficult to please if nothing else
will suit you. But of course it is natural for aristocratic
minds to be fastidious.
To be sure it is, that's what makes us English aristocrats
so exclusive. If that little Graham girl comes in our way
though, I've no objection to making her acquaintance. And
if you have got a great fortune 'ere to-night, I'll make an
exception for heryou may introduce me. Is there such a
thing as an heiress in the room?
An heiress? No, I believe not  but Miss Taylor is
quite a fortune.
Is she? Well then, you may introduce me there too.
We have to do the civil to the rich girls, you know; because
after a while most of us are driven into matrimony. That's
the governor, I take it, near the door.
The governor? Oh, no, our governor does not live at
Longbridge.
Doesn't he? Well, I thought you introduced him just
now as the governor, and I fancied some one called him
'Ubbard; that's the governor's name, isn't it?
No, indeed. That's Pa you are speaking of.
Just sothat is what I said. You call your paternities
Pa
, do you?we always call the old fellows governors, in
England.
Do you call your father Gov. Kockney? I did not know
that governor was an English title; it sounds very plebeian
in my ears.
Now, what
do
you mean? ha! ha!you are delightful.
Vol. I.  13
You put me in mind of a good scene at the drawing-room,
last June. Though, perhaps, you don't know what the
drawing-room is?
Oh, yes; I know that it means Court. My tastes are so
exclusive, that I may say I have lived in English High-Life
from the time I married, and became intimate with Mrs.
Bagman. I feel quite at home in such scenes, for I read
every novel that comes out with Lords and Ladies in it.
What were you going to tell me about Court?
The story was interrupted by Miss Hubbard, who tripped
across the room to carry her sister off with her.
Now you are not going, I hope? Why not stay 'ere;
I am sure this sofa is the most comfortable thing in the
room.
I must go to receive some friends of mine, come over
expressly from the city.
Pray, keep me clear of the cits! But now, if you will
go, just leave me your bouquet as a consolation. Thank
you.Oh, yes, I'll take good care of it.
I hope you will, for it's a ten dollar bouquet, and I'm
very proud of it. You must not steal a single flower, mind.
Mustn't I?  Do you dare me? and the agreeable
Captain began to pull out several flowers. Mrs. Hilson,
however, was hurried away.
Mr. Taylor, Mr. Hubbard, and Alonzo moved towards the
sofa where she had been sitting.
Do you think that Stewart will be chosen President of
the Franklin Insurance? inquired Mr. Hubbard.
I think not, sirhe rather mismanaged the affairs of the
Hoboken Bank. Lippincott will be the President, I take it.
He has magnificent talents for business. You know he has
purchased the thirty lots in 50th street, that were sold at
auction, yesterday.
A good purchase, I should say.
How's the Hoboken stock now? inquired Alonzo.
A murmuring about `five per cent.'`six per cent.'
`par'`premium,' followed, and was only interrupted by
the approach of young Van Horne and Elinor.
I beg your pardon, Miss Wyllys, said Mr. Hubbard,
making room for her. Oh, yes, Mr. Van Horne, here is a
place for you, and another couple besides. Whom are you
looking for?
Charles Hubbard, sir; I want him for a vis--vis.
Charlie is already placed, I see; but here is a
gentleman
;
perhaps you would like to dance, sir?addressing
Captain Kockney, who was still in possession of the sofa
and the flowers. I hope my daughter has introduced you
to some of the young ladies.
Now, really; if I am to dance, I prefer Mrs. 'Ilson.
And, accordingly, the Captain, by no means sorry to be
forced to dance, rose with a victim-like look, half strode, half
sidled towards Mrs. Hilson, and putting his elbow in her
face by way of an invitation, led her to the quadrille. The
contrast between these two couples, placed opposite to each
other, was striking, and yet common enough in a mixed
ball-room
.
Captain Kockney was desperately nonchalant, his
partner full of airs and graces; their conversation was silly,
ignorant, and conceited, beyond the reach of imagination
such things must be heard to be believed. Young Van
Horne was clever, and appeared to less advantage in dancing
than in most things. Elinor the reader knows already; it
was a pleasure to follow her as she moved about with the
happy grace which belonged to her nature. Her partner,
half in joke, half in earnest, was engaging her interest
with his father in behalf of the visit to Europe. Elinor
promised to do all in her power; and they chatted away
cheerfully and gaily, for they were young and light-hearted;
and yet, even in a ball-room, they meant what they said, and
knew what they were talking about, for both were sensible
and well educated. Jane and young Bernard were next to
Mrs. Hilson; Adeline and Charlie Hubbard next to Elinor.
Miss Taylor had declared that she would allow no one but
herself to fill the place opposite to Jane, causing by her
decision no little flirtation, and rattling merriment; but, of
course, this was just what the young lady aimed at. These
two pretty, thoughtless creatures, the belle and the beauty,
held a middle position between Mrs. Hilson and Elinor.
Frivolous as they were, there was more latent good about
them, than could be found in the `city lady,' who was one
frothy compound of ignorant vanity, and vulgar affectation.
The class she represented was fortunately as small in its
extreme folly, as that to which Elinor belonged, in its simple
excellence.
Any one, indifferent to dancing or speculation, seeking
amusement as a looker-on, would have been struck, at Uncle
Josie's house-warming, with the generally feminine and
pleasing appearance of the women; there were few faces,
indeed, that could be called positively ugly. Then, again,
one remarked, that puerile as the general tone might be,
mixed as the company was, there were no traces whatever
of coarseness, none of that bold vulgarity which is so revolting.
There was a certain proportion of elderly men collected
on the occasion  they were seen, with a few exceptions,
standing in knots, talking great speculations and little politics,
and looking rather anxious for supper, and the boned turkey.
Of the mothers and chaperons, who filled the sofas, as
representatives
of a half-forgotten custom, some were watching
the flirtations, others looking on and enjoying the gaiety of the
young people. Both fathers and mothers, however, were
very decidedly in the minority, and, according to American
principles, they allowed the majority undisputed sway. The
young people, in general, held little communication with their
elders, and amused themselves after their own fashion; the
young ladies' bouquets afforded a favourite subject for
small-talk
;
they were all carefully analysednot botanically, but
according to the last edition of that elegant work, the
Language
of Flowers, which afforded, of course, a wide field
for the exercise of gallantry and flirtation.
Among the dancers, the four young ladies we have pointed
out were acknowledged the most conspicuous. According
to Mrs. Tibbs and Mrs. Bibbs, Jane's was the most beautiful
face in the room, although there were two or three
competitors
for the title; Adeline was pronounced the most successful
of the rival belles; Mrs. Hilson the most elegant and airy;
Elinor the plainest of the gay troop. Probably, most of
those who thought about the matter, would have decided as
the Longbridge ladies didalthough, on the point of Mrs.
Hilson's elegance, many would have protested. There was
one person, at least, who followed Elinor's graceful figure
with partial interest; Miss Agnes found so much that was
pleasing to her, in the fresh, youthful appearance of her
adopted childin the simple good-taste of her white dress
in the intelligence and character of her expressionin her
engaging manner, that she forgot to regret her want of
beauty; she no longer wondered, as she had sometimes
done, that Harry should so early have appreciated her niece.
Those who knew Elinor thoroughly, loved her for the
excellence
of her character; strangers neglected her for any
pretty face at her side; but every one thrown in her society,
must have acknowledged the charm of her manner. This
pleasing manner, however, so frank, yet so feminine, so
simple, yet so graceful, was only the natural result of her
character, and her very want of beauty. She was never
troubled by the fluttering hopes and fears of vanity; she
never seemed to think of effect; when in society, her
attention
was always given in the simplest and most amiable way
to others. Forgetful of self, she was a stranger to every
forward affectation, to every awkwardness of mauvaise honte;
her good sense, her gaiety, a sweet disposition, and an active
mind were allowed full play, under no other restraints than
those of a good education; those of principle, and those of
youthful, womanly modesty. Such was Elinor in the eyes
of her aunt, but it must not be supposed that this was the
general opinion of Uncle Josie's guests; by no means; many
13*
remarks were made upon Miss Wyllys's being so decidedly
plain; and even her dancing was thought inferior by some
of the company to the more laboured graces of Mrs. Hilson,
or the downright indifference of Adeline: as for Jane, she
unfortunately never danced in time.
At the proper moment supper was announcedthe boned
turkey appeared in full glory. What is that?Boned
turkeyShall I give you boned turkey?I'll thank
you for a little boned turkeywere sounds heard in every
direction. It was very evident the boned turkey was fully
appreciated, and gave great satisfactionthus putting the
finishing touch to the pleasures of Uncle Josie's
house-warming
.
We must not forget to mention the mottoes,
which were handed about in silver baskets, for, as usual,
they caused many tender and witty speeches. This was a
part of the entertainment in which Adeline delighted; Jane
seemed quite satisfied with it, and Mrs. Hilson was in her
element among these little bits of pink paper and sentiment.
Before the supper was more than half over, however, the
rattling of spoons and plates, the requests for boned turkey,
and the flirting over mottoes were suddenly interrupted, and
everything hushed for a moment, by calls for a doctor!
Where is Dr. Van Horne? Have you seen Dr. A?
There is Dr. B.
Alonzo, the fainting-room; remember, said Mrs. Hilson.
But it proved to be none of the company who required a
physician. A stranger, a sailor, some one said, who had
been for the last week at a low tavern opposite, had been
seized with a fit. Dr. Van Horne was soon found, and
hastened to the relief of the sick man. The interruption
was soon forgotten; the mottoes and boned turkey were
again in demand. Dr. Van Horne did not return, however;
his family went home without him; and Mrs. Clapp, on
looking around for her husband, found that he also had
disappeared
.
I saw Clapp going into the tavern last evening, observed
Uncle Josie. Perhaps this poor fellow is some client of
his; he may have gone to look after him.
Mrs. Clapp was obliged to ask Uncle Dozie to accompany
her home; and as he was no somnambulist, with all his
napping, he carried his niece safely to her own door.
Miss Wyllys was one of those who left the house
immediately
after supper. Adeline and Jane ran up stairs before
Elinor and herselflike the Siamese twins, each with an
arm encircling the other's waist. The close intimacy between
Jane and Adeline continued to surprise Elinor. She began
to think there must be something more than common,
something
of the importance of a mystery which drew them so
often together, causing so many confidential meetings. Even
when the two girls were in society, she could not but observe
that Adeline often made some allusion, or whispered some
remark that seemed both pleasing and embarrassing to Jane.
Miss Taylor was evidently playing confidante, and
occasionally
Jane appeared to wish her less open and persevering in
the affair. As for Mrs. Graham, she was too much
occupied
with the care of her younger children to pay much
attention to her daughter's intimacies. She rather disliked
Adeline and all her family, and Mr. Graham had a real
antipathy for Mr. Taylor; still Jane was allowed to do as
other young girls about her, select whom she pleased for her
associates. Mrs. Graham was one of those mothers who
devote themselves with great assiduity to the care of their
childrens' bodies, their food and raiment, pains and aches
leaving all anxiety for their minds to the school-mistress,
and their characters to themselves. With the eldest daughter
this plan had succeeded very well; Louisa Graham was
clever and well-disposed, and had taken of her own accord
what is called a good turn; and Mr. Robert Hazlehurst had
every reason to congratulate himself upon his choice of a
wife. Mrs. Graham seemed to take it as a matter of course
that the same system would succeed equally well with all her
family. But Jane's disposition was very different from her
sister Louisa's; she had no strength of character, and was
easily led by those about her. The greatest fault in her
disposition
was thought by her family to be indolence; but
Miss Wyllys sometimes wished that she had less selfishness,
and more frankness.
Elinor was not a little startled at something which passed
in Miss Hubbard's dressing-room, between Jane and Miss
Taylor, and which she accidentally overheard, before she
was aware the conversation was confidential.
Don't pretend any longer, Jane, that you didn't know it,
whispered Adeline, as they were stooping together over a
bundle of hoods and shawls. Jane made no answer. Now,
confess that you knew he was serious before you left Paris.
I did not think much of it for some time, said Jane.
Well, I supposed from your letters that you knew long
ago that he was desperately in love with you. Trust me,
we'll settle it all between us.
Oh, hush, said Jane, there is somebody comingI
know it's wrong
Nonsensewrong indeed! I should like to know where
is the great harm if he does break his engagement?
Elinor moved away when she found the conversation was
meant to be private. But she had unintentionally heard
enough to make her anxious for Jane. Was not Adeline
leading her into difficulty? She felt uneasy, and thought of
nothing else during her drive home. It would not do to consult
Miss Wyllys; but she determined to speak to Jane herself,
the first time she saw her. Unfortunately, her cousin was
going to New York, and nothing could be done until she
returned to pass a fortnight at Wyllys-Roof before going to
town for the winter.
CHAPTER XV.
the reward
Is in the race we run, not in the prize.
Rogers
.
Miss Patsey
had never, in her life, been to a regular ball,
before this house-warming of Uncle Josie's; but not even
the novelty of a ball could keep her in bed an hour later
than usual. Charlie and herself had returned home some
time after midnight, with the Wyllyses; but the next morning
she rose with the chickens, and before the October sun, to
pursue, as usual, her daily labours. It was truly surprising
how much Patsey Hubbard found time to do in a single day,
and that without being one of your fussy, utilitarian
busy-bodies
,
whose activity is all physical, and who look upon
half an hour passed in quiet thought, or innocent recreation,
as so much time thrown away. Our friend Patsey's career,
from childhood, had been one of humble industry,
self-forgetfulness
,
and active charity; her time in the gay hours of
youth, as well as in the calmer years of mature experience,
had been devoted to the welfare and happiness of her parents,
her brothers and sisters. From a long habit of considering
the wants and pleasures of others first, she always seemed
to think of herself last, as a matter of course. She had had
many laborious, anxious hours, many cares; but it is far
from being those who have the most trouble in this world,
who complain the loudest; no one had fewer wants, fewer
vanities, fewer idle hours than Miss Patsey, and, consequently,
no one could be more generally cheerful and contented.
There is nothing so conducive to true, healthful cheerfulness,
as the consciousness of time well-spent: there is no better
cure for the dull spirit of French
ennui
, or the gloom of
English
blues
, than regular, useful occupation, followed by
harmless recreation.
Any one who had followed Patsey Hubbard through the
varied duties of a single day, would have acknowledged
that there is no spectacle in this world more pleasant, than
that of a human being, discharging with untiring fidelity,
and singleness of heart, duties, however humble. The
simple piety of her first morning prayer, the plain good
sense of her domestic arrangements, and thorough
performance
of all her household tasks, her respectful, considerate
kindness to her step-mother, and even a shade of undue
indulgence of Charlie  all spoke her character  all was
consistent.
Happy was Patsey's little flock of scholars. Every
morning, at nine o'clock, they assembled; the Taylor children
usually appeared in Leghorn gipsies, and silk aprons; the
rest of the troop in gingham sun-bonnets, and large aprons
of the same material. There were several little boys just
out of petticoats, and half-a-dozen little girlsenough to fill
two benches. The instruction Patsey gave her little people
was of the simplest kind; reading, spelling, writing, and
arithmetic, learning a few simple verses, with sewing and
marking for the girls, made up the amount of it. Most
people, in these days of enlightenment, would have been
very much dissatisfied with her plan, for it actually excluded
all the sciences, and all the accomplishments. Patsey had
two reasons for confining herself to the plainest branches of
education only; in the first place, she did not think herself
capable of teaching anything else; and, secondly, she doubted
whether her scholars were capable of learning anything better
or more useful for themselves. Mr. Taylor thought she had
very low views of infant education; and yet, you could not
have found anywhere a set of children, between three and
ten, who were more thoroughly taught what their instructor
professed to teach. Happy would it be for these little
creatures
,
if they never acquired any worse knowledge than they
gained under Patsey's care! She had an eye to their
tempers, their morals, and their manners; she trained the
little girls to be modest and gentlethe little boys to be
respectful and obliging; while she endeavoured to make all
alike honest, open, cheerful, and sincere. Were not these
lessons quite as important to most children, between the ages
of three and ten, as chemistry, astronomy, and natural
philosophy
?
The day following Uncle Josie's house-warming, Miss
Patsey released her little flock an hour earlier than usual;
they were allowed to pass the time playing in an adjoining
meadow, until sent for by their parents. There was to be a
tea-party at the old gray house that eveninga very
unusual
event; ten invitations had been sent out. The fact is,
Miss Patsey had received a basket of noble peaches, the day
before, from one of her neighbours; and Uncle Josie had
already, early in the morning, sent over a wagon-load of
good things to replenish his niece's larderthe remains of
the last night's supper; among other delicacies there was a
bit of boned turkey, for Mrs. Hubbard's especial benefit.
Patsey scarcely knew what to do with so many luxuries.
She sent a basket of fruits and jellies to a couple of sick
neighbours, by Charlie; still, there was more than her
mother, Charlie, and herself, could possibly do justice to in a
week. She determined to give a little tea-party; it was
eighteen months since she had had one, and that had been only
for the Wyllyses. Dr. and Mrs. Van Horne, the Taylors, the
Wyllyses, and the Clapps were accordingly invited; and
Patsey proceeded to burn some coffee, and make short-cake.
The little parlour was more carefully swept and dusted than
ever, five additional chairs were brought in, and a fire was
made, on account of Mrs. Hubbard. Then, about four
o'clock, the ladies made their toilette; Mrs. Hubbard was
dressed in a smart new calico, with a cap, made by Elinor,
and was then seated in the best rocking-chair. As for Patsey,
herself, she could not think of wearing the elegant new dress,
Uncle Josie's presentthat was much too fine; she preferred
what had now become her second-besta black silk, which
looked somewhat rusty and well-worn. To tell the truth,
this gown had seen good service; it had been not only turned,
but re-turnedhaving twice gone through the operation of
ripping and sponging; and doubtful as the fact may appear
to the reader, yet we have Miss Patsey's word for it, that a
good silk will bear twice turning, but then it must be a silk
of a first-rate quality, like her own. It had been, indeed,
the standing opinion of the family for the last five years, that
this particular dress was still as good as new. As for the
changes in fashion that this black silk had outlived, who
shall tell them? It was purchased in the days of short
waists and belts,
gig-ohs
, and
pal-reens
, as they were
called by the country damsel, whose scissors first shaped
the glossy
gro de nap
. Waists, long, longer, longest,
succeeded; sleeves, full, fuller, fullest, followed; belts were
discarded, boddices began to appear; still Miss Patsey's silk
kept up with the changes, or rather, did not entirely lose
sight of them. If you had seen her at a little tea-party at
Wyllys-Roof, wearing this silk, nearly as good as new,
with a neat and pretty collar of Elinor's work, you would
have been obliged to confess that her dress answered a rule
given by a celebrated philosopheryou would not have
remarked
it. Had you chanced to meet her of a Sunday, in
Mr. Wyllys's carriage  the Wyllyses always stopped on
their way to St. John's Church, at Longbridge, to offer a
couple of seats to the Hubbards, who were set down at the
door of their father's old Meeting-househad you seen her
of a Sunday, with a neat straw hat, and the black silk gown,
you would have been obliged to acknowledge that her dress
had the double merit, by no means common, of according
with her circumstances, and the sacred duties she was going
to fulfil; the devotion of her neighbours would not be
disturbed
by admiration of her toilette.
At five o'clock, Miss Patsey's company began to assemble;
the Wyllyses were the first to appear; then came Mrs.
Taylor, Mrs. Van Horne, and Mrs. Clapp; Adeline excused
herself, she thought it a bore, Charlie was not worth flirting
with. The doctor, Mr. Taylor, and Mr. Clapp, were
expected
after tea. And a pleasant, good-natured evening it
proved to be. Miss Patsey's coffee was excellent; the little
black girl, engaged for the occasion, performed her duties to
admiration. Mrs. Taylor thought that she had scarcely
passed such a quiet, pleasant afternoon, since the halcyon
days before her husband was a rich man; she was much
interested in discussing with Miss Patsey, and Miss Wyllys,
and Mrs. Van Horne, various recipes for making bread,
hoecake
,
and other good things, As for Elinor, she told Charlie
she had left her work at home, on purpose that she might
have time enough to look over all his sketcheseverything
he had to show, old and new. The drawings, and several
oil-paintings were accordingly produced, and looked over by
the young people, and Mr. Wyllys, who had taken a chair
by the table, and joined them. Elinor knew nothing of
drawing, but her general taste was good; she asked many
questions about the details of the art, and was amused and
interested by Charlie's remarks.
Show us everything, Charlie, said Mr. Wyllys. I
befriended your genius, you know, in the days of the slate
and compound interest; and, of course, I shall think it due
to my own discernment to admire all your works.
Of course, you are not afraid of my criticisms, said
Elinor; I don't know enough to be severe.
People who know little, my child, generally make very
severe critics, said Mr. Wyllys.
When they know
little
, grandpapa; but mine is honest,
humble ignorance. I know nothing at all on the subject.
Do you remember, Miss Elinor, that Hogarth said
anybody
possessing common sense was a better judge of a
picture
than a connoisseur?
Did Hogarth say so?I shall begin to feel qualified to
Vol. I.  14
find fault. That is a very pretty group of children,
grandpapa
.
Very pretty;some of Miss Patsey's little people. And
here is another, quite natural and graceful, Charlie.
I never see my sister's little scholars but I am tempted
to sketch them. Children are such a charming study; but
I am never satisfied with what I do; a picture of children
that is not thoroughly childlike is detestable. Those are
mere scratches.
What are these faint outlines of figures, with dashes of
colouring here and there? asked Elinor.
Oh, those are mere fancies, made entirely for amusement.
They are rude sketches of my own ideas of celebrated
pictures
that I have never seen, of course; only as exercises for
idle momentsone way of practising attitudes of figures, and
composition. I keep them more as a lesson of humility than
anything else, for me to remember my own poor conceits
when I see the originals, if that happy day ever come.
I thought you gave yourself up entirely to landscapes,
Charliedo you think seriously of pursuing both branches?
asked Mr. Wyllys.
No, sir; I give the preference to landscapes; I find, at
least, that field quite wide enough. It seems scarcely
possible
to unite both, they are so different in character and
detail, and require such a different course of study.
That is the great point with you, my boy; you must not
waste too much time upon the ideal portion of the art; you
must remember that the most beautiful ideas in the world
will be lost, if the execution is not in some measure worthy
of them.
I am so well aware of that, sir, that I have done nothing
but study the practical part of my trade for the last three
months, and I feel that it has been of service to me.
There is water in all your sketches, I believe, said
Elinor. You must be very partial to it.
I am, indeedit is a most delightful studyI should be
afraid to tell you all the pleasure I have in painting water
you would laugh at me, if I once set off upon my hobby.
Not at all; you have made me an honest admirer of
every variety of lakes and rivers, since I have seen your
pictures.
When did you first take to water, Charlie? asked Mr.
Wyllys.
Oh, long ago, sir, when I was a little bit of a shaver.
Have you never when a child, Miss Elinor, received great
pleasure, perhaps a lasting impression, from some natural
object that you still remember distinctly?
Yes, I know what you mean  I recollect perfectly
several things of the kind. I believe children have more
observation, and feeling for what is beautiful, than is
generally
supposed.
It is very probable that most children have similar
sensations
.
I am glad that you do not laugh at me; there are
few persons to whom I confess my violent partiality for water;
most people would think it ridiculous.
You are right, Charlie; one can talk to the world in
action only; it never believes the truth in any shape, until
forced to acknowledge it. You are pursuing the right course,
however; you have spoken quite clearly in your view from
Nahant  your friends have every reason to urge you to
persevere. But does not Mr.  tell you to pay more
attention to your foliage and buildings? you rather neglect
them for the water.
Yes, sir; I am well aware of my defects in that respect,
and next summer I hope to devote a great deal of time to
foliage.
The conversation was here interrupted by the arrival of
Dr. Van Horne and Mr. Taylor, followed shortly after by
Mr. Clapp.
You are late, William, said pretty little Mrs. Clapp to
her husband. Did you leave the children all safe? Did
the baby cry for me?
Perfectly safeall sound asleep, replied Mr. Clapp,
passing his fingers through his curls. But his wife, who
knew every expression of the face she thought so handsome,
fancied William looked pale and uneasy; some business
had gone wrong, perhaps.
Quite a select circle, observed Mr. Taylor, sitting down
by Miss Wyllys, leaning his chair back, and rolling his
thumbs, one over the other.
I have not had a pleasanter evening in a great while,
said Mrs. Taylor. It puts me in mind, husband, of
old-fashioned
tea-parties, when we lived altogether in the country.
We used to go at two o'clock, and stay until sunset. I think
such sociable parties are much pleasanter than late, crowded
balls.
Ha! ha!that may be your opinion, Mrs. Taylor; a
quiet party does very well where one is intimate, no doubt;
but I conclude that younger ladies, Adeline, and her friends
Miss Graham and Miss Wyllys, would give a different
verdict.
Miss Taylor seems quite partial to large parties, said
Elinor, quietly, for the remark was addressed to her.
Yes, Adeline and her `chum' both like plenty of balls
and beaux, I reckon.
What has become of your patient, doctor? inquired
Miss Patsey. The poor man at the taverndo you think
he will get well?
I have no doubt the fellow will outlive half-a-dozen such
fits. I left him last night under guard of two men, to keep
him from hanging himself; and this morning, when I went
to look after him, he was off. He was so much better, that
he had been persuaded by some messmate to ship for a
cruizeonly a three years' whaling voyage. Regular
Jacktar
fashiona frolic one day, a fit the next, and off for the
end of the world the third.
He has left Longbridge, has he? said Mr. Wyllys. I
was just going to inquire after him, for they have a story
going about, that he used very threatening language in
speaking of myself and Hazlehurst. Did you happen to hear
him, doctor?
He did use some wild, incoherent expressions, sir, to
that effect, when I was with him; but the threats of a raving
man are not of much consequence.
Certainly not. But I have no idea who the man can be;
I don't know a single common seaman by sight or nameat
least, the only one I ever knew is long since dead. It is
singular that this fellow should have known my name even;
they say he was a stranger at Longbridge.
Entirely so, I believe.
What was his name?
William Thompson, they told me.
`If he is a sailor, he probably has a dozen aliases,
interposed
Mr. Clapp, who had been listening very attentively.
By-the-bye, Clapp, they say he included you in his kind
wishes.
Yes, sir, so I understand.
William, you never mentioned it to me! said his wife.
No, my dear; I did not attach any importance to the
story, replied the lawyer, pulling out his handkerchief with
one hand, and running the other through his hairlooking
a little nervous and uneasy, notwithstanding,
He did not exactly threaten you, Mr. Clapp, while I was
with him, said the doctor; he seemed rather to depend upon
you as an ally.
Still more singular, said Mr. Clapp, with a glance at
Mr. Wyllys.
That was very strange! exclaimed his wifewhat
could the man mean?
It is by no means easy to explain the meaning of a
drunken man, my dear. It is just possible he may have
heard my name as a man of business. I have had several
sailors for clients, and one quite recently, staying at the same
tavern.
14*
I dare say, if explained, it would prove to be Much ado
about Nothing, said Mr. Wyllys. Since the fellow was
drunk at the time, and went off as soon as he grew sober, the
danger does not seem very imminent.
Precisely my opinion, sir, said Mr. Clapp.
Grandpapa, do you remember the sailor who was found
near our house, one night, about two years ago? It was my
birth-day, and we had a little partyhave you forgotten?
True, my child; I have never thought of the fellow
since; but now you speak of him, I remember the fact.
Do you not think it is probably the same person?you
know Harry had him locked up: perhaps he owes you both
a grudge for the treatment he received at Wyllys-Roof, upon
that occasion.
That accounts for the whole affair, Miss Elinoryou
have cleared up the mystery entirely, said Mr. Clapp,
looking
much relieved. He not only appeared grateful to Elinor
for the explanation given, but seemed to extend the
obligation
to all the family; for he was particularly attentive to
Mr. Wyllys, and Miss Agnes, during the whole evening
and the next morning, early, drove out to Wyllys-Roof,
expressly
to carry some brook-trout, for Mr. Wyllys's
breakfast
.
The lawyer informed several persons, who alluded to
the story, of this simple explanation, which seemed to satisfy
all who heard it. The whole affair was soon forgotten, for
a time, at least.
CHAPTER XVI.
Weak and irresolute is man;
The purpose of to-day
Woven with pains into his plan,
To-morrow rends away.
Cowper
.
After
an absence of a week, or ten days, Harry returned
to Wyllys-Roof, not at all sorry to hear that he was too late
to see the Grahams, as they were going to New York the
next morning. He was very attentive to Elinorpointedly
so. Once or twice she was going to jest with him upon the
subject, and inquire the cause of this studied gallantry; but
observing he was still a little out of spirits, she contented
herself with thanking him for the books he had brought her.
The next day proved so mild, so hazy, and
Indian-summer-like
,
that Hazlehurst proposed to take advantage of it, to
give the ladies a row on the river. They were out for a
couple of hours, landed on the opposite bank, and paid a
visit to their friends, the Bernards, who lived a mile or two
below them. The air was delightful, the country looked
beautifulfresher, perhaps, than at midsummer; for the heat
was no longer parching, and the September showers had
washed away the dust, and brought out the green grass again.
Harry had become interested in the conversation, and was
particularly agreeable; Miss Agnes was pleased with his
remarks, and Elinor thought she had never passed a
pleasanter
morning; she was little aware that it was to be fol
lowed by many anxious, painful days.
They landed, as usual, at the boat-house; and the ladies
prepared to walk slowly across the lawn, while Harry
secured
the boat and oars. As they approached the house,
they were surprised to see several of the servants collected
on the piazza, listening so intently to a lad that they did not
see the ladies. Old Hetty, a superannuated negro cook,
who had lived all her life in the family, was wringing her
hands, and wiping her eyes with her apron; while Mammy
Sarah, Elinor's former nurse, a respectable white woman,
was talking to the boy.
Elinor quickened her pace, and hastened before her aunt,
to inquire into the cause of this distress.
What is it, Mammy? she asked, on reaching the piazza.
What is the matter?
Oh, dearie me; Miss Elly, Miss Elly! exclaimed old
Hetty, with a fresh burst of tears.
Tell usHettyMammywhat has happened? said
Miss Wyllys, as she approached.
Oh, Miss Aggess, Miss Aggessdreadful news! said
the old negro woman, burying her face in her apron.
My father? asked Miss Agnes, faintly, and trembling
with alarm.
No, ma'am, said Mammy Sarah, looking very sad,
however; Mr. Wyllys is very well, and we were hoping he
would come in before you, so that we could get at the truth.
Let us hear what you have to say, at once, Mammy,
continued Miss Agnes, anxiously.
Billy, here, has brought bad news from Longbridge.
Dreadful news! interposed old Hetty. Oh, Miss
Aggess! Billy say Miss Jane
What is it?Speak plainly! cried Miss Wyllys.
There's an accident happened to the steamboat, added
Mammy.
B'iler bust  dearie meMiss Jane's scall to death!
exclaimed Hetty.
A cry of horror burst from Elinor and her aunt, and they
turned towards Mammy Sarah.
I hope it isn't quite so bad, ma'am, said Mammy; but
Billy says the steamboat boiler did really burst after she had
got only half a mile from the wharf.
A second sufficed for Miss Agnes and Elinor to remember
Hetty's fondness for marvels and disasters, and they hoped
ardently that the present account might be exaggerated.
They turned to the boy: What had he heard? Whom
had he seen? Billy reported that he had seen the boat
himself; that he had heard the cries from her decks, which
the people in the street thought had come from some horses
on board, that must have been scalded; that another boat
had gone out to the Longbridge steamer, and had towed her
to a wharf a few rods from the spot where the accident
happened
;
that he had seen, himself, a man on horseback,
coming for the doctor; and the people told him five horses
had been killed, two men badly hurt, and Mr. Graham's
eldest daughter was scalded so badly that she was not
expected
to live.
Miss Wyllys's anxiety increased on hearing the boy's
story; she ordered the carriage instantly, determined that
under any circumstances, it would be best to go to
Longbridge
at once, either to discover the truth, or to assist Mrs.
Graham in nursing Jane, if she were really badly injured.
At this moment, Harry returned from the boat-house.
What is the matter? he exclaimed, springing up the
piazza steps, and looking round upon the sad and anxious
faces.
We have heard bad news from Longbridge, said Miss
Wyllys; but before she could explain herself, old Hetty
burst into tears again, and turning to Hazlehurst, exclaimed:
Oh, Massa Harry!dreadful news!Miss Jane scall to
death in steamboat!
Miss Wyllys was so much struck with the effect of these
words on Harry, that for an instant she forgot to say she
trusted the story had been exaggerated. Hazlehurst lost all
colour  stood speechless and motionless for a moment.
Elinor was too much agitated herself to speak. Suddenly,
Harry met Miss Agnes's eye; he turned from her, rushed
through the house, and continued walking rapidly up and
down the avenue, apparently forgetful of everything but his
own feelings. Amid all her anxiety for Jane, Miss Wyllys
could not but remark Hazlehurst's mannerhe seemed
entirely
overcome by his emotion; and yet he had not asked
one question, nor made one offer to do anything for Elinor,
or herself; and one would have thought it more natural that
at such a moment he should have remained with them, pained
and distressed as they were. Elinor only thought that
Hazlehurst's
feelings did credit to his heart; her own was full of
grief for the suffering of her playfellow and companion,
whom she had loved almost as a sister.
Some twenty minutes were passed in this manner by the
aunt and niece, with feelings better understood than described.
They were waiting for the carriage, and nothing could be
done in the mean time; it seemed an age to Elinor before
the coachman could be found, and the horses harnessed.
While her aunt and herself were in tears, pacing the piazza
together, they were surprised by the appearance, on the
Longbridge road, of the old-fashioned chair in which Mr.
Wyllys usually drove about his farm. Miss Agnes distinctly
saw her father driving, with a lady at his side. They were
approaching at a very steady, quiet pace. As they entered
the gate, Miss Agnes and Elinor hastened to meet them; they
saw Harry stopping to speak to Mr. Wyllys, and then Miss
Wyllys heard her father's voice calling to herself.
All safe! he cried. It was a misunderstanding; Jane
is quite well; though a poor young woman, bearing the same
name, has been scalded.
We were in hopes the news had not reached you yet,
said Mrs. George Wyllys, who accompanied her
father-in-law
.
We were all dreadfully alarmed, at first, for the
accident
was very much exaggerated.
Miss Wyllys and Elinor were too thankful for Jane's
escape, to express anything but the relief they felt on hearing
of her safety.
No one killed, continued Mr. Wyllys. They lost a
couple of horses; two of the men were hurt, but not
dangerously
;
and the new chambermaid, whose name is Jane
Graham
,
had her feet badly scalded. But there is so little harm
done, considering what might have happened, that we have
reason to be very thankful for every one on board.
You may imagine how much alarmed I was, continued
Mrs. Wyllys; for I happened to be sitting at my own window,
which overlooks the river, you know, and I heard the noise
and cries from the boat, and knew the Grahams were on
board.
Long explanations followed: Mr. Wyllys had had his
fright too. He had heard at the saddler's, that half Mr.
Graham's family were killed. Now, however, it only
remained
for them to be thankful that their friends had all
escaped, and to hope Jane's namesake would soon recover.
But how long is it since you heard the story? why did
you not send Harry off at once, to get at the truth? asked
Mr. Wyllys.
We were going ourselves, replied Miss Agnes.
What has become of Harry?Where is he? asked
her father.
But Harry had disappeared.
He was much distressed at the news, said Elinor.
No wonder; it was a horrible idea. But he should
have jumped on horseback, and rode over to Longbridge to
find out the truth.
Elinor looked round once more for Hazlehurst, as they
entered the house; but he was certainly not there.
And what are the Grahams going to do? asked Miss
Wyllys.
They are off again this afternoon, replied her father,
taking a seat on the sofa.
Hazlehurst was not seen again all the morning. Dinner
came, and he had not joined the family.
He is in his room, said Elinor; I heard him walking
as I passed his door. I am afraid he is not well.
The servant who was sent to let him know that dinner was
on table, returned with the answer, that Mr. Hazlehurst had
a bad head-ache, and begged Miss Wyllys would excuse him.
That long row in the sun must have given Harry a
head-ache
,
Aunt Agnes, said Elinor; I am sorry we went so
far.
Perhaps so, said Miss Agnes; although she did not
seem wholly to be of Elinor's opinion.
Hazlehurst is no such tender chicken, Nelly; you must
not spoil him, childdo you hear? said her grandfather,
smiling in a way that made Elinor colour. Miss Agnes was
silent during dinner; but as the whole family had scarcely
recovered from the alarm of the morning, the shade of
anxiety on her face was not remarked.
Harry remained in his room. As he had requested not
to be disturbed, he was left alone. Once, however, in the
course of the evening, a knock was heard at his door, and a
servant appeared.
Miss Elinor sends you a cup of tea, sir, and hopes your
head is better, said Thomas.
Miss Elinor is very goodI am much obliged to her,
was Harry's answer, in a low, thick voice; but the cup of
tea remained untasted, while Hazlehurst resumed his walk
across the room. When, shortly after, Elinor's voice was
heard singing her grandfather's favourite air of Robin Adair
in lower tones than usual, Harry again started from the table,
where he had laid pen and paper preparatory to writing, and
striking his hand against his forehead, he exclaimed:
Ungrateful wretch, that I am!
The next morning Elinor was up early, and taking the
garden basket, she went out to gather all the late flowers she
could find, to fill a jar for the drawing-roomsinging gaily,
as she went from bush to bush, and gathering here a sprig
of honeysuckle, there violets or a late rose, blooming out
of season, and a few other straggling blossoms. After
loitering
about the garden for half an hour, she returned to the
house. She was surprised to see the coachman, at that early
hour, driving up the avenue in the little wagon used for
errands about the country.
Where have you been, Williams? she asked, as he
drove past her towards the stable.
To carry Mr. Hazlehurst over to Upper Lewiston, in
time for the six o'clock boat, Miss.
Elinor could scarcely believe what she had heard. At
the same moment, Mr. Wyllys stepped out on the piazza.
What is this, Elinor? he asked. They tell me Harry
is off;did you see him this morning?
Elinor was obliged to say she had not.
What can it mean! did he get any letters by last night's
mail?
Not that I know of, said Elinor, much surprised, and a
little alarmed.
They found Miss Agnes in the drawing-room; she, it
seemed, already knew of Hazlehurst's departure. She said
little on the subject, but looked anxious and absent. Elinor
scarcely knew what to think; she was afraid to trust herself
to make any inquiries, preferring to wait until alone with her
aunt after breakfast. The meal passed over in silence. Mr.
Wyllys looked uneasy; Elinor was at a loss to know what
to think; neither of the ladies paid much attention to the
morning meal that day.
Miss Agnes rose from table, and went to her own room;
Elinor, neglecting her usual task as housekeeper, hastened
to follow her aunt, her mind filled with indistinct fears and
anxieties. Miss Agnes was walking about her room, looking
pained and distressed. Several letters were lying on a table
near her; two were unopened; one she had been reading.
Letters!my dear Aunt, from whom? Tell me, I
conjure
you, what you know! Has anything happened to
Louisato Jane? Did Harry leave no message for me?
cried Elinor, hurrying towards her aunt, whose face she
watched for an answer to each question, as she asked it.
Vol. I.  15
Miss Wyllys made an effort to compose herself, and held out
her hand to Elinor.
My dearest Aunt!pray tell me what distresses you
Ha! Harry's handwriting! she exclaimed, as her eye fell
on the open letter by Miss WyllysI know that letter is
from Harry; do not conceal anything; is it for me?
This letter is to me, my child, replied her aunt, taking
up the one she had been reading; wishing to give Elinor all
the preparation in her power, for a blow which she knew
must fall heavily, since it was so entirely unexpected.
But there are two other letters, cried Elinor, one of
them is for me, I am sure. Let me see it at once, Aunt;
you cannot deny that it is for meand if it contain bad
news, you know that I can command myself when necessary.
Miss Agnes's hand trembled as she took the letters.
My child! My beloved Elinor! she said.
Dearest Aunt, you torture me! Tell me, I beseech
you, what we have to fear!
You shall know all, Miss Agnes replied, seating
herself
,
and endeavouring to be calm. You will be much
distressed, my child; but I know that you will be now, what
you always have been, reasonable, and true to yourselfto
your grandfatherto me, added Miss Wyllys, in a voice
almost inarticulate.
A thousand indistinct ideas passed through Elinor's mind
with the rapidity of lightning, while her aunt was speaking;
illness of some absent friend suggested itselfyet who could
it be? Not Harry, surely, for he had gone over to Upper
Lewiston that morning  yet her fears instinctively centred
upon Hazlehurst.
It is something relating to Harry, I am sure, she said.
Is he ill?is he in trouble? she asked in a faint voice,
while a prayer for resignation sprang from her heart, with
the words.
You are right, replied Miss Wyllys, in a faltering voice;
and seating herself by her niece, she continued, He is well.
If he is in trouble, it is from his own choice. Have you no
suspicions, my dearest child, of what has happened?
Suspicions!exclaimed Elinor, in astonishment, what
is there for me to suspect? My dearest Aunt, I am more
and more perplexedexplain it all yourselfwho is it you
are concerned for?
My only concern is for you, dearest; my only regret,
that trouble should have been brought on you by those dear
to youby your grandfather, by myself, by your cousins.
By you!by my cousinswhat cousins?
HarryJaneHave you remarked nothing?
Harry! what can he have done?
You must forget him, said Miss Wyllys; and as Elinor
looked eagerly in her aunt's eyes, she read there all that
Miss Agnes had not courage to tell in words.
Half starting from her seat, she exclaimed, Harry!and
Jane too! and as a deadly paleness came over her face, she
fell back, unconscious, on the sofa. Her faintness lasted but
a moment; too short a time, indeed, to allow the impression
of what she had heard to pass from her mind. She burst
into tears. Oh, Aunt Agnes!  Is it really true?  Can
Harry have changed? can he have been so unkind to me?
And Jane, too! she exclaimed at intervals.
Her aunt answered only by her caresses, silently pressing
her lips upon Elinor's forehead.
Elinor threw her arms about Miss Agnes's neck, weeping
bitterly.
But is it really true? Is there not some mistake? Is it
possible he felt so little for me? Oh, dearest Aunt!And
Jane, too!
Miss Wyllys said that she knew nothing of Jane's feelings;
but that the manner of both Jane and Harry had struck her
several times as singular; though now but too easily
accounted
for. During the last ten days, she had begun to fear
something wrong.
Never, for one second, had I a doubt of either! cried
Elinor. She now dreaded to receive the letter, she had
before asked for so eagerly.
A package had been given by Harry to the chambermaid,
that morning, requesting her to place it in Miss Agnes's
hands as soon as she left her room. It contained three letters.
That to Miss Agnes herself, was full and explicit. He now
wrote, he said, because he felt concealment to be no longer
possible, after the manner in which he had betrayed himself
on hearing of the steamboat accident. He felt convinced that
his emotion had been observed by Miss Wyllys, and he
almost hoped the suspicions of Elinor had been aroused.
He hoped it, for he felt that longer concealment would be
unworthy of Elinor, and of himself, since he had not been
able to control his feelings. He acknowledged that a frank
confession was now due to her.
I know, he said, that you will reproach me severely
for my want of faith, and I feel that I deserve far more than
you will say. But do not think that I erred from deliberate
forgetfulness of all that I owed to Elinor. I was for a long
time unconscious of the state of my own feelings; and when
at length I could no longer deceive myself, the discovery of
my weakness was deeply painful and mortifying. You
know what has been my situation since last springyou
know to what I have been exposed. Greater caution might
no doubt have been used, had I not been misled by blindness,
or self-confidence, or vanity, call it what you please. No
one can reproach me as severely as I reproach myself. But
although my feelings had escaped my own control before I
knew it, yet I determined from the first that my actions should
at least be worthy of Elinor. I instantly became more
guarded. No human being, I believe, until to-day, suspected
my folly. Do not reproach Jane. The fault is entirely with
me; Jane has been blameless throughout.
He concluded by hoping that his letter would not for a
moment be considered by Miss Wyllys or Elinor, as an
attempt
to break his engagement, which he was still anxious
to fulfil. But he thought that, now the explanation had
been made, a separation for some time would be preferable
for all parties. He proposed to travel for six months, and at
the end of that time he hoped to have conquered his own
weakness, and to be forgiven by Elinor.
Bitter tears were shed by Elinor, in reading this letter.
The note to herself was short. He had not the courage to
repeat to her directly, what he had said to Miss Wyllys.
I feel unworthy of you, Elinor, and I cannot endure
longer to deceive so generous a temper as yours. You must
have remarked my emotion this morningMiss Wyllys now
knows all; I refer you to her. I shall never cease to
reproach
myself for my unpardonable ingratitude. But painful
as it is to confess it, it would have been intolerable to play
the hypocrite any longer, by continuing to receive proofs of
kindness which I no longer deserve. It is my hope, that in
time you will forgive me; though I shall never forgive myself.
H. H.
There are said to be young ladies with hearts so tender,
as to be capable of two or three different love affairs, and an
unlimited number of flirtations, in the course of a
twelve-month
;
but Elinor's disposition was of a very different stamp.
Her feelings were all true and strong; her attachment for
Harry little resembled that mixture of caprice and vanity to
which some young people give the name of love. With
something of fancy, and a share of the weakness, no doubt,
it was yet an affection to which every better quality of her
nature had contributed its share. Hazlehurst's
determination
never to forgive himself for the sorrow he had caused
her, was a just one. His fickleness had deeply wounded a
heart, warm, true, and generous, as ever beat in a woman's
bosom.
Bitterly did Elinor weep, that first day of grief,
humiliation
,
and disappointment. She did not hesitate, however, for
a moment, as to the course to be pursued, and even felt
indignant
15*
that Harry should have believed her capable of
holding
him to his engagement, with the feelings he had avowed.
She answered his note as soon as she could command herself
sufficiently to write.
I do not blame youyour conduct was but natural; one
more experienced, or more prudent than myself, would
probably
have foreseen it. Had you left me in ignorance of the
truth until too late, I should then have been miserable indeed.
My aunt will take the first opportunity of letting our mutual
friends know the position in which it is best we should
continue
for the future. May you be happy with Jane.
Elinor Wyllys
.
Elinor, at this moment, felt keenly the disadvantages of
homeliness, which she had hitherto borne so cheerfully, and
had never yet considered an evil. Beauty now appeared to
her as a blessed gift indeed.
Had I not been so unfortunately plain, thought Elinor,
surely Harry could not have forgotten me so soon. Oh,
she exclaimed, had I but a small portion of that beauty
which so many girls waste upon the world, upon mere vanity;
which they are so ready to carry about to public places
through the very streets, to catch the eye of every passing
stranger, how highly should I prize it, only for the sake of
pleasing those I love! What a happy thought it must be to
those blessed with beauty, that the eyes of their nearest and
dearest friends never rest upon them but with pleasure!
How willingly would I consent to remain plain to ugliness,
plain as I am, in the eyes of the world, for the precious
power of pleasing those I love!
Mr. Wyllys and Miss Agnes, of course, approved the step
Elinor had taken. They were both deeply pained by Harry's
conduct; they both regretted having allowed the engagement
to take place so early, and at the moment of Harry's absence.
Miss Wyllys, indeed, blamed herself severely for not having
used all her influence to prevent it. With her father, on the
contrary, indignation against Harry was the strongest feeling.
Heartless young coxcomb! he exclaimed; to dare to
trifle with Elinor. I had a good opinion of him; I thought
he had too much sense, and too much feeling, not to
appreciate
Elinor, though her face may not be as pretty as some
others. Agnes, he must never be asked to Wyllys-Roof
again. I can never forget his treatment of my grandchild.
CHAPTER XVII.
May this be so?
Shakspeare
.
While
the family at Wyllys-Roof were in this distress,
Miss Agnes had received the parting visit of the Taylors.
The porticoes of Colonnade Manor rose before closed
windows
;
the house was abandoned for the winter; while Mr.
Taylor and Miss Adeline were engaged in putting the
finishing
touch to the elegance of No. five hundred and ,
Broadway, preparatory to the display of the winter.
Mr. Taylor was getting at home in New York. The
atmosphere of a large town, thoroughly commercial, was just
fitted to his nature. He had certainly every reason to be
satisfied with the rapidity with which he had mounted
towards
the top of the Wall-Street ladder. He was already
cheek-by-jowl with certain heavy men of the place; he
walked down Broadway of a morning with Mr. A. of the
Ocean, and up again of an afternoon with Mr. B. of the
Hoboken; he knew something of most of the great men of
the commercial world; and as for the rest of the community,
he cared little enough for them or their interests. His house
was as handsome and as finely furnished as he could wish,
his children were as expensively dressed, as expensively
schooled, as any in the land. He had become accustomed to the
first burst of luxury, and began already to look upon a hundred
things as necessaries, of the uses of which he had been
ignorant five years before. He thought New York a
commercial
paradise; not only the place to make a fortune, but
the very spot to spend it in. He wondered at Mr. Hubbard,
who could be satisfied to retire from business so early, and
was content to live at Longbridge, the village where he was
born. Mr. Taylor looked upon himself as already a great
man, but he intended to be a greater man still, by a million,
or more.
About a week after the Taylors arrived in town, they gave
a partyquite a small affair, very sociable, some eighty or
ninety people only. The following morning, Mrs. Taylor,
fatigued with the toils and cares of gaiety, went to her own
room to refresh herself by darning more stockings than
usual; while Mr. Taylor, who had laboured hard the
evening
before by endeavouring to be very `affable' to some
twenty new acquaintances, sought the relief of his
counting-house
.
As he walked down Broadway, his thoughts were
divided between two subjects. He had purchased some lots
the previous week, which proved so indifferent a bargain,
that he was anxious to persuade a particular friend to take
them off his hands. He had also just received a letter from
his son, lately Tom Taylor, now T. Tallman Taylor, Esquire.
The young man had made very heavy demands upon his
father's banker lately. Mr. Taylor was perfectly satisfied
that his son should spend his money freely, and had given
him a very liberal allowance, that he might be enabled to
cut a figure among his countrymen in Paris. But his
progress
in acquiring habits of extravagance had become of late
rather more rapid than was desirable. As he was to return,
however, in the course of a few weeks, his father hoped that
he would be able to play the dandy in New York at less cost
than in Paris.
Mr. Taylor's meditations were interrupted by Mrs. Hilson,
who stopped to speak to him as he passed; she wished to
inquire if Miss Adeline were at home, as she was anxious to
see her, having a piece of news to communicate. Having
given a satisfactory answer, the merchant pursued his course
towards the regions of commerce, at one extremity of
Broadway
,
and the city-lady went her way towards the regions of
fashion in the opposite direction.
Mrs. Hilson had already returned to her suite of apartments,
and her intimate friend, Mrs. Bagman, at the boarding-house
she patronised; and every morning between the hours of
twelve and three, she might be seen at the window of the
drawing-room, if it rained, or flitting up and down Broadway
if the sun shone, generally attended by Captain Kockney,
the long Englishman, whom she took great pleasure in
showing off to the public. On the present occasion she was
alone however, and fortunate enough to find Miss Adeline
and the French furniture visible, for it was the first time she
had been in the new house. The rose-coloured damask, and
the pea-green satin of the two drawing-rooms was much
admired, and many compliments were lavished upon the gilt
clocks, the Svres vases, &c., when Mrs. Hilson remembered
she had a piece of news to share with Miss Taylor.
And such newsso unexpected to us all; you will be
so surprised! The engagement between Miss Wyllys and
Mr. Hazlehurst is actually broken off!
Adeline was not so much astonished as Mrs. Hilson
supposed
she would be.
I am very quick at seeing such things, she said. I
was sure it would come to that; though Miss Wyllys did
not seem to suspect anything herself. But no wonderan
engagement of two years is too long for anybody. I am
sure that in two years I should get tired of the handsomest
beau in New York.
The ladies had each their surmises as to which of the
parties had taken the first step, and what was probably the
cause; but although Miss Taylor had a pretty correct idea
of the state of things, she did not express her opinion on the
subject very decidedly. Mrs. Hilson soon made her curtsey,
expressing the hope that they should see each other very often
during the winter; a hope which Miss Adeline was
determined
not to gratify, for Mrs. Hilson's standing was not
sufficiently
fashionable to satisfy her. The visitor had no sooner
left the room, than she ran up stairs to put on her last Paris
hat, and her handsomest cashmere, and then hurried off to
Barclay-Street to enjoy a confidential meeting with Jane.
The young ladies were closeted together for an hour. We
have no authority for revealing what passed, and can only
observe that Jane returned to the drawing-room with a
heightened colour, and there was a certain expression of
mystery still lingering about Miss Adeline's face.
Have you any commands for Boston, Mrs. Graham?
the young lady inquired in her usual flippant manner. I
think I shall go there next week, to pay a short visit to a
friend of mine; I wish I could hear of an escort.
Mrs. Graham thanked her civilly, but declined the offer
of her services.
Have you really made up your mind to go to Boston?
asked Jane.
Why, not positively. It depends, as I said before, upon
my finding an escort. I have six pressing invitations from
different quarters, most of them acquaintances that I made
last summer at Saratoga; and I have been hesitating between
Albany, Boston, or Baltimore. I am determined to go
somewhere
to spend the next three weeks, till the gaiety begins
in earnest, and Tallman comes back.
Is your brother expected so soon? asked Mrs. Graham.
Yes, he must have sailed now. We heard from him
last night; he will be here next month, I hope, just in time
for the first great parties. What would you advise me to
do, Jane, to get rid of the time until then?
I had much rather you would stay at home; if you go,
I shall miss you very much.
But then we shall have the pleasure of corresponding
I like the excitement of receiving a good long letter, full of
nonsense, above all things.
You must not forget to let me know which way you are
really going, said Jane. I will write, though I can't
promise
you a long letter; I never wrote a long letter in my
life.
Well, you must write, at any rate. I shall see you
half-a-dozen
times between this and Monday. I rather think I
shall decide upon Boston. Miss Lawrence says there are
some delightful young gentlemen there, and has promised to
give me a ball. If I go, I shall try hard to bring Miss
Lawrence
back with me. Mind, Jane, you don't make too many
conquests while I am gone. You must reserve yourself for
the one I have recommended to you. Oh, by-the-bye, Mrs.
Graham, I forgot to tell you the news; I am astonished you
have not heard it already.
Pray, what is it? asked Mrs. Graham.
It seems the engagement between Miss Wyllys and Mr.
Hazlehurst has been broken off.
You are mistaken, surely! We have heard nothing of
it, and it is highly improbable. If there be such a story, let
me beg you will not mention it again, Miss Taylor!
Oh, there is no mistake, I'm quite sure. I have heard
it three times already this morning, from Longbridge people;
first Mrs. Hilson told me, and then I met John Bibbs, and
Edward Tibbs, who said the same thing. Mrs. George
Wyllys, it seems, contradicted the engagement openly; Miss
Hubbard heard her, and wrote it to her sister.
How grieved I should be if this story were to prove true;
you surely never remarked anything, Jane?
Elinor seemed to me just as usual; but Adeline thinks
there has been some change, said Jane, a little embarrassed.
Oh, yes, give me credit for being quick-sighted; I
suspected something the first time I saw them together after
Mr. Hazlehurst came back.
It is what none of their other friends appear to have
done, Miss Taylor, said Mrs. Graham, a little severely.
I dare say not; but I am very quick at seeing such
things. If Jane has any mysteries, she had better not
pretend
to keep them from me. But it is no wonder that the
engagement was broken offI don't believe in long
engagements
.
We must not let Jane drag matters on at that rate
when her turn comes; and then kissing her friend tenderly,
and making a curtsey to Mrs. Graham, without remarking
the disapproving expression of that lady's face, the lively
Adeline left the mother and daughter alone.
I dislike that Miss Taylor, excessively, Jane, observed
her mother, she is very disagreeable to me; I wish you
would find some better companion while we are in New
York. There are the Howards, and de Vaux's  very
amiable, pleasant girls, and for a great many reasons far
better associates for you.
But I don't know them so well. Adeline is a great belle,
mamma, as much so as any girl in town.
She is not at all to my taste, I confess. Your father, too,
dislikes the Taylors very much. The way in which she
spoke of this story about Elinor's engagement was really
unfeeling. Not that I believe it; but breaking off an
engagement
without good reason, is no such trifle in my opinion,
as it seems to be in that of Miss Taylor.
Jane looked quite agitated; she blushed so much that her
mother would probably have remarked it, had she not been,
at the moment, stooping over her little invalid boy, who was
lying on the sofa near her.
Miss Taylor has no claim whtaever upon you, that I can
see, continued Mrs. Graham. It is true she was kind to
you when you were ill with the whooping-cough at school;
but so were your other companionsand I am sure she has
not been half so considerate and good to you as Elinor, and
yet you seem to prefer Miss Adeline now.
Poor Jane looked down, and coloured still more.
Adeline would do anything for me, mother, she said, in
a low voice; you don't know how much she is attached to
me; I can't help linking her, and Jane began to shed a few
tears.
Foolish child! said her mother, beginning to relent, as
she usually did on such occasions, I don't wish you to be
uncivil to her; but I should like you to be more with Kate
Howard, and Anne de Vaux; and the conversation ended,
as several others of the same description had done, by leaving
things precisely as they were before. Mrs. Graham, indeed,
looked upon herself as having showed much decision on the
occasion, and acted as a watchful mother, by having made
these objections, fruitless as they proved to be.
The report that the engagement between Elinor and Harry
had been broken off, was soon known to be correct. It
caused some surprise to all who knew them, and much
regret to their friends. Mrs. Stanley, who felt a warm
interest
in both Harry and Elinor, was grieved and disappointed.
The Grahams, and Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst, felt very
unpleasantly
when the cause of the rupture came to be
suspected. Mrs. Graham was, however, relieved by finding
that there was no understanding between Harry and her
daughterthus far at least all was right; no explanation
had taken place between them, and Jane even assured her
mother that when in Paris, she had had no idea that
Hazlehurst
was attached to her. Still there were many blushes
whenever the subject was alluded to, there were confidential
meetings with Adeline, and other symptoms which left little
doubt to her friends that Jane's feelings were interested.
Mrs. Graham was obliged to console herself with the idea,
that the mischief had, at least, been unintentional on the part
of her daughter.
Harry, himself, was much mortified by the reception of
Vol. I.  16
Elinor's note, which, by showing the full consequence of his
conduct, made it appear more culpable in his own eyes than
he had yet been willing to believe it. He even wrote a
second time, begging Elinor to re-consider her decision
Full as his fancy was of Jane, yet his regard, one might say
his affection, for Elinor, was too well-founded, and of too
long standing, for him to endure quietly the idea of having
trifled with her. She remained firm, however; her second
answer was as decided as the first. Harry's self-reproach
was sincere, at least, and he had never before felt so much
dissatisfied with himself.
He was less eager than one might suppose, to profit by
his newly-acquired liberty. He was in no hurry to offer
Jane the attentions which had so lately been Elinor's due.
It is true that his position was rather awkward; it is not
every faithless swain who is obliged to play the lover to two
different individuals, within so short a period, before the same
witnesses. At length, after doing penance for a while, by
encouraging humiliating reflections, some fear of a rival
carried Hazlehurst on to New York, in his new character
of Jane's admirer. The first meeting was rather awkward,
and Harry was obliged to call up all his good-breeding and
cleverness, to make it pass off without leaving an unpleasant
impression. Ce n'est que le premier pas qui cote,
however
,
as everybody knows. The sight of Jane's lovely face,
with a brighter colour than usual, and a few half-timid and
embarrassed glances from her beautiful dark eyes, had a
surprising effect in soothing Harry's conscience, and
convincing
his reason that after all he had not acted so unwisely.
He soon showed himself very much in earnest in seeking
Jane's favour; though he persuaded himself that he must
always do justice to Elinor's excellence. She is just the
woman for a friend, he observed to himself, and friends I
trust we shall be, when the past is forgotten. But Jane, with
her transcendant beauty, her gentle helplessness, is the very
creature that fancy would paint for a wife!
CHAPTER XVIII.
Be patient, gentle Nell, forget this grief.
Henry VI
.
The
Wyllyses remained later than they had intended in
the country. Elinor, indeed, proposed to her aunt that they
should pass the winter at Wyllys-Roof, but Miss Agnes and
her grandfather were unwilling to do so. The variety of a
life in town would be preferable for her sake to the quiet
monotony of a country winter. They knew she had too
much sense to wish to play the victim; but it was only
natural to believe, that in a solitary country life, painful
recollections would force themselves upon her oftener than
among her friends in town, where she would be obliged to
think less of herself, and more of others.
It had been a great relief to her to find, that Jane had not
acted as unworthily as Miss Agnes had at first feared; in
spite of what she herself had overheard at Miss Hubbard's
party, Elinor threw off all suspicion of her cousin, as soon
as she learned that Jane denied any previous knowledge of
the change in Harry's feelings. Hazlehurst, himself, had
said in his letter that she was blameless.
Then, she exclaimed, I shall at least be able to love
Jane as before! She immediately sat down, and wrote her
cousin a short, but affectionate letter, containing only a slight
allusion to what had passed. Jane's answer, of course,
avoided wounding her feelings, and their intercourse was
resumed.
The time will come, I trust, she thought, when Harry,
too, will be a friend again. But she felt the hour had not
yet arrived. She could not so soon forget the past. It was
no easy task, suddenly to change the whole current of feeling
which had filled her mind during the last two years. In
spite of her earnest resolutions, during the first few weeks,
thoughts and feelings of the past would recur too often,
For some time Elinor was very unhappy; she felt that the
strongest and deepest affections of her heart had been
neglected
,
rejected, undervalued, by one whose opinion she
had learned to prize too highly. She wept and blushed to
think how much she had become attached to Harry, since
she had looked upon him as her affianced husband. She
could not but feel herself free from all reproach towards him;
it was he who, unsought by her, had wished to draw a closer
tie between them. He had succeeded but too well, and then
he had forgotten her. The temptation which had proved too
strong for him, would not have deserved the name, had the
case been reversed, had she been exposed to it. And yet
she did not reproach him; men think so much of beauty,
and she was so very plain! It was but natural at such a
moment, that she should be oppressed by an over-wrought
humility. She accused herself of vanity, for having at one
time believed it possible Harry could love one like herself.
But how happy was Jane!
Her efforts to struggle against low spirits were the greater,
for the sake of her aunt and her grandfather. She made it
a duty to neglect no regular task, and much of her time was
occupied as usual; but the feelings which she carried about
to her employment, were very different from what they had
been heretofore. It was her first taste of sorrow; well
might her aunt deeply reproach Hazlehurst for his versatile
conduct towards her beloved child. Elinor flattered herself
that Miss Agnes knew not half of what she felt. In general
she succeeded in being quite calm, and attentive to others;
she was always sweet-tempered, and unrepining. But she
could not read, herself, the expression of her own
countenance
,
so tenderly watched by her aunt. She was not
aware that the musical tones of her voice were no longer
cheerful; that instead of the gay, easy conversation in which
she used to bear her part, she was now at times absent, often
silent; she whose graceful wit and youthful spirits had been
until lately the joy of her family. Mr. Wyllys's
indignation
against Hazlehurst would have been boundless, if he
could have seen him at such moments, as was often now the
case, sitting by the side of Jane, admiring the length of her
eye-lashes, the pearly smoothness of her complexion, and
the bright colour of her lips, as she uttered some very
common-place remark. Such had now become Hazlehurst's
daily pleasure, his daily habit.
Miss Agnes purposely left to her niece, this year, all the
arrangements for their removal to town; and Elinor was
obliged to be very busy. It happened too, quite opportunely,
perhaps, that just at that time Mrs. George Wyllys was
coming over oftener than usual, to consult her father-in-law
and Miss Agnes. Against Mr. Wyllys's advice, she had to
withdraw her eldest boy from the school where he had been
first placed, and now a new choice was to be made. Mr.
Wyllys recommended a small establishment in their own
neighbourhood, recently opened by Miss Patsey's brother;
he thought it equally good with the one she had in view,
and with the additional advantage of more moderate terms,
and a smaller number of boys. But Mrs. Wyllys had a
great deal to say on the opposite side of the question; the
low price was an objection in her eyes.
There, my dear sir, you must allow me to differ from
you. I have always intended to devote a large portion of
my means to the education of my children; economy in
such a case, I cannot look upon as economy at all.
Certainly, Harriet, you are perfectly right to secure to
your children every advantage in your power. But this is
not a case in point. Thomas Hubbard, you know, was a
principal in the very school which you have in view, and
only withdrew last spring on account of ill health. He still
continues the same system, and has the same masters, with
the advantage of only four boys besides Evert, to occupy his
attention.
16*
This was too plain to be contradicted. But in my opinion,
sir, a large school is very much to be preferred for a boy. I
have thought a great deal on the subject, since Evert has
been of an age to leave me.
But what are your reasons for preferring a large school
to a small one?
I think it a better preparation for their entrance into life.
And then they have the advantage of choosing their intimates
from a larger number of boys; Evert's disposition will make
it particularly desirable for him. I am sure, if he were shut
up with two or three boys only, he would find it so dull that
he would be disgusted.
Well, my dear, I view the matter in a different light,
replied Mr. Wyllys, who would never allow himself to be
silenced, or forced to advise anything against his conscience;
though many men would have been worried into it by such
a woman. Unfortunately, Mrs. Wyllys was the only
guardian
of her children, and Mr. Wyllys was often obliged to
see his daughter-in-law act in a manner that he thought
ill-judged
;
but though very good-natured, he could never be
talked into being a party to such plans. It is precisely on
account of Evert's high spirits that I should like a small
school for him. He would be less likely to get himself and
others into scrapes; he would be more under his master's
eye.
I think, sir, from the conversation I had with Mr. Stone,
he is just the man to obtain an influence over Evert.
You would like Hubbard still better, if you knew him.
I doubt it very much, sir; I am sick of the very name
of Hubbard. Those Longbridge Hubbards are enough to
spoil a paradise.
Well, Harriet, said Mr. Wyllys, you seem to have
made up your mind; so have I; now what is to be done?
Of course, sir, your opinion has great weight with me;
you know I am always guided by you.
Then the matter is settled, and Evert goes to Hubbard's.
Mr. Wyllys thought he had succeeded, on this occasion,
in gaining his point, by taking his daughter-in-law at her
word; but the very next morning she drove over to
Wyllys-Roof
,
with a new view of the subject; and it was not until
after half-a-dozen more conversations, that the matter was
finally settled, by Mr. Wyllys refusing to give any more
advice; when his daughter-in-law, of her own accord,
determined
to send her boy to Mr. Hubbard's school. It must be
confessed that some women, endowed too with certain good
qualities, are very trying, and possess a most vexatious vein
of caprice. In the mean time the child was taken sick; he
was ill for several weeks, and Elinor assisted in nursing him.
Independently of these consultations, and cares about her
little cousin, there were other claims upon Elinor's attention
at this time, and those the least romantic in the world.
Within the last few weeks, all the men of Longbridge
seemed to have their heads full of a new rail-road, one of
the first that were made in this country. All the property
Elinor had inherited from her father was in this village, and
so placed as to have its value very much increased by this
intended piece of internal improvement. Mr. Hubbard was
one of those most interested in the project, which was of
some importance to Mr. Wyllys, also. The gentlemen had
many meetings on the subject, and Elinor was obliged to
hear a great deal that was going on; which houses were to
be pulled down, which streets widened, what engineer was
to be employed, where the rails were to come from, at what
time they hoped to get the act through the Assembly. Mr.
Taylor, of course, was not the man to allow anything
approaching
to speculation, to take place in his neighbourhood
without having something to do with it himself. He came
over to Longbridge expressly to help matters on; and as
Colonnade Manor was shut up, Mr. Wyllys, always
hospitably
inclined, asked him to his own house for a day or two.
With such a spirit under their roof, little else was heard of
besides stocks and lots, wharves and stores. Elinor's
property
was known to be much interested in the affair, and
Mr. Hubbard and Mr. Taylor thought it necessary to
congratulate
her. Mr. Taylor, indeed, would have been much
shocked had he known how very little she cared about the
matter.
We shall have to consult you, Miss Elinor, in our
proceedings
,
said Mr. Hubbard, as they were sitting at the
dinner-table; perhaps you don't know it, but you will be
one of our stockholders, and much interested in our success,
I assure you.
My grandfather tried last night to give me some notions
on the subject, Mr. Hubbard; but I am afraid he was not
very successful.
Oh, I don't know that, said Mr. Wyllys; I shall make
quite a business woman of you, yet, Nelly. In fact, her
grandfather had taken the moment to assure Elinor that it was
high time she should have some just ideas on such subjects,
and insisted on her listening to all his explanations, and doing
her best to comprehend them. Elinor tried to be a docile
pupil, and really acquired some useful information, which
may appear singular to romantic young ladies, who set up
for broken-hearted; as her only object, however, was to
gratify her grandfather, we hope she will be forgiven for
anything so much out of character in a heroine.
It is a beautiful speculation, Miss Wyllys, observed Mr.
Taylor. I suppose you know enough about these things,
to be glad to hear that in a year or two, you will probably
realize two hundred per cent. on your lots in Water-Street,
where the dpt is to be built.
It all sounds very grandly, certainly, said Elinor, smiling.
We shall make a fortune for you, Miss Elinor, added
Mr. Hubbard. You will be the great lady of Longbridge.
I dare say, Nelly, you will find some way of spending
the money; young ladies know very well how to get rid of
it, let it come ever so fast.
Yes, sir, my daughters are very expert at that;
Emmeline
thinks nothing of giving fifty dollars for a flimsy
pocket-handkerchief
,
and as much for a flighty-looking hat. But
I've no objections; I'll tell you in confidence, that is what
we make our money for, Miss Elinorfor our children to
spend, added Mr. Hubbard, smiling good-naturedly. I
dare say you will find a right use for some of yours. It will
be in good hands, and I hope you may long enjoy it, said
he, making a bow to Elinor, as he drank off a glass of
Madeira.
Mr. Taylor, though he joined in the toast with some
affable remark, as usual, could not help regretting that so
much money, and consequently the power of making so
much more, should not be in the hands of one who could
turn it to better account than Miss Elinor Wyllys. He had
a very poor opinion of Mr. Wyllys's money-making abilities,
and thought him very unenterprising. That gentleman,
on the contrary, when brought in closer contact with Mr.
Taylor, began to have a clearer insight into his character,
and while he found him uncommonly clever, discovered that
several of his propositions betrayed anything but high
principles
.
He began to believe that Mr. Graham's dislike was
not ill-founded.
Mr. Hubbard, in the mean time, who had known Elinor
from a child, was thinking how he could say something
agreeable about love and beaux, supposed always to be
pleasant subjects to young ladies. He felt some doubts
about hinting at Hazlehurst, for he thought he had heard
the engagement was broken off. Happily for Elinor, the
party rose from table before anything had suggested itself.
At length Mrs. Wyllys's boy recovered, and was sent off
to school; and this rail-road matter was also satisfactorily
settled. As there was nothing more to detain the family in
the country, the Wyllyses went to Philadelphia, and took
possession of their lodgings for the winter.
CHAPTER XIX.
Had you not lately an intent, speak truly,
To go to Paris?
Shakspeare
.
Miss Taylor
paid her visit to Miss Lawrence. One
morning at breakfast she informed her parents that she
intended
to make an excursion to Boston. Whom was she
going to see? asked her father. Miss Lawrence, a young
lady who had passed three days at the Springs, at the hotel
where they stayed, and with whom she had become very
intimate. How long was she going to be absent?
inquired her mother. She thought of remaining a
fortnight
;
perhaps three weeks, if she found it very pleasant.
Mr. Powell, the young gentleman who was to be her escort,
had been introduced to her the evening previous at a ball,
and she thought him sufficiently fashionable in his
appearance
,
to have the honour of taking charge of herself and
her baggage. Her father observed that he would bring a
supply of money for her, when he came home to dinner; her
mother offered to look over her stockings. Everything thus
settled, the next morning Mr. Taylor and Miss Adeline drove
to the East-River wharf, where the Boston boat lay: here
they met with a slight difficulty; the gentleman engaged as
an escort could not be found; something had interfered with
his journey. Nothing was easier than to pick up another,
however. Mr. Taylor looked about him, saw a face he
knew slightly, and remembered the name that belonged to it.
Good morning, sir; are you going to Boston, Mr.
Hopkins?
Mr. Hopkins bowed, and declared that he was going to
Boston.
I have a daughter on board, sir; and the young
gentleman
who was to be her escort is not here; will you be so
good as to look after her?
Mr. Hopkins would be very happy to take charge of Miss
Taylor. But Adeline was almost in despair when she saw
him. How could one of the most dashing belles in New
York, consent to sit, in view of all the passengers,
side-by-side
with such a fat, rusty, snuffy, little old gentleman, who
wore green spectacles, and had a red silk handkerchief spread
on his knee? Suppose he should ask her to walk, how
could she pace up and down the promenade-deck
arm-in-arm
with such a figure? She, Adeline Taylor, whose
travelling
dress was faultless, and who had expected to have a
charming flirtation with Albert Powell! What could she
do? The fates, and the warning bell, decided the question;
it was too late to look out for some better-looking escort.
Mr. Taylor had hardly time to shake hands with his daughter,
and jump on the wharf, ere the whizzing of the steam had
ceased, and the plashing of the wheels was heard. Adeline
sank on a bench beside the rusty old gentleman for a moment,
but soon fled to the ladies' cabin for refuge.
During the whole jaunt, the fat, snuffy Mr. Hopkins was
kind and good-natured to Adeline, whenever she would allow
him. He thought she must be lonely, and she had been
obliged to confess that she knew no one on board; so the old
gentleman held it incumbent on him to be sociable. He took
some pea-nuts out of his pocket, and offered her a handful;
he gave her a couple of newspapers to read; asked her
questions about her family, brothers and sisters, and seemed
to look upon her as a school-girl. He was not the least
impressed
with her elegance and finery, and quite unaware of
her belle-ship; he even once called her my dear. Then,
the red silk handkerchief was always either on his knee, or
in his hand! It would be difficult to say whether Adeline
would have survived the mortification of such an escort, had
it not been for two circumstances, which changed the current
of her thoughts. There were several elegantly dressed
young ladies on board, and she soon succeeded in getting up
an intimacy with two of them; they exchanged cards, and
invitations to each other's houses, and through the same
means Adeline was introduced to a couple of beaux.
Between
breakfast and dinner, these new bosom-friends and
herself were inseparable, but, unfortunately, they were only
going half-way. The grief of separation was, however,
somewhat assuaged with Miss Taylor by sea-sickness, which,
as every one knows, is very destructive to sentiment and
sensibility. As long as they were tossing about near Point
Judith, the snuffy old gentleman, who was not in the least
sea-sick himself, was very faithful in his inquiries after
Adeline, and proposed several remedies to her, through the
stewardess. At length they reached Boston. As they drove
to the door of Miss Lawrence's father, Mr. Hopkins asked
how long she intended to remain in Boston? About a
fortnight, Adeline replied.
I shall be going back to New York about the same time,
my dear, and if you have not got some one more to your
taste, I'll take care of you on your way home, with
pleasure
,
said the fat old gentleman, sprinkling a handful of
snuff on Miss Taylor's grey silk, and brandishing the red
handkerchief at the same time.
Adeline's thanks were very faintly uttered; but gratitude
is not a fashionable virtue. It was fortunately so dark that
the rusty old gentleman could scarcely be seen as he took
leave of the elegant Miss Taylor at Mr. Lawrence's door,
and thus the young lady's mortification was over.
At the end of the three weeks, Adeline returned home,
bringing glowing accounts of the delights of Boston, and
talking a great deal about several delightful young
gentlemen
,
and occasionally mentioning a certain Theodore St.
Leger. She had heard that the Boston people were all
blue
;
but it must be a calumny to say so, for she had had a very
lively timeplenty of fun and flirtation. Miss Lawrence
returned with her, and of course a party was given in her
honour; there were some eighty persons present, all free
from the shackles of matrimony, apparently to give the
Boston young lady an opportunity of meeting a
representation
of her peers, the marriageable portion only of the New
York community. The evening was pronounced delightful
by Miss Lawrence; but all the guests were not of the same
opinion.
What an absurd custom it is, to have these young people
parties, said Harry Hazlehurst, who was on one of his
frequent visits to New York at the time, and was sitting in
Mrs. Graham's drawing-room, with that lady, Jane, and Mrs.
Stanley.
I agree with you; it is a bad plan, observed Mrs.
Stanley.
The first of the kind that I went to, after we came home,
made me feel ashamed of myself; though Dr. Van Horne,
I suppose, would accuse me of high-treason for saying so.
But most young people seem to enjoy them, said Mrs.
Graham.
It is paying us but a poor compliment to say so. One
would think the young people were afraid to laugh and talk
before their fathers and mothers. I really felt the other
night as if we were a party of children turned into the
nursery to play, and eat sugar-plums together, and make as
much noise as we pleased, without disturbing our elders. It
is a custom that appears to me as unnatural as it is puerile.
I hope you don't like it, he added, turning to Jane.
I care very little about it.
I am glad, at least, you do not defend it.
There are a few families you know, Harry, who never
give those kind of parties, observed Mrs. Stanley.
Hazlehurst's conscience felt a twinge, for he knew she
was thinking of Elinor, whom Miss Wyllys had never allowed
to give these
unmarried
parties; though she went to other
houses, when asked.
Miss Taylor had collected a tribe of Europeans of all
Vol. I.  17
sorts, last night; half-a-dozen Englishmen, and a vulgar
Frenchman, observed Harry, by way of changing the
conversation
.
I was surprised when my friend Townsend
told me he was invited; he did not know the Taylors, and
only arrived a week since.
Adeline invited him on purpose; Miss Lawrence is very
fond of foreigners, and you know Mr. Taylor calls on all the
strangers who arrive, said Jane.
Harry's lip curled a little.
How disagreeable that Captain Kockney is, continued
Jane.
More than disagreeable, replied Harry. I should not
have used so soft a word. I was not a little amused,
by-the-bye
,
to see how the fellow cooled off when Townsend and
Ellery came in. Your low set of English have such a
thorough awe of those a few degrees above them.
That Mr. Kockney is so very forward and vulgar, said
Mrs. Graham, that I wonder anybody can endure him. I
was disgusted with his manner on board the steamboat from
Longbridge, the other day.
He is beneath notice, said Harry.
I am not sure, either, that I like your friend, Mr. Ellery,
Harry.
Ellery is no friend of mine; but, pray, don't name him
in the same breath with that Kockney.
Oh, no, Mr. Ellery is a gentleman, evidently; but I
don't like his manners, there is something affected about him.
Certainly, he knows how to play the coxcomb, and
condescends
to do so quite too often. But I hope you like
Townsend; he is really a fine fellow.
Mr. Townsend has very different manners.
Yes, he has the best English manner; quite natural,
and not afraid to be civil. It is only the best of the English
who are quite free from nonsense. Ellery aims at effect,
half the time; Townsend has too much sense to do so.
Well, I really wonder, said Jane, how Mrs. Hilson
can endure that Captain Kockney.
The silly little soul knows no better.
To be sure, she is quite as ridiculous as he is.
She is really very silly, said Mrs. Stanley. It is a
pity that good, worthy Mr. Hubbard should have daughters
so little like himself, and so much like their mother.
She is very pretty, though, and dresses very well, said
Jane. Would you believe it, mamma, the other day, when
she called at Adeline's she wore a collar precisely like the
prettiest of those I brought from Paris.
Does she visit a great deal at Mrs. Taylor's? inquired
her mother.
Oh, no; Adeline can't endure her. But she cannot get
rid of her entirely, because they meet in the country.
Adeline
would like to drop the acquaintance altogether, but she
says Mrs. Hilson won't let her, because Mrs. Taylor's is the
only fashionable house where she visits.
These Taylors have really done wonders in the last few
years, said Mrs. Stanley, smiling.
They have been quite as persevering, I dare say, as Mrs
Hilson can be. They are a very vulgar, pushing family,
observed Mrs. Graham.
Jane coloured, and Harry feared she would shed a tear or
two. She was quite agitated. Dear Jane, he thought, what
an affectionate heart she has! By way of consoling her,
probably, and at the same time obtaining a better view of her
downcast face, he took a seat beside her. He even refrained
from making an observation which he had in petto, upon the
volatile character and manners of Miss Taylor, reserving it
for the future; determining that when they were man and
wife, Jane should have the full benefit of his opinion of her
friend.
Let it not be supposed that Harry was too sure of success,
in thus looking forward to his marriage with Jane as no very
improbable event. Since he had appeared in the family as
her suitor, her manner had been encouraging. There were
blushes and moments of embarrassment which looked very
favourably; and had he been obliged to proclaim all his
hopes, he would have confessed that the same flattering signs
had been observed by him in Paris, and had contributed not
a little to increase the warmth of his own feelings. There
was now a rival in the field, and one by no means to be
despised; but, although young de Vaux was good-looking,
agreeable, and very much in love, Jane did not seem disposed
to smile upon him. To do her justice, she was no coquette;
she was too indolent by nature, to labour very hard to secure
several conquests at the same time. Miss Graham was very
much admired, however, and was generally proclaimed the
beauty of the season; while Harry soon began to feel the
vanity of the favoured man.
But if Jane were a beauty, Adeline was a belle; a pretty,
and a rich belle, moreover, and Miss Taylor's train of
admirers
was much larger than that of Miss Graham. So
numerous, indeed, were her followers, that she was seldom
seen alone. If she visited, it was with an attendant beau;
if she were walking in Broadway, she had generally one on
each side of her; and at a party she was always talking to
half-a-dozen young men at a time. Miss Adeline was,
undeniably
,
a very popular belle. But all this homage was
sometimes attended with difficulties: one morning she wrote
an urgent note to her friend Jane, requesting that she would
come to see her, for she was unwell herself, and wanted
advice in a momentous affair.
The sympathising Jane had no sooner appeared, than
Adeline exclaimed,
I am so perplexed, that I really don't know what to do!
You must decide for me.
How can I help you? What is the matter? inquired
Jane.
Why you know to-night is Mrs. Thompson's great ball,
and I am going, of course; though I have a very bad cold.
Yes, you are really quite hoarse.
No wonder! I have been so pestered by serenades for
the last fortnight, that I have not had one good night's rest.
I had to get up and show myself at the window, until I
caught one cold after another.
Perhaps you had better not go to-night.
You may be sure I shan't stay at home unless I have to
keep my bed; I am already engaged for five dances. But
just look at the centre-table.
Jane turned her eyes towards the table, which was covered
with flowers.
How beautiful they are! she exclaimed, going to look
at them. One, two, four, six bouquets!Where did they
all come from?
Don't ask me; I am sick of the very sight of flowers!
This, with the variegated camellias, is beautiful!
Yes, it's pretty enough; but what shall I do with it?
Why, take it to the party this evening, of course.
No, indeed; it came from Mr. Howard, and I can't
endure him.
`Which have you chosen, then?
That is the very question; I don't know how to settle it.
Take this one with the passion-flower.
No, that I shan't; for it was sent just to spite me. Mr.
Grant sent itand I told him last night that I hated
passion-flowers
,
and everything else that is sentimental. What shall
I do?It is so provoking!
Suppose you put them all in water, and go without any.
My dear Jane, how you talk! That's what I never did
in my life. Go to a ball without a bouquet!I can't think
of such a thing!
We can untie them, and make up one ourselves, taking
the prettiest flowers from each.
That won't do, either; for it's only the gardeners that
can do up these things decently. I wouldn't, for the world,
carry one that looked as if I had made it up myself.
17*
Well, said Jane, in despair, I really don't know what
else to advise.
I do believe the young gentlemen have leagued together
to provoke me! And this is not all, there are three more in
water up-stairs.
You might take the first that came; perhaps that would
be the best plan.
Would you have me take this ridiculous-looking thing,
with only one camellia in it? No, indeed; and for a
moment the two young ladies sat down by the centre-table,
looking despondingly at each other and at the flowers.
If I could only take the one I like best, it would be the
easiest thing in the world; but, you know, all the other
gentlemen would be offended then.
Which do you like best? asked Jane.
Why this one, with the white camellias; it came from
Theodore St. Leger; he told me he would send one with
white flowers only. Adeline's colour rose a little as she
spoke, and as that was not a common occurrence with her,
it looked suspicious.
Did Mr. St. Leger dance with you last night?
Why, no, child, he never dances; I didn't see him dance,
all the time we were in Boston.
I thought you liked him, said Jane, with innocent
surprise.
I like him well enough, after a fashion; as well as one
can like a man who never dances, and don't talk much. He
is very stupid, sometimes, and dresses very badly too.
Is he handsome? asked Jane.
No, he is as ugly as he can be; I really think he looks
just a little like that old Mr. Hopkins, his uncle.
What in the world makes you like him then?
I am sure I don't know. But don't fancy I really care
about the man. He is going back to Boston next week, and
I don't suppose I shall ever see him again; but I thought I
would take his bouquet, to-night, because he was so polite to
me; and he will be there. Oh, my dear Jane, talking of
Boston, I have hit upon an idea!
Well, what is it?
I saw a girl at a party thereby-the-bye, it was Theodore
St. Leger's sisterwho had her dress trimmed with natural
flowers; that's just the thing for me! cried Adeline,
clapping
her hands. The difficulty thus happily removed, the
young ladies ran up stairs, to determine more fully upon
trimming a certain white crape with the eight bouquets,
divided for the purpose. The white one, the offering of Mr.
St. Leger, was reserved for the place of honour, in Adeline's
hand.
CHAPTER XX.
Thy young and innocent heart,
How is it beating? Has it no regrets?
Discoverest thou no weakness lurking there?
Rogers
.
Sisters
' children, though bearing different names, and
classed by the world in different families, are generally much
more alike than those of brothers; they are apt to have more
habits, tastes, and feelings in common. And the reason is
evident; it is usually the mother who controls the internal
family policy, who gives the colouring to what may be called
the family atmosphere. The father may pass a statute once
in a while, but the common-law which regulates the
everyday
proceedings of the little community flows from the
mother; and we all know that the character is moulded
rather by daily practice in trifles, than by a few isolated
actions of greater importance in themselves. The aims and
views which people carry with them through life, generally
spring up from seeds received in the nursery, or at the family
fire-side. Even with men this is the case. The father may
inculcate this or that political creed into his son, he may
direct his choice to this or that profession; but the manner
in which the youth carries out his political principles, the
way in which he fills his profession, will depend on the
impulses and motives cultivated in childhood, and early
youth; for it is then that the character receives its bias.
The mother's influence and example are often to be traced
in those minute shades of taste and opinion, which are the
foundation of our partialities, or our dislikes; and, of course,
the daughters of a family, from being more constantly subject
to this influence, imbibe a larger share of it. It is
immaterial
whether the mother be aware of the importance of her
duties, of the weight of this responsibility, or not; for good
or for evil, the effect will still be felt, though varying, of
course, in different circumstances.
Elinor had not seen her cousin, Mary Van Alstyne, her
mother's niece, for several years, and she now met her in
Philadelphia with great pleasure. Miss Van Alstyne was
some five or six years older than herself; this difference in
years had, indeed, been the chief reason why they had never
yet been very intimate. But the same distance which
separates
girls of twelve and eighteen, is, of course, less thought
of at twenty and six-and-twenty, when both are fairly launched
into the world. Mary Van Alstyne and Elinor found much
to like in each other on a closer acquaintance; and Miss
Wyllys observing that the two cousins suited each other
so well, drew them together as much as possible, in order
that Elinor might have some one to fill the empty places of
her former companions, Jane and Harry.
Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst was a near neighbour of the
Wyllyses
in Philadelphia; but Elinor had too much dread of
meeting Harry, to go there often; and it was only when she
knew that he was in New York, that she went to his brother's.
The change in their position was too recent to allow of her
seeing him with composure; their family connexion, and
the intimate terms upon which they had hitherto lived, only
made their present estrangement much more awkward than
usual. Elinor tried to think it fortunate that he should now
be so often in New York.
The first time he was in Philadelphia after the Wyllyses
were settled there for the winter, Elinor escaped seeing him.
As she came in one morning from a ride with her
grandfather
,
she found his card on the table. It told the whole
story of what had passed; for she could not remember his
having ever left a card at their house before; he had been
as much at home there as herself, until the last six weeks.
The sight of it caused her a very painful feeling, and did
away all the good effect of the pleasant ride she had just
taken on the banks of the Schuylkill. As she walked
slowly up-stairs to change her habit, her eyes filled with
tears; and had she been endowed with the proper degree of
romance for a regular heroine, she would probably have
passed the morning in hysterical sobs. But as she had quite
as much good sense, as fancy and feeling, she was by no
means romantic; she had never fainted but once in her life;
and although it must be confessed she had wept during the
last few weeks, yet it was always in spite of herself, at
moments when the tears were forced from her by some sudden
recollection of the past, or some distressing glimpse of the
future. On the present occasion, instead of encouraging
solitary grief, she returned to the drawing-room, and read
aloud to her aunt, who was busy with her needle.
But Harry's second visit to Philadelphia was not to pass
without their meeting. Mr. Wyllys, Miss Agnes, and Elinor
were spending the evening at the house of a friend, when,
to the surprise and regret of all parties, Hazlehurst walked
in with one of the young men of the family, with whom he
was intimate. It was the first time they had met since the
alarm on the piazza at Wyllys-Roof. Poor Elinor, at the
first glance, when the door opened, turned deadly pale, as she
always did when agitated. Harry, as he crossed the room to
make his bow to the lady of the house, felt excessively
uncomfortable
;
when he turned, not a little embarrassed, towards the
rest of the party, he received a slight and cool movement of
recognition from Mr. Wyllys, who was standing at a corner of
the fire-place. Miss Agnes made an effort to say good evening,
in her usual tone; and Harry replied that he was very glad
to find they were to be in Philadelphia for the winter, words
which were as far from the truth as possible. Elinor would
have given much to look and speak as calmly as her aunt;
but she could only bow in silence, for at the moment she
dared not trust her voice. The lady of the house, who knew
very well how to account for a meeting which seemed very
ceremonious between near connexions, who had always been
so intimate, did her best to make matters go off well; and
her son, who was also in the secret, rattled away to Elinor
to the best of his ability. But there was a very perceptible
touch of cool disapprobation in Mr. Wyllys's manner, and a
something that was not quite natural, in the tones of Miss
Agnes's voice. Harry felt as if he were doing penance, and
he felt, moreover, as if he richly deserved it. But the worst
was to come. There was another lady present, a New
Yorker, who had lately seen Hazlehurst very often with
the Grahams, in his character of Jane's admirer, and she
innocently asked him when he was going to return to New
York. In a day or two, he replied. You will not
leave the post vacant very long, I dare say, observed the
lady. Harry's answer was not very distinctly heard, and he
coloured as much as it is in the power of man to do. The lady
happily observed how much he was annoyed, and changed
the conversation. Hazlehurst was not in a mood to pay
a long visit: he soon rose to take leave. Elinor, in the mean
time, made a great effort for self-command. She knew that
she was the injured party, and yet she felt superior to all the
littleness of resentmentshe acquitted Harry and Jane of
all intentional trifling with her feelings. The gentle, quiet
dignity of her manner gradually expressed what was passing
in her mind. As Harry passed near her, and bowed,
collecting
all her self-possession, she wished him good-evening,
with a calm, sweet voice.
It was now Hazlehurst's turn to be much the most
embarrassed
of the two; he bowed, and muttered something
about calling, in a voice much less clear than her's had been;
then fairly giving up the matter in despair, he quitted the
ground with another bow. On leaving the house, he walked
rapidly down Walnut-Street, very much dissatisfied with
himself, and out of humour with his friend, for having brought
him into such an awkward scene.
The next day, when Elinor thought over what had passed,
she felt relieved that the first meeting, which she had so
much dreaded, was over; although she knew it must be a
long time before she could see Jane and Harry with perfect
composure; she knew there must be other unpleasant
moments
in store for her. There was no danger but that Elinor
would do all in her power to subdue her feelings for Harry,
and yet she sometimes reproached herself with having done
too little; her interest in him was still too strong. She
shrunk sensitively from longer encouraging any weakness
for him; it had now become a want of delicacy to do so, it
would soon be almost sinful. She knew that if she did not
succeed in the endeavour it would be her own fault only;
for her whole education had taught her that there was no
passion, of whatever nature, too strong to be conquered by
reason and religion, when their aid was honestly sought.
Miss Agnes, on the contrary, who knew how unexpectedly,
and how deeply, Elinor's feelings had been wounded, was
fearful that her adopted child was making too great an effort
for self-control; with a girl of her principles and disposition
there was danger of this. Elinor, since the first day or two,
had sensitively avoided every approach to the subject when
conversing with her aunt. Miss Agnes knew that time
alone could teach her the lesson of forgetfulness, and she
now dreaded some reaction; although admiring Elinor's
courage and resolution, she wished her occasionally to give
a more natural vent to her feelings. It struck her that the
time for one open conversation on the subject had come, and
the result proved that her opinion was correct. Elinor threw
off a constraint that was not natural to her character, and
which had been kept up from an exaggerated sense of duty.
She now spoke with perfect frankness, nothing was
concealed
;
grief, regrets, struggles, all were confided to her aunt,
whose sympathy was greateful to her, while the advice given
with kindness and good sense, was of real service.
Many young people who knew Miss Wyllys, would have
smiled at the idea of her being a good counsellor on such an
occasion, for her own life, though useful and happy, had
been quite uneventful. The death of her mother, and the
marriage of her brothers and sister, had left her, when still a
young and pretty woman, the only companion and solace of
her father. These duties were soon increased by the charge
of her orphan niece, and her time and attention had since
then seemed engrossed by these cares and pleasures. Miss
Wyllys was actually never known to have had a regular
suitor. Whether she might not have had her share of
declared
admirers had she chosen to be encouraging, we cannot
say; it is a subject upon which we have no authorities.
Of course Miss Agnes could not be expected to know
anything about love, beyond what she had learned from
books, or from observation. She was, nevertheless, a much
better adviser than many a younger and more experienced
friend. Where the head and the heart are both in the right
place, instinct soon teaches us how to sympathize with our
fellows in all troubles that really belong to our nature.
It appeared to Elinor as if, in future, there would be an
additional tie between her aunt and herself; for she looked
forward to leading a single life, hoping to pass her days
like Miss Agnes, in that sphere of contented usefulness
which seemed alloted to her.
When Elinor had returned to her own room, after the
conversation to which we have alluded, she went to a
writing-desk
,
and drew from it a letter. It was the same she had
received on her seventeenth birth-day. It was from her
mother. During the lingering illness which caused her
death, Mrs. Wyllys, deeply anxious for the welfare of her
orphan daughter, had written several of these letters, adapted
to her child's capacity at different ages, and placed them in
the hands of Miss Agnes, with the request they might be
given to Elinor at the dates marked on the envelope of each.
They had proved a precious legacy for the young girl, and
a guide to Miss Agnes in her education; for the aunt had
never forgotten that she was the mother's representative only;
Elinor having always been taught to give the first place to her
parent's memory. It seemed, indeed, as if her mother's
spirit had never ceased to linger near her, exerting its silent
influence. The letter to which Elinor attached so high a
value is given below.
Wyllys-Roof
,
August
13
th
, 18.
My Own Beloved Child
,
You will not receive this letter until you have reached
the age of womanhood, years after your mother has been
laid in her grave.
To separate from you, my darling child, has cost your
mother a bitter pang. There is no severer trial of faith to
a Christian woman, than to leave her little ones behind her,
in a world exposed to evil and sorrow; and yet, although
so near death myself, it is my wish that you may live, dearest,
to taste all that is good in life. Few mothers are blessed in
death, as I am, with the power of leaving their orphans to
such kind and judicious guardians as your grandfather and
aunt; should they be spared, you will scarcely feel the loss
of your parents. Oh, how fervent is my prayer that they
Vol. I.  18
may live to guard, to cherish you! And when the task they
have so piously assumed is fully completed, may they long
enjoy the fruits of their cares!
It is with singular feelings that I write to you as a woman,
my child, and appeal to thoughts and sentiments, of which
you are at this moment so utterly unconscious; sitting, as
you now are, at my feet, amid your playthings, too busy with
a doll, to notice the tears that fall upon these last lines I shall
ever have it in my power to address to you. But the hope
that this letter may, one day, long after I have left you, be a
tie between us, my Elinor, is grateful to your mother's heart,
and urges me to continue my task. I have a double object
in writing these letters; I wish to be remembered by you,
dear, and I wish to serve you.
During the last few months, since my health has failed,
and since you, my child, have been the chief object of
interest to me in this world, I have often endeavoured to
pass over in my mind, the next dozen years, that I might
fancy my child, what I trust she will then be, qualified in
every essential point to act for herself, in the position to
which she belongs. I trust that when this, my last letter, is
placed in your hands, you will already have learned to feel
and acknowledge the important truths that I have
endeavoured
to impress on you, in those you have previously
received
.
You are already convinced, I trust, that without a
religious foundation, any superstructure whatever must be
comparatively worthless. I should be miserable, indeed, at
this moment, if I could not hope that sincere, single-hearted
piety will be the chief influence of your life; without it, you
could never know true happiness, or even peace. Rest
assured, my child, that while it sweetens every blessing, it
soothes under every evil. Many have given the same
testimony
when they stood, like your mother, within the shadow
of death. I have every reason, my beloved daughter, to
hope that under the guidance of an humble, sincere
Christian
,
like your aunt, you also will arrive at the same blessed
conviction; I know that so long as she lives, her example,
her prayers, her vigilance will never be wanting. I have
every reason to believe that you will be led to seek that
which is never earnestly sought in vain.
I must be brief, dear child, lest my strength should fail.
From the many thoughts that crowd upon me, I can only
select a few, which my own experience has taught me to
value as important. In the first place, let me warn you never
to forget the difference between Christian education, and all
others. Remember that Christian education has for its
foundation
the heart-felt conviction of the weakness of human
nature; for a being bearing the name of a Christian to lose
sight of this truth, is the grossest of all inconsistencies. The
great and the learned among those who are merely
philosophers
,
preach, as though to know what is good, and to
practise
it, were equally easy to mankind. But the Christian
alone knows that he must look beyond himself for guidance,
and for support. He knows only too well, that there are
times when the practice of some plain and evident duty,
costs his feeble nature a severe strugglein no instance will
he dare trust his own strength alone. He knows that even in
those cases where duty is also a pleasure, he must still be
watchful and humble, lest he fall. One would think this
truth so obvious, from daily observation, as to be undeniable;
but it is now the fashion to laud human nature, to paint
flattering pictures only. Humility is thought debasing; but
Truth alone is honourable, and Humility is Truth. You
will find the actions of those who acknowledge this truth,
more honourable to the human race, than the deeds of those
who deny it. The true dignity of human nature consists,
not in shutting our eyes to the evil, but in restraining it;
which, with our Maker's help, we may all do, for the
blessing
of our Creator is still within our reach, still vouchsafed
to the humble Christian. If such be your views, my daughter,
you will be prepared to find difficulties in acquiring and
practising those virtues which it is the duty of life to
cultivate
;
you will be prepared to meet those difficulties with
the sincere humility of a Christian, and with Christian
exertion.
My child, love the Truth, and the Truth only.
Cultivate daily a pious, thankful, humble disposition.
Love those near you heartily; live for them as well as
for yourself.
Eschew all envy, and petty jealousies, and revalries;
there is perhaps no other evil that so often poisons our daily
blessings.
Cultivate your judgment. Never forget the difference
between things of importance and trifles; yet remember that
trifles have also their value. Never lose sight of the
difference
between form and spirit; yet remember that in this
material world, the two should seldom be put asunder. The
true substance will naturally have its shadow also.
Cultivate a sweet, frank, cheerful temper, for your own
sake, and for the sake of those you love.
Cultivate your abilities in every way that comes
naturally
within your reach; it is seldom worth while for a
woman to do more than this. In all you learn, aim at giving
pleasure to others, aim at being useful to them, as well as
at improving your own faculties.
Enjoy thankfully all the blessings of life; and they are
innumerable.
There is one subject, of some importance to you
individually
,
my child, which I have not yet alluded to in either
of my letters; I have purposely deferred it until you will be
better fitted to understand me. You will have one personal evil
to contend against, my dear Elinor; your face will be plain,
your features will be homely, darling. It is a weakness, my
child, and yet I regret you should suffer from this
disadvantage
;
rest assured, that in every little mortification to
which you may be exposed, your mother, had she lived,
would have felt with you. I trust that this will be the first
time your attention will be seriously fixed upon the subject,
and that as a child you will scarcely have thought upon it.
Let us then, dear, look upon the matter together for a moment,
calmly and steadily; we will not blind ourselves to the
advantages
of beauty, neither will we exaggerate the evils of a
want of it. You will soon discover, from your own
observation
,
that beauty in women, as in children, is delightful in
itself; it throws a charm over the words and actions of the
favoured person. In a worldly sense it is also a woman's
power; where other qualifications are equal, you will often
observe that beauty alone confers a striking superiority. In
some respects its advantages are even greater than are usually
allowed, in others again they are far less. Were we to judge
by the space it fills in general observation, and in
conversation
,
we should believe it the one all-important qualification
in women, that nothing else can be compared with it. But
to adopt this opinion would be grossly to exaggerate its
importance
.
Nor can we believe, on the other hand, what some
prudent writers for the young have affirmed, that the
superiority
of beauty is only momentary; that the eyes tire of a
beautiful face which they see daily, that in all cases it vanishes
with early youth. No, my child, I do not wish you to
believe
this, for I cannot believe it myself. For years, the
beauty of my sister Elizabeth has been a daily source of
pleasure to me, and I doubt not to others also. My aunt,
Mrs. Graham, though past fifty, is still a handsome woman,
and her appearance must be pleasing to every one who meets
her; while, on the contrary, people still amuse themselves
at the expense of Miss Townley, whose face is strikingly
plain. Hundreds of examples might be cited to prove that
the charm of beauty does not generally vanish so soon, that
one does not tire of it so easily. And then if a woman lose
her beauty entirely, still the reputation of having once
possessed
it, gives her a sort of advantage in the eyes of the
world. If mere notoriety be an advantage, and in the
opinion of the worldly it is so, the superiority of beauty
over ugliness lasts longer than life; many women are
remembered
,
18*
who had nothing but beauty to recommend them to
the notice of posterity. But observe, my child, that if these
advantages are evident, they are chiefly of a worldly nature.
A beautiful woman may receive general admiration, and that
homage which gratifies vanity, but she must depend on other
qualities if she wish to be respected, if she wish to be loved
through life. I hope, my child, you will always be superior
to that miserable vanity which thirsts for common admiration,
which is flattered by every offering, however low, however
trivial. I trust that the mere applause of the world will
have no influence upon your heart or your understanding.
Remember what it is that we call the worldit is a ground
governed by a compromise between the weaknesses of the
good among us, and the virtues of the bad; the largest
portion
of vanity and folly  sometimes even vice  mingled
with the least portion of purity and wisdom that a
community
bearing a Christian name will tolerate. You, I trust,
will learn to seek a higher standard.
If borne in a right spirit, my dear Elinor, the very want
of beauty, or of any other earthly good, may be the means
of giving you the benefit of far higher blessings. If it make
you more free from vanity, from selfishness, it will make you
far happier, even in daily life. It may dispose you to enjoy
more thankfully those blessings actually in your possession,
and to make a better use of them.
Under this and every other disadvantage, my child,
remember
two things: to give the evil its just importance only,
and to make a right use of it.
I trust that your temper will be such, that you will not
for a moment feel any inclination to repine that others should
enjoy a blessing denied to you, my love. Refrain even
from wishing for that which Providence has withheld; if you
have a right faith, you will be cheerful and contented; if you
are really humble, you will be truly thankful.
Do all in your power, my Elinor, towards making your
home, wherever it may be, a happy one; it is our natural
shelter from the world. If in public you meet with
indifference
and neglect, you can surely preserve the respect of
those who know you; and the affection of your friends may
always be gained by those quiet, simple virtues, within the
reach of every one.
In one way, my dearest child, the want of beauty may
affect your whole career in lifeit will very probably be the
cause of your remaining single. If I thought you would be
united to a husband worthy of your respect and affection, I
should wish you to marry; for such has been my own lot in
lifeI have been happy as a wife and a mother. But I am
well aware that this wish may be a weakness; the blessings
of Providence are not reserved for this or that particular
sphere. The duties and sorrows of married life are often
the heaviest that our nature knows. Other cares and other
pleasures may be reserved for you, my child. In every
civilized Christian community there have always been
numbers
of single women; and where they have been properly
educated, as a class they have been respectablenever more
so than at the present day. They often discharge many of
the most amiable and praiseworthy duties of life.
Understand
me, my child; I do not wish to urge your remaining
single; that is a point which every woman must decide for
herself, when arrived at years of discretion; but I would
have you view a single life with sufficient favour to follow
it cheerfully, rather than to sacrifice yourself by becoming
the wife of a man whom you cannot sincerely respect.
Enter life prepared to follow, with unwavering faith in
Providence
,
and with thankfulness, whichever course may be
allotted to you. If you remain single, remember that your
peace is more in your own hands than if marriedmuch
more will depend solely on the views and dispositions you
encourage. As appearance has generally so much influence
over men, and marriage is therefore a less probable event to
you than to others, my love, let your mother caution you to
watch your feelings with double care; be slow to believe
any man attached to you, unless you have the strongest
proof of it.
Whatever be your position, never lose sight, even on
trifling occasions, of common sense, and good-feeling.
Remember
,
in any case, to guard carefully against the peculiar
temptations of your lot, to bear patiently its evils, and to
enjoy thankfully its peculiar blessings.
There are many things that I should still wish to say to
you, my beloved daughter; and yet I know that the cautions
I give may be unnecessary, while other evils, which I have
never feared, may befall you. My inability to guide you as
I wish, my darling child, directs us both to a higher source
of wisdom and love. Let us both, at all times, implicitly
place our trust where it can never fail, though blessings be
not bestowed in the way we fond creatures would choose.
[Here followed a sentence, in words too solemn to be
transferred to pages as light as these.]
Love your aunt, your second mother, truly and gratefully.
She has already bestowed on you many proofs of kindness,
and she has always been a faithful friend to your father, and
to your mother. Love the memory of your parents, my
child; think of us sometimesthink of your fatherthink
of your mother. Honour their memory by a recollection of
their instructions, by a well-spent life. Since your birth, my
child, I have scarcely had a hope or a fear, unconnected with
you; if I were to ask to live, it would be only for your
sake, my darling daughter.
Your mother's tenderest blessing rests upon you, my
beloved Elinor, through life!
Mary Radcliffe Wyllys
.
This letter had been often read and studied by Elinor
with the gratitude and respect it deserved, as a legacy from
her mother; but lately she had been disposed to enter more
fully into the feelings by which it had been dictated. Every
word which applied to her present situation, sunk deeply into
her heart.
CHAPTER XXI.
Merrily, merrily dance the bells,
Swiftly glides the sleigh!
Newspaper Verses
.
Early
in December, a new glazed card was to be seen on
most of the fashionable tables in New York. It was of the
particular tint most in favour that season, whether bluish or
pinkish we dare not affirm, for fear of committing a serious
anachronism, which might at once destroy, with many
persons
,
all claim to a knowledge of the arcana of fashionable
life. Having no authorities at hand to consult, the point
must be left to the greater research of the critical reader.
This card bore the name of T.
Tallman Taylor
; but
whether in Roman or Italic characters we dare not say, for
the same reason which has just been frankly confessed. It
was, however, a highly fashionable bit of pasteboard, as
became the representative of a personage who returned to
New York, claiming the honours of fashion himself. This
was no less a person than the son of Mr. Pompey Taylor.
But the T. Tallman Taylor, whose whole appearance was
pronounced unexceptionable by the New York belles, from
the points of his boots to the cut of his moustaches, was a
very different individual from the good-looking, but
awkward
,
ungainly youth, introduced to the reader two or three
years since, at Wyllys-Roof. He had, in the mean time,
learned how to stand, how to sit, how to walk, how to talk
in a drawing-room. He had learned what to do with his
cane and his hat, how to manage his pocket-handkerchief
and his gloves; branches of knowledge which an American
who sets about acquiring them, usually learns quite rapidly.
He was also very much improved in riding and dancing, and
was said to fence well. These, with the addition of a much
better French accent, were the principal changes perceptible
to the ladies, who pronounced them all for the better. Among
the young men he was soon found to be an excellent judge of
Chateau Margaux and Rdesheimer; some also thought him
knowing in horse-flesh, while others doubted his
qualifications
in that respect. His father, moreover, soon discovered
that he had become an adept in the art of spending money;
among his intimates, cards, and the billiard-table, with other
practices of that description, were hinted at, as the way in
which he got rid of his dollars. But as these were subjects
not mentioned in general society, it was as yet the initiated
only, who were aware of young Taylor's Paris habits of this
kind.
His father had, of late years, learned to set too high a
value upon the world, and everything worldly, not to be
much gratified by the change that had taken place in his son.
As for Adeline, she gloried in his six-feet and his black
moustaches, his Paris waistcoat and London boots; while
his honest-hearted mother would have loved him just as
much under any other metamorphosis he had chosen to
assume. Such as he was, young Taylor soon became quite
a favourite beau with the New Yorkers, and was invited to
most houses. He proved himself quite a ladies' man; no
lazy, grumbling dandy, but a smiling, assiduous beau. He
had not been in New York a month, before he was known
to have sent a number of bouquets to different belles, and
was supposed to have given more than one serenade to his
sister's friend, Miss Hunter.
The last day of December, all New York was set in
motion
by a fall of snow, sufficient to allow of pretty good
sleighing for four-and-twenty hours. Like such occasions in
general, it became a sort of holiday. And really, the novelty,
the general movement, the bustle and gaiety, the eagerness
to enjoy the pleasure while it lasts, always render such
scenes very enlivening. Every vehicle with runners, and
every animal bearing the name of a horse, are put in
requisition
for the day. The dashing sleighs crowded with
gaily-dressed
people, the smiling faces and flying feathers of the
ladies, the rich cloths and furs, the bright colours of the
equipages, and the inspiriting music of the merry bells, give
to Broadway, at such times, quite a carnival look. The
clear, bracing air disposes people to be cheerful; even the
horses feel the spirit of the moment; they prance their heads
proudly, and shake the bells about their necks, as if delighted
with the ease and rapidity of their motion; sympathizing
foot-passengers stop to give their friends a nod, and follow
their rapid course with good-natured smiles. Young people
and children are collected for a frolic, and family parties
hurry off to drink coffee and mulled wine, to eat plum-cake
and waffles at the neighbouring country-houses. It is
altogether
a gay, cheerful sight, enjoyed with all the more zest
from its uncertainty.
Hazlehurst was delighted, as he went to his window, the
morning in question, to find the roofs and pavements covered
with snow. For several years he had had no sleighing, and
he promised himself a very pleasant day. Mrs. Stanley
was going to remain quietly at home. He sent to a
livery-stable
to secure a good horse and a pretty cutter for himself,
and immediately after breakfast hurried off to Mrs. Graham's
lodgings, with the hope of obtaining Jane as a companion.
And who knows, thought he, what may happen before
evening.
He had just reached Mrs. Graham's door, when a very
dashing sleigh, drawn by four fine horses, drew up from the
opposite direction. Young Taylor was in the coachman's
seat; Miss Hunter, Adeline, and a quiet-looking young man,
whom we shall introduce as Theodore St. Leger, were in
the sleigh. Miss Adeline threw off her over-cloak, and as
she gave her hand to Mr. St. Leger, to jump from the sleigh,
called out to Harry in her usual shrill voice,
Good morning, Mr. Hazlehurst, you are exact at the
render-vous, for of course you got my note. But you ought
to have brought a lady with you; you mustn't run away with
Jane; she is to be of our party in the sleigh, do you hear?
continued the young lady, trying hard to look pretty and
positive, at the same time. I hope you didn't mean to ask
her to go with you.
Yes, I did, replied Harry, rather stoutly. Miss
Graham
told me the other day, she quite longed for sleighing,
and made something very like a promise to go with me if
we had any snow.
Oh, but not to-day; I must have her in the sleigh with
me! Now, Jane, dear, continued the young lady, tripping
into the drawing-room, followed by her brother and Harry,
put on your hat at once, that's a good girl; we wouldn't
miss having you for the world.
Harry had often been provoked with Adeline's constant
appropriation of Jane to herself, when they were together;
and he determined, if he could prevent it, she should not
succeed this time.
Miss Taylor is very decided, he said, but so am I.
And I think you must remember you were pledged to me
for the first sleighing, if we were so fortunate as to have any.
It's no such thing, I'm sure;is it, Jane?
Pray, remember we are two to one, Miss Graham, said
young Taylor, on the other side, in an insinuating voice.
But we can all go together, said Jane, blushing, and
scarcely knowing what to do.
If Mrs. Graham were here, added Harry, I think she
would certainly trust you with me. I have a very good
horse, one that I have driven all along, and he is perfectly
safe.
So are ours, all four of them, said Adeline; and I'm
sure there must be more safety with four safe horses, than
with one!
Perfectly safe, Miss Graham, I assure you, added young
Taylor. Of course I should not press you unless I felt
sure you would run no risk.
Pshaw! said Adeline. Why should we stand here,
talking about the risk and danger, like so many old
greybeards
.
Put on your hat, dear, that's a darling, without any
more palaver. Anne Hunter and Mr. St. Leger are waiting
for us at the door; you know we are going to Bloomingdale,
to lunch, at Mrs. Hunter's. We shall have a charming
time; and Mr. Hazlehurst is going with us too. Of course
you got my note, she added, turning to Harry,
No, I did not; but I should have been obliged to decline
your invitation, Miss Taylor, said Hazlehurst, bowing a
little stiffly. I have made arrangements for going on
Long-Island
.
Oh, that's a pity; I am really sorry, for I wanted you
to be of our party; only I couldn't have you run away with
my friend Jane. Silence gives consent, Jane. You didn't
answer my note, this morning.
Perhaps I had better not go at all, said Jane, not a little
perplexed. Mamma is not at home, and will not know
what has become of me.
Nonsense, child; Mrs. Graham will know you are in
very good hands. You have been out with me a hundred
times before, and you surely don't think there is any more
danger because Tallman is of the party.
I hope not, added young Taylor, in an insinuating
manner; I'm a first-rate whip, Miss Graham.
Now, just tell the truth; didn't you mean to go with me,
before Mr. Hazlehurst came in? said Adelineno fibbing,
mind.
I only received your note ten minutes since, replied
Jane; but I did think of going with you.
I should like to know why you hesitate, then. First
come, first served. Now, the best thing you can do, Mr.
Hazlehurst, is to change your mind, and ask one of the Miss
Howards, and join our party, too. I really wish you would!
You are very good, said Harry, coldly; but I must
beg you to excuse me.
Vol. I.  19
Jane allowed herself to be shawled and cloaked by young
Taylor, and the affair was settled. But Harry thought she
did not seem quite satisfied with herself, for she changed
colour several times, and he even remarked that her fingers
trembled as she tied the strings of her hat. This rather
softened his feelings towards her; but he still felt extremely
provoked with the meddling Adeline, and her officious
brother. As he did not wish to play the worsted man,
however
,
he tried to put a good face on the matter, and
accompanied
the party down-stairs, helped the ladies into the
sleigh, wished them a pleasant drive, and went off himself,
at a rapid pace, towards the Long-Island ferry.
He was exceedingly out of humour with Adeline, and
reproached Jane not a little for allowing herself to be so often
guided by her trifling friend. The occurrence of the
morning
,
hastened his determination to bring matters to a
conclusion
.
That very evening should decide the point. He
must have been more than modest to have doubted the result;
Jane's manner he had long thought just what he could wish
from one so little demonstrative as herself. Hubert de Vaux,
it is true, had been very assiduous of late, but Jane had
never given him any sign of preference, sufficient to excite
Harry's jealousy. Mr. Graham was expected every day
from Charleston, to pass the remainder of the winter with
his family; as he had already given one daughter to the elder
Hazlehurst, and no serious objection could be raised against
Harry, his prospects were very promising. Before long,
the gentle, lovely Jane would be his own; his would be the
enviable lot, of carrying off the beautiful prize.
Hazlehurst had time to make these reflections, and disperse
his ill-humour, before he reached the wharf at Brooklyn.
Here he met Charlie Hubbard, whom he had not seen for
some time, not, indeed, since his rupture with the Wyllyses.
Charlie's greeting was not quite as warm as usual; he did
not seem as much pleased at this unexpected meeting, and
the offer of a seat in Harry's cutter, as one might have
supposed
.
Hazlehurst was so cordial, however, and urged the
young painter so much to take a turn with him on the
Island, that, after a little hesitation, Hubbard accepted.
Come, Charlie; I am sure you haven't any very good
reason for not making the most of the snow, like the rest of
us.
Perhaps not, said Charlie; and he took his seat with
Harry.
Hubbard gave a good account of himself and his family.
He had received several orders; and his pet picture of the
moment was going on finely. His youngest sister was in
town, taking music lessons, to fit her for her future
occupation
;
and he had just sent Miss Patsey a pair of globes for
her school, as a New Year's gift; the most expensive
present
,
by-the-bye, Charlie had ever made in his life.
I feel quite rich, said the young man, since I pocketed
a hundred a-piece for my two views of Nahant. To be
sure, I never expect to make a fortune; if I can earn enough
to support my mother and sister, and paint only such
pictures
as I please, that is all I want of the good things of this
world.
It's all very well to say so now, Charlie, that you have
received your two hundred; but wait till you are the great
Mr. Hubbard, and expect two thousand for your last view of
Coney-Island.
That day will never come, to me, or to any other man,
perhaps, in this country, replied young Hubbard. I go to
work with my eyes open, as you well know. My uncles
have talked the matter over with me a hundred times, if they
have once; they have showed me what I could do if I took to
making money, and what I could not do if I took to painting.
They have offered to help me on; Mr. Taylor would take
me into his counting-house, to-morrow; and Hilson offers to
make me an auctioneer. But I have chosen my profession,
and I shall abide by it. I have no wish for wealth. I should
never be tempted to sell my soul for moneyno, nor my
good name, or my independence: for I do not feel willing to
barter even my time and tastes for riches. I can honestly
say, money has no charms for me. A comfortable
subsistence
,
in a very moderate way, is all I should ask for.
I know it, Hubbard, and I honour your decision, said
Hazlehurst, warmly. It is impossible, however, but that
genius like yours should make its way; and I hope you
may meet with all the success you deserve, even though it
bring you more money than you wish for: one of these days
when there is a Mrs. Hubbard, you may want more than
you require now.
A shade of feeling passed over the young artist's fine face,
as Harry carelessly uttered these words; it seemed to spring
from some painful thought. It was unobserved by
Hazlehurst
,
however, who was not looking at his companion at the
moment. Charlie was soon roused by Harry's inquiries as
to his plans for travelling in Europe. The young men then
spent a pleasant hour in discussing different works of the
great masters, which Hubbard, as yet, knew only from
engravings
and books. Surrounded by snow and ice, they
talked over the atmospheres of Italy and Greece.
CHAPTER XXII.
Happy New-Year!
The
streets had been cleared of the snow for New-Year's
day, by a thaw, and a hard shower in the night. The sun
rose bright and clear; and, as usual, early in the morning,
that is to say morning in its fashionable sense, the greater
part of the male population of the town were in motion,
hurrying in all directions towards the houses of their female
friends and relatives. It appeared as if the women had
suddenly deserted the city, and the men were running about,
half-distracted, in pursuit of them. After the markets and
churches were closed, few indeed were the females to be seen
in the streets; while, on the contrary, troops of men of all
ages, were hurrying over the side-walks of Broadway,
usually enlivened by the gay dresses and bright faces of the
ladies. There were young men running a race against time,
carrying lists in their hands with an impossible number of
visits to be paid during the day; there were boys taking
their first steps in this yearly course of gallantry; there were
elderly men walking more leisurely from one favoured house
to another. All, but a few grumblers here and there, looked
smiling and good-humoured. As the black-coated troop
hastened hither and thither, they jostled one another, now
nodding, now shaking hands; here, old friends passing
without
seeing each other; there, a couple of strangers salute
one another in the warmest manner. The doors of the houses
seemed to open of themselves; men were going in, men
were coming out. The negroes looked more lustrous and
light-hearted than ever; the Paddies, cleaner and more
bothered; the regular Knickerbockers, to the manner born,
were, of course, in their element.
We have heard nice calculations as to the precise number
of calls, that an able-bodied, well-trained New-Year's visiter
can accomplish between midnight and midnight; allowing,
of course, a couple of hours for the toilette, and a moment
to snatch a mouthful at breakfast and dinner: it is affirmed,
however, that as great generals have passed days of battle
without food, so your chivalrous Knickerbocker should be
willing to forego, on such an occasion, even a sight of the
roast turkey and cranberries. Allowing the individual,
however
,
something to sustain nature, that he may be the better
enabled to perform his duties, it is supposed that a beau, in
good visiting condition, should pay his court in not more than
19*
three hundred, nor less than fifty drawing-rooms. But, then,
to do this, a man must have method; he must draw up his
plan of action before-hand; he must portion out his districts,
as they lie on each side of that longest of streets, Broadway;
he must not only study the map of the city closely, but he
must possess an accurate knowledge of the localities; he
must remember that some houses have stoops of twelve steps,
that some drawing-rooms are not on the first floor. He must
not
allow himself to be enticed into any flirtation whatever,
beyond a glance or a smile; he must
not
indulge the hope
of calling twice upon the sweet creature he most admires;
he must
not
be tempted to sink, even for a moment, upon
the most comfortable of ottomans or divans; he must
not
return home to re-adjust his locks, to change either boots,
gloves, or handkerchief. We have heard it asserted, that
owing to some unfortunate weakness of this kind, many a
promising youth, unaccustomed, probably, to the hardships
of such visiting, has been distanced in the gallant race of the
day, by more methodical menby men who were actually
encumbered with over-shoes and great-coats!
It is amusing to watch the hurried steps of some
experienced
visiter without doors; the decision of his movements,
the correctness of his calculation in passing out of one house
into another; and one is sure to know a raw recruit, by his
anxious, perplexed manner and expression.
The scene within doors is quite as amusing as it is without.
Everything wears a holiday look; it is evidently no common
morning reception; the ladies' dresses look gayer and fresher,
their smiles brighter than usual; the house, the furniture,
and the inmates, all wear their most agreeable aspect. The
salver of refreshments speaks at once the occasion; for there,
in the midst of richer cakes, stands the basket of homely
New-Years' cookies, bequeathed to their descendants by
the worthy vrows of New-Amsterdam. The visiters appear,
first singly, then in parties. Here comes a favourite partner
of the young ladies, there a mere bowing acquaintance of the
master of the house. This is an old family friend, that a
neighbour who has never been in the house before; here is
a near relative, there a passing stranger. The grey-haired
old gentleman who has the arm-chair wheeled out for him,
announces his fiftieth visiting anniversary; the buckish youth,
his grandson, has already made his bow, and off again; so
finish his gallant duties. Now we have a five minutes' visit
from a declared lover; and who follows him? One who
advances slowly and steadily, with a half-inquiring look;
the lady of the house sees him, gives a glance of surprise,
is gratified, accepts the offered hand immediately. That is
a reconciliation; old friendship broken off, now renewed, a
misunderstanding forgottenthat is one of the pleasantest
visits of the day. All come, bow, look, and speak their
friendly good-wishes, and are off again to make room for
others.
Long may this pleasant, cheerful, good-natured, lively
custom be perpetuated among us! As long as the side-walks
of Manhattan and the canals of Amsterdam last, so long may
Santa-Claus bring his Christmas gifts to the little folk; and
so long may the gallant Knickerbockers pay to their female
friends the homage of a
personal
visit at New-Year's. Cards
on every other day in the year, if necessary; but, on
New-Year's
,
carry your good wishes in person. Should not,
indeed
,
a custom so pleasant spread throughout the whole
country, like crackers, waffles, Dutch blood, and many other
good things brought originally from Holland?
On the particular New-Year's day at which we have
arrived in our narrative, an individual of the reader's
acquaintance
,
instead of joining the busy throng of visiters,
was seen turning his steps through a bye-street, towards the
Battery. He walked slowly through Greenwich-Street,
apparently busy with thoughts of his own, and entering the
Battery-Gate he continued for some time pacing the paved
walk near the water.
Ther is a fellow who seems to have nothing to do
today
,
said a young man to his companion, as they were
hurrying across the Battery from one end of State-Street to
the other. I should like to hire him as proxy, to show
himself in a score or two of houses in my place. I should
hand him over half my list at once, if I thought the ladies
would submit to the exchange; he looks like a presentable
chap, too.
Why, it is actually Harry Hazlehurst! What can he
be doing, moping about in that fashion?
Hazlehurst, is it? Oh, ho!you have heard the
hubbub
they have had at the Graham's, I suppose?
Not IWhat is it?
There was quite a scene there, yesterday; my sister had
the news from Adeline Taylor, a great friend of her's; so it
comes very straight.
I thought all was going on there as smoothly as possible.
I expected an invitation to the wedding before long.
To be sure; so did everybody. But it seems the beauty
has ideas of her own. In the first place she refused
Hazlehurst
,
rather to the astonishment of himself and all his
friends, I believe.
Refused Hazlehurst!You don't say so!
And that is only half the story. She took the same
opportunity, while weeping and trembling, to confide to her
mamma that her heart had been for some time, how long I
cannot tell you precisely, the property of Tall. Taylor.
What, Tallman Taylor? That is news, indeedI never
should have dreamt of such a thing.
Miss Adeline Taylor is the authority. It seems the
affair has been going on, no one knows how long, and Miss
Taylor has had the management of it. These girls are sly
minxes; they are not to be trusted, half of them.
And what says Taylor to all this?
What does he say? Why he is in a sort of ecstasy of
despair, I suppose; for the Grahams won't hear of the match.
It was no news to him; they have been engaged, I tell you,
for months.
At that moment the two young men entered the door of
a house in State-Street. Although their story was, upon
the whole, correct; yet, we happen to be still better informed
on the subject, and shall proceed to account, in our own way,
for Hazlehurst's solitary walk.
When Miss Adeline and her party had returned from
sleighing, Harry went to Mrs. Graham's, and finding Jane
alone, he immediately seized the moment to explain himself,
beginning by a lover-like remonstrance upon her having
joined the Taylors, instead of going with him as she had
already promised to do. Jane was excessively embarrassed.
As Harry proceeded, she became more and more agitated.
Her manner was so confused, that it was some time before
Hazlehurst could understand that she wished to refuse him.
Had she not actually wept, and looked frightened and
distressed
,
he might have given a very different interpretation
to her embarrassment. At length, in answer to a decided
question of his, she confessed her attachment to another
person; and, never was lover more surprised by such an
acknowledgement. Pained, and mortified, and astonished
as Harry was, the name of Hubert de Vaux! passed his
lips before he was aware he had spoken.
Oh, no; no; said Jane. I never cared at all for Mr.
de Vaux.
Harry's astonishment increased. He could scarcely
believe
that he had heard her correctly. To whom could she
possibly be attached?
Oh, I wish I had some one here to advise me! Adeline
may say what she pleases, I cannot conceal it any longer.
Harry listened in amazement.
Is it possible, he said, at length, that there is some
difficulty
,
some embarrassment, that prevents your acting as you
would wish? My dear Jane, confide in me. You cannot
doubt that I love you, that I have long loved you; and
Harry then ran over a variation of his first declaration. But
Jane's trouble seemed only to increase.
Oh, stop, Harry; don't talk in that way, she said; I
ought to have told you before. I wished to tell you when
you first came on to New York, but Adeline said we should
risk everything by it.
What can you possibly risk? What is it you wish to
tell me?
I was very sorry when you broke with ElinorI never
can have any other feeling for you than I have always had:
I have been for some time, almostengagedtoto
Mr. Taylor
Youengaged to Mr. Taylor!
Nonot engagedonly I have not refused him
We know father and mother dislike Mr. Taylor's family so
much
It was but natural that Harry should feel indignant at
having been deceived by the under-current of plotting that
had been going on; that he should feel mortified, ashamed
of himself, and disappointed, at the same time; vexed with
Jane, and almost furious against the meddling, officious
Adeline, and her presuming brother. From a long
acquaintance
with Jane's character, it flashed upon his mind in a
moment, that she must have been misguided, and gradually
led on by others. But the mischief was done; it was
evident
that at present, at least, she cared no more for him than
she had always done; while, on the contrary, young Taylor
had insinuated himself into her affections. He could not
endure to think, that while Jane was indifferent to himself,
his successful rival should be one whom he so much disliked.
Yet, such was the fact. It was infatuation on the part of
Jane, no doubt; and yet how often these deceptions have
all the bad effects of realities! He had been silent for some
minutes, while the tears were streaming freely from Jane's
beautiful eyes.
Oh, if I had not been so afraid that father would never
give his consent, I should not have waited so long. If I only
knew what to do now?
Harry came to a magnanimous resolution. I forgive
you, Jane, he said, the pain you have caused, since I
cannot but think that it is not the fruit of your own
suggestions
.
You could not deliberately have trifled with me in
this way; I owe it, no doubt, to the goodness of Miss Taylor,
he added, bitterly. Jane made no answer, but continued to
weep. Harry felt some compassion for her, in spite of her
unjustifiable conduct towards himself. In the course of half
an hour, she had fallen very much in his estimation; but he
determined to return good for evil, by urging her to take the
only step now in her powerthe only one proper under the
circumstances. He begged her, as she valued her future
peace, to reveal everything to her mother; and to be guided
in future by Mrs. Graham. But Jane seemed terrified at
the idea.
Oh, said she, father will be so angry! And we
expect
him every day. Mother, too, I know, will think I have
behaved very badly to you.
It is probable she might not have had the courage to follow
his advice, had not Mrs. Graham accidentally entered the
room at the moment. Her attention was immediately
attracted
to the unusual expression of Harry's face, and the
tearful, woe-begone look of her daughter, which she could in
no way account for. Harry, merely answering her inquiries
by a bow, arose and left the room, leaving the mother and
daughter together.
Poor Mrs. Graham was little aware of what awaited her.
She could not be called a woman of very high principles,
but she had more feeling, and, of course, more experience
than Jane. When she discovered the true state of things,
she was very much shocked. She had never had the least
idea of what had been going on around her; far from it,
indeed, she had never for a moment doubted that, before
long, her daughter would become the wife of young
Hazlehurst
.
Little by little she gathered the whole truth from the
weeping
Jane. It appeared that the two or three meetings which
had taken place between Jane and young Taylor, just before
he sailed, had been sufficient for him to fancy himself in love
with her. He made a confidante of his sister Adeline,
who, as one of the older class in her boarding-school,
considered
all love-affairs as belonging to her prerogative. Her
friend, Miss Hunter, was a regular graduate of the Court of
Love, according to the code  not of Toulouse  but of a
certain class of school-girls in New-York. This young lady
had gone through the proper training from her cradle, having
been teased and plagued about beaux and lovers, before she
could walk alone. She had had several love-affairs of her
own before she was fifteen. All for love, was her motto;
and it was a love which included general flirtation as the
spice of unmarried life, and matrimony with any individual
whatever, possessing a three-story house in Broadway, as
the one great object of existence. Adeline had, of course,
profited by such companionship; and, at the time her
brother
confessed himself in love with Miss Graham, after having
met once on board a steamboat, and once at an evening party,
she was fully equal to take the management of the whole
affair into her own hands. It is true, young Taylor had
entered into a boyish engagement at college; but that was
thought no obstacle whatever. She delighted in passing her
brother's compliments over to Jane; in reporting to him her
friend's blushes and smiles. With this state of things, young
Taylor sailed for Europe; but Adeline gloried too much in
her capacity of confidante, to allow the matter to drop: not
a letter was written but contained some allusion to the
important
subject. In the course of the year she had talked
Jane into quite a favourable state of feeling towards her
brother; he would probably himself have forgotten the affair,
had not Miss Graham arrived in Paris at the moment she did.
They saw each other, of course, and the feelings which
Adeline had been encouraging during the last year, and
which otherwise would have amounted to nothing at all,
now took a serious turn. Young Taylor was very
handsome
,
and astonishingly improved in appearance and
manners
.
Jane, herself, was in the height of her beauty, and
the young man had soon fallen really in love with her.
Unfortunately, just at the moment that he became attentive
to her, Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst, who was confined to the
house that winter, had confided Jane to the care of Mrs.
Howard, the lady who had brought her from America.
Young Taylor soon found out that he was rather disliked by
Mr. and Mrs. Hazlehurst, and preferred securing Jane's
favour, if possible, without attracting the attention of her
friends. Adeline, on her part, had discovered that her own
family were no favourites with Mr. and Mrs. Graham; of
course she recommended the proper degree of mystery, under
the name of prudence. Young Taylor left Paris for
England
,
about the time that Harry returned from his eastern
journey; but before parting from Jane, he explained himself;
and if he had not been accepted, he had certainly not been
refused. Thus matters stood when the whole party returned
home. Mr. Graham was known to be a violent, passionate
man, and as he had taken no pains to conceal his dislike to
Tallman Taylor's father, the young people had every reason
to believe that he would refuse his consent. The idea of a
clandestine marriage had once occurred to Adeline, but never
with any serious intention of proposing it. Had she done
so, she would not have been listened to. Jane had not lived
so much with Miss Wyllys and Elinor, without deriving
some good from such association; besides, she did not think
the step necessary. She believed that Mr. Graham would
give his consent after a while; and young Taylor was
obliged to submit for the present. As for his college
engagement
,
he had paid it no more attention than if it had
Vol. I.  20
never taken place; it had been long since forgotten, on his
part.
Little by little, Mrs. Graham gathered most of these facts
from her daughter, whose weeping eyes and pale face
would have delighted Adeline, as being just what was proper
in a heroine of romance, on such an important occasion.
But Adeline could not enjoy the sight of all the misery
which was the fruit of her two years' labours, for Mrs.
Graham
insisted that Jane should see none of the family until
her father had arrived, and knew the state of things.
Harry Hazlehurst, although not quite as well informed as
the reader, knew essentially how matters stood. He knew
at least, that Jane and young Taylor were all but pledged to
each other; he knew what had been Adeline's conduct
what had been his own treatment; and as he walked slowly
from one end of the Battery to the other, his reflections were
anything but flattering to himself, or to any of the parties
concerned. He blamed Mrs. Graham for her want of
maternal
caution and foresight; he blamed his brother, and
sister-in-law, for their blindness in Paris; Jane, for her
weakness
,
and want of sincerity to himself; Adeline, for such
unjustifiable management and manuvring; and young
Taylor, for what he called his presumption and puppyism.
And to think that he, Harry Hazlehurst, who prided himself
upon being clear-sighted, had been so completely deceived
by others, and what was worse, by himself! He was obliged
to remember how sure he had felt himself of Jane; it was
humiliating to think what a silly part he had been playing.
Then came a twinge or two, from the consciousness that he
had deserved it all, from his conduct to Elinor. He tried to
persuade himself that regret that Jane should fall into hands
he fancied so unworthy of herthat she should be
sacrificed
to a mere second-rate sort of dandy, like young Taylor,
was his strongest feeling at the time. But he was mistaken:
there was a good deal of the lover in his recollection of Jane's
transcendant beauty. He hoped that she would yet be saved
from the worstfrom becoming the wife of Tallman Taylor.
He felt convinced that Mr. Graham would refuse his consent
to the marriage.
The next day, Harry returned to Philadelphia. The
astonishment
of all those interested in himself and Jane, at this
rupture, was very great. If Mrs. Stanley had been grieved
at Harry's difficulties, Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst was made
quite unhappy by her sister's conduct. She reproached
herself severely for her blindness; for not having taken as
much care of Jane as she ought to have done under the
circumstances
.
Like all her family, she disliked young Taylor;
who, in fact, had nothing to recommend him but his
handsome
face, and his father's money. Miss Wyllys, too, was
much pained by the conduct of one who had been so often
under her careone, in whose welfare she was so warmly
interested. She received the news in a note from Mrs.
Hazlehurst, who preferred giving it in that form; and as Miss
Wyllys was alone with Elinor, she immediately handed the
billet to her niece.
It must be confessed that Elinor's heart gave one bound
at this unexpected news. She was more moved by it than
any one; more astonished that Jane should have refused
Harry; that she should have preferred to him that silly
Tallman Taylor; more shocked at the double-dealing that
had been going on; and more pained that Jane, who had
been to her as a sister, should have been so easily misled.
Another thought intruded, tooHarry would be free again!
But the idea had hardly suggested itself, before she repelled
it. She soon felt convinced that Mr. Graham would break
off the engagement between his daughter and Mr. Taylor,
and that after a while her cousin's eyes would be opened to
Harry's merits, which were numberless in her eyes. Miss
Agnes strongly encouraged this opinion; and Elinor fully
determined that her aunt's counsels, her mother's letter, and
her own experience, should not be thrown away; she would
watch more carefully than ever against every fancy that
would be likely to endanger anew the tranquillity she had
in some measure regained.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The bridegroom's doors are opened wide,
And I am next of kin;
The guests are met, the feast is set,
May'st hear the merry din.
Coleridge
.
The
events of the next two months surprised Jane's friends
in Philadelphia, almost as much as her rejection of Harry
had done. Mrs. Hazlehurst, of course, knew what was
going on in her father's house, and from time to time informed
Miss Wyllys and Elinor of what passed. Elinor had written
to Jane, but it was a long time before she received an answer;
her cousin appeared engrossed by her own affairs; as this
was common with Jane at all times, it was but natural that
she should be so, at a moment which was of so much
importance
to herself. Mr. Graham arrived at the time
appointed
;
and, of course, he was very much displeased by
the news which awaited him. He would not hear of Jane's
marrying young Taylor, whose advances he received as
coldly as possible, and even forbade his daughter's seeing
any of the Taylor family. Jane was very much distressed,
and very much frightened. As for Miss Taylor, her
indignation
was so great, that she determined to pay no respect to
Mr. Graham's hostility; she wrote to Jane a long letter,
much in her usual style, giving very pathetic accounts of
Tallman's despair. This letter Jane had not the moral
courage
to show to either of her parents; she soon received
another, with a note from young Taylor himself. As she
was reading them one morning, her father unexpectedly
entered the room, and was thrown into a great passion by
the discovery. His temper was violent, and he was subject
to fits of passion which terrified his children; although, in
other respects, by no means an unkind parent. Upon this
occasion, Jane was frightened into hysterics, and afterwards,
owing to the agitation which had been preying on her mind
for some months, she was thrown into a low nervous fever.
During the four or five weeks that she was ill, every morning
Miss Taylor called to inquire after her friend, although she
was not admitted. By this conduct, Mrs. Graham's heart,
which was of no stern material, was much softened. At
length she went to the drawing-room to see Miss Taylor, for
a moment. Adeline improved the time so well, that she
placed herself and her brother better with Mrs. Graham
than they had ever yet been. Jane's illness increased; her
parents became seriously alarmed, and Mr. Graham
expressed
something like regret that he had been so hasty.
His wife often remembered his words during her daughter's
tedious convalescence, which was interrupted by a relapse.
In short, matters began to look less discouraging for young
Taylor's suit. There could be no doubt, at least, that he
was very much in love with Jane: Hazlehurst was quite
mistaken in supposing that the perfection of her profile, the
beautiful shape of her head, the delicacy of her complexion,
or other numberless beauties, could only be appreciated by
one whose taste was as refined as his own: they had
produced
quite as deep an effect on young Taylor. During
Jane's illness, he had shown the proper degree of distress
and anxiety, all of which was reported in the most pathetic
manner to Mrs. Graham, and whispered to Jane by Adeline,
who, having once been received again into the house, kept
her footing there and managed an occasional interview with
20*
her friend. In short, as we all know, tyrannical parents are
very rare in America; the fault in family discipline lies in
the opposite direction.
His daughter's pale face, his wife's weakness, and
Adeline's
good management, and improvement of every
concession
,
at length worked a change in Mr. Graham. At the
proper moment, Tallman Taylor renewed his offer in the
warmest and most flattering terms; supported by his father, and
his father's hundreds of thousands, he this time received a
more favourable answer. Mr. Graham was one of those
men, who have no very high opinion of women; he did not
wish to make his daughter miserable for life; and he thought
she had too little character to conquer the fancy that had filled
her mind, and made her ill. Then, young Taylor was rich,
and she could throw away money on those knick-knacks
and frippery, to which, according to Mr. Graham, women
attach such exorbitant value. If she did not marry him, she
would fancy herself a victim, and miserable; if she did
marry him, she would fancy herself happy: that seemed to
him the amount of the matter, and with these views he at
length gave a reluctant consent. Mrs. Graham had already
given hers; Tallman Taylor was certainly not the son-in
law she would have chosen; but she was farther from being
dissatisfied, than many of her friends thought she would be
under the circumstances. Neither the story of his college
engagement, nor the unpleasant rumours respecting his Paris
career, had reached Mr. or Mrs. Graham; the first was
known only to Adeline and Jane, the last to a few male
intimates
.
The news, very naturally, caused a good deal of
sensation among Jane's friends in Philadelphia; it was really
distressing to Mrs. Robert Hazlehurst, who looked upon her
sister as thrown away, and reproached herself more than
ever for having allowed Jane to go out so often in Paris with
their thoughtless friends, the Howards. She could not
endure
to think of young Taylor, as actually her brother-in-law,
the husband of her beautiful sister. She had not supposed
that the matter would be settled in this way; she had believed
her father's opposition too strong to be overcome.
As for Harry, he, of course, soon heard the news from
his brother. How much of love and of mortification were
still lingering in his mind, we cannot precisely affirm. His
feelings for Jane had certainly altered very much since the
discovery of the double-dealing that had been going on; but
weak as she had proved herself, she was still much too lovely,
much too well-bred, at least, to be bestowed upon one whom
he disliked as much as Tallman Taylor. There seemed to
be something of the dog in the manger, connected with his
regret for Jane's fate, since he had already decided that if she
were ever free again, he would not repeat his offer; she had
shown herself to have so little character, that he would not
allow himself to be again influenced by her beauty,
surpassing
as it was. In fact, Harry had determined to give up all
idea of love and matrimony, for the present, at least. He
went into society less than of old, and gave himself up very
much to his profession, or other literary pursuits in which he
had become engaged. He had been admitted to the bar, and
had entered into a partnership with his travelling companion,
Mr. Ellsworth; much of his time was now passed at his
brother's house, or at that of his friend. He liked his
sister-in-law
,
and he found Ellsworth's sister, Mrs. Creighton, who
was at the head of her brother's establishment, a very
agreeable
woman; she was very pretty, too, and very clever.
The Wyllyses were already in the country, when the news
of Jane's engagement reached them; the winter had broken
up early, and, as usual, at the first signs of spring they had
returned to Wyllys-Roof. Of course, they regretted Jane's
partiality for Tallman Taylor; to Elinor it appeared almost
as unaccountable as her insensibility to Harry's merits. Mrs.
George Wyllys was loud in her declamations against it;
next to the Hubbards, she looked upon the Taylors as the
most disagreeable family of her acquaintance. She had a
great deal to say about the dull, prosy mother, the
insufferable
father, the dandy son, and the rattling, bellish daughter.
Miss Patsey, also, had her moments of wonder; but she
wondered in silence; she did not appear to have any
higher opinion of the son, than she had formerly entertained
of the father. With these exceptions, the community of
Longbridge in general, who had known Jane from her
childhood
,
approved highly of the connexion; both parties were
young, handsome, and they would be rich, all which looked
very well at a distance.
Three months of courtship passed over; Jane recovered
entirely, and was as blooming and lovely as ever; young
Taylor was all devotion. The satisfaction of his family at
this connexion with the Grahams was very great; it gratified
Mr. Taylor's wishes in every way. It is true, Miss Graham
would not have much fortune herself, but Tallman had
enough to begin life handsomely. He hoped the marriage
would take place soon, as he wished his son, whom he had
made his partner, to take more interest in the business than
he had yet done. In every respect but money, Jane was
just what he would have wished for a daughter-in-law; she
was fashionable, she was beautiful, and the position of her
family gratified his vanity. As for the plain, good-hearted
Mrs. Taylor, she already loved Jane as a daughter; and to
her it appeared the most natural thing in the world, that
Tallman should marry his sister's friend. Adeline, herself,
was of course enchanted.
The wedding took place in June. Thanks to Miss
Taylor's
influence with the bride, it proved quite a brilliant affair.
The ceremony was performed in the evening, and
immediately
afterwards the newly-married couple received the
compliments and congratulations of their friends. Jane was
attended, on the occasion, by six of her young companions;
and as many young men, with white favours in their
button-holes
,
were very busy all the evening, playing masters of
ceremonies, escorting all the ladies as they arrived, from the
door to the spot where the bride was stationed. Jane looked
surpassingly beautiful; it was the general remark, that she
had never appeared more lovely: the ladies pronounced her
dress perfect, and the gentlemen admired her face quite as
much. All agreed that a handsomer couple had not been
seen for some time. It was, indeed, a pretty sight  the
beautiful bride, the centre of a circle of her young friends,
all, like herself, in white, and in full dress; pretty creatures
themselves, wearing pretty ornaments of flowers and lace,
pearls and embroidery. We say they were pretty; there
was one exception, however, for Elinor was there, and
many remarks were made on her appearance.
What a pity that Miss Wyllys should be so plain,
observed
Mrs. Creighton, whose husband had been a connexion
of the Grahams. It is the first time I have seen her for
several years, and really I had forgotten how very plain
she is.
Plain, why she is downright ugly! exclaimed the youth
to whom she was talking. It is a sin to be as ugly as that.
No wonder Hazlehurst was frightened out of the engagement;
I am only surprised he ever got into the scrape!
But Miss Wyllys is very clever and agreeable, I
understand
.
Is she?was the careless reply. I see Hazlehurst
is here this evening.
Yes, he came on with his sister-in-law, Mrs. Robert
Hazlehurst, and myself.
Well, he has a fine opportunity of comparing his two
lady-loves together. Upon my word, I never saw a greater
contrast. I wish Miss Wyllys had not accepted the
invitation
,
though; she is enough to frighten one away from the
whole setand the rest are very pretty girls, the whole of
them.
Can you point out Mr. Taylor?Not the groom; I have
seen him, of course; but his father.
Don't you know the boss? It is that tall, stiff-looking
man, talking to Mrs. Stanley. You see he is trying to look
very amiable.
Yesthat is he, is it? Much the sort of man I should
have supposed him. And now, which is Mrs. Taylor?
Mrs. Taylorlet me see; there she is, in grey satin and
diamonds. I never saw her but once before in my life. She
is a very quiet sort of a body, and keeps out of sight most
of the time.
Very different from her daughter then, for Miss Taylor
always put herself
en vidence
, I believe. If one don't see
her, they are sure to hear her.
To be sure, Miss Taylor is all life and spirits. She is
the most lively, animated girl I ever knew. By-the-bye, I
think it an odd fancy in Hazlehurst to show himself here
to-night; for there was a great fuss last winter, at the
blow-up
all
the town was talking about it.
He is a very near connexion, you know; I suppose his
absence would have been more remarked than his being here.
Besides, if he was in love once, he has had time to get over
it, in the last six months. He does not look much as if he
wore the willow still.
Hazlehurst is very clever, I am told; I don't know him
much, myself.
Oh, yesvery clever. But I am not a fair judge,
perhaps
;
he is my brother's friend, and I may be prejudiced in
his favour. How very warm it is! can't we find a seat near
a window?
The gentleman offered his arm with alacrity, and the
speakers moved away.
The seats they had left were taken by Mrs. de Vaux and
Colonel Stryker: the lady, a middle-aged woman,
fashionably
dressed; the gentleman, rather more than middle-aged
in his appearance, and decidedly less so in his dress and
manners.
Young Taylor is a handsome fellow, and looks the
bridegroom
very well! exclaimed Mr. Stryker. How these
Taylors have pushed upwards; I never heard of them before
I went to Europe this last time, five or six years ago.
That is just about the moment they first burst upon the
horizon. Mr. Taylor seems determined to make up for lost
time. He is very disagreeable to us ladies; but the
gentlemen
like him on account of his cleverness; they say he is
a genius in all business matters.
To judge by his expression, the man seems ambitious
of `
les succs de salon
,' also. Where did he import his
manners from, I wonder?they have a sort of bright, new
look, as if he had not yet worn the gloss off.
Don't laugh at him;he gives excellent dinners.
Does he? Can't you introduce me, immediately? `
Ici
l'ont fait noces et festins
.' I seem to smell the turtle-soup,
already.
I doubt whether you taste it, nevertheless, until next
autumn. Everybody is going out of town; they say that is
the only drawback to the satisfaction of the Taylors at this
wedding.
What is the drawback, pray?
They cannot have as many grand parties as they are
entitled to, on account of the season.
That must be distressing, indeed, to the brides-maids.
By-the-bye, I see Miss Wyllys is one of them. She is going
to turn out a fortune, I hear;do you know her?
From a child. Last year no one dreamed of her being
a fortune; but within the last few months, Mr. de Vaux tells
me, she has inherited a very handsome property from one
of her mother's family; and, in addition to it, some new
rail-road
,
or something of that kind, has raised the value of what
she owned before.
What is the amount, do you know?
Upwards of two hundred thousand, Mr. de Vaux thinks.
Miss Wyllys is certainly no beauty; but, do you know,
I think there is something decidedly distinguished in her
appearance
and manner? I was only introduced the other day;
I did not happen to know the Wyllyses.
I have known them all my life, and like them all very much.
I rather wonder, though, at Miss Elinor's being here as
bride's-maid
.
But it is a reconciliation, I suppose. Perhaps she
and young Hazlehurst will make up again, and we may be
invited to another wedding, before long.
Perhaps so. How long does it take a young lady to
resent an infidelity? A calendar month, I suppose; or, in
extreme cases, a year and a day. By-the-bye, the pretty
widow, Mrs. Creighton, has thrown off her weeds, I see.
Yes, she has come out again, armed for conquest, I
suppose
.
What a flirt she is! And as artful as she is pretty,
Mr. Stryker. But perhaps you are one of her admirers,
continued the lady, laughing.
Of course, it is impossible not to admire her; but I am
afraid of her, said Mr. Stryker, shrugging his shoulders.
I am horribly afraid of all pretty widows.
Mr. Hazlehurst does not seem afraid of her.
Not a bithe is there half his time; but then he is
young and venturesome. We old campaigners are more
wary.
He is an old friend of her brother's, I believe; is Mr.
Ellsworth here?
Yes, there he is, talking to Miss Wyllys. Perhaps he
may interfere with your prediction about her and my friend
Hazlehurst.
Possibly; but -propos of weddings; why don't you
marry, yourself, Mr. Stryker? You have been a delightful
beau now, for how many years? asked the lady,
mischievously
.
Oh, these five lustres, I suppose; for I began early.
replied Mr. Stryker, who had too much worldly wisdom, not
to make a merit of frankness, where he could not help it.
Six, you mean, said Mrs. de Vaux, laughing.
No, five, honestly counted. I don't know exactly how
old I may be; but the other day I heard a fellow say,
`Stryker can't be more than five-and-forty;' and I dare say
he was right.
Well, allowing you are only five-and-forty, don't you
mean to marry, one of these days?
Certainly.
Don't you think it time to look about you?
High time; but who will have me? continued Mr.
Stryker, with great complacency of manner.
Oh, half the young ladies in the room, I dare say;
excepting
,
of course, those who have refused you already,
said Mrs. de Vaux, mischievously; for it was suspected that
Mr. Stryker had met with several rebuffs. This lady and
gentleman, in spite of their smiling countenances and friendly
manners, owed each other a grudge, of old standing. Who
does not know that where the spirit of littleness and vanity
is all-powerful, these petty trials and triumphs are too often
the chief spring of action; as was the case with Mr. Stryker
and Mrs. de Vaux. Happy they, who have good principle
and good feeling enough, to cast off folly on so small a scale!
Tell me what is your taste, and I will look out for you,
continued Mrs. de Vaux.
How kind you are!you don't include Miss de Vaux,
of course; for she can't endure me. Like all modest men,
I require only nine hundred and ninety-nine perfections in
my wife. But then I insist chiefly on two essentials: she
must have money, and she must not have brothers and sisters;
I have an invincible antipathy to collaterals, whether of blood
or connexion.
Miss Wyllys is the very person for you. Quite a fortune
now, they say; and an orphan, without brother or sister; all
you require. Then, you like her appearance, you say;
though she is plain, she is clever, too, and amiable.
Of course; all young ladies are amiable, are they not?
I only know of one objectionshe is too good for you.
Goodness is not to be despised in a wife. I shall require
Vol. I.  21
it from the future. Mrs. Stryker; though not very particular
about the rest of the world. I am much obliged to you, Mrs.
de Vaux, for the suggestion; I'll think of it, said Mr.
Stryker, deliberately crossing one leg over the other, to make
himself comfortable.
You, who know everybody, Mr. Stryker, said the lady,
pray, tell me, who is that bright-faced young man, or
rather, boy, standing near Mr. Wyllys and Mrs. Stanley?
You wish to mortify meI never saw the lad before.
I can answer your question, Mrs. de Vaux, observed
Harry, who had just approached, and made his bow; that
is my friend, Charlie Hubbard, the artist. Don't you
remember
the fine view of Lake Ontario, that was so much
admired at the Exhibition, this spring?
Certainly. Is that the young man?He looks like a
genius.
Rather as a genius should look; your great lions are
often very tame-looking animals, observed Mr. Stryker.
Hubbard's face only does him justice, however; he is
full of talent, said Harry.
Some of his pictures are certainly very fine, observed
Mrs. de Vaux.
I never saw water like his, continued Hazlehurst; such
variety, and always true to nature. He almost persuades
one to believe all he says about water: he maintains that it
has more variety of expression than any other inanimate
object, and has, withal, an independent character of its own;
he says it is second only to the human countenance.
He seems quite an enthusiast, said Mrs. de Vaux.
Won't he take it all out in talk? asked Mr. Stryker,
drily.
Look at his view of Hell-Gate on a cloudy evening, and
say so if you can! exclaimed Harry, warmly.
Well, after all, he says no more for water, than has been
said by the poets of all nature, from the time of the first
pastoral; they tell us that the sun will make a bare old
mountain smile, and the wind will throw the finest forest
into a fuss.
I defy you to prove any fuss upon Charlie's works!
Perhaps notWhere is his study? I should like to see
what he has done. Is his pencil always amphibious?
Yes; I believe he has never yet painted a landscape,
without its portion of water. If you wish to see his study,
you must go soon; he sails for Italy next month.
If his partiality for water is really honest, it may help
him on in his profession. Has he a good execution?that is
all-important.
Decidedly good; and he improves every day.
Execution
is really all-important to Hubbard; for there can be no
doubt that he possesses all an artist's conception.
I suspect though, his notion about expressive water is
not original. It appears to me, some German or other calls
water, `the eyes of a landscape.'
Very possibly; but Charlie Hubbard is not the man to
steal other people's ideas, and pass them off for his own.
You make a point of always believing the worst of
everybody
,
Mr. Stryker, said Mrs. de Vaux.
I wish I could help it. said the gentleman, raising his
eyebrows.
Suppose, Mr. Hazlehurst, you take him to Mr. Hubbard's
studio, and force him to admire that fine picture of Lake
Ontario. I should like to see it again, myself; and Mr. de
Vaux has been talking of carrying us all to Mr. Hubbard's,
some time.
Harry professed himself quite at Mrs. de Vaux's service.
Mrs. Stanley, he said, was going to see his friend's pictures
the very next day. A party was soon arranged, the hour
fixed, and everything settled, before supper was announced.
As Mrs. de Vaux and Mr. Stryker moved towards the door,
they were followed by Mrs. Creighton and Harry.
Who was the young man you were talking with at
supper, Josephine? asked Mr. Ellsworth, as he stepped into
the carriage after Mrs. Creighton and Harry, in driving away
from the wedding.
Which do you mean?
A mere boy  one of the groomsmen, by the white
favours in his button-hole.
Oh, that was the groom's brother, Mr. Pompey Taylor,
the younger, a very simple, and rather an awkward young
gentleman. I had the honour of making the acquaintance
of all the family, in the course of the evening. I was quite
amused with Mr. Taylor, the father; he really seems to have
as great a relish for the vanities of life, as any young girl of
fifteen.
Because they are quite as new to him, said Hazlehurst.
That is difficult to believe of a clever, calculating man
of fifty, observed Mr. Ellsworth.
All clever men of fifty are not quite free from nonsense,
take my word for it, said the lady. I appeal to Mr.
Hazlehurst
,
who knows Mr. Taylor; as for myself, I am convinced
by the man's manner this evening.
You are certainly correct in your opinion, Mrs.
Creighton
.
Mr. Taylor is, no doubt, a clever man; and yet he
takes delight in every piece of finery about his house. He
is more possessed with the spirit of sheer ostentation, than
any man I ever met with.
Ah, you want to save the credit of your sex, by setting
him down as an exception!that is not fair, Mr. Hazlehurst.
It was a pity that the pretty smile which the lady bestowed
on her brother's friend was entirely thrown away: but the
lamp-light happened to be little more than darkness visible.
THE END OF VOL. I.Place Vendme
,
October
, 18.
My Dearest Elinor
:
You will be glad to hear that Jane passed the barriers,
this morning, with the Howards. She has just finished a
letter to Mrs. Graham; and, as she dislikes writing so much,
has given me leave to announce her arrival to all at
Wyllys-Roof
.
As Jane enters Paris on one side, I leave it in the
opposite direction, for, the day after to-morrow, I am off for
Constantinople; a movement which will, no doubt, astonish
you, though, I am sure, you will wish me joy of such
pleasant
prospects. This letter will probably be the last you
will hear of me, for some time; not but what I shall write as
usual, but these long overland mails, through countries
where they suspect revolution or plague, in every letter,
often fail to do their duty. In fact, I delayed my journey a
week or two, expressly to see Jane, and have a good supply
of Longbridge news before setting out. Everybody tells me,
I must expect to lose more than half my letters, both ways.
This is bad enough, to be sure; but a journey to Greece and
Constantinople, would be too full of delights, without some
serious drawback. I believe Jane is more tired by
answering
our questions, and hearing what we have to tell her, than
by her voyage. I cannot help wishing, my dear Elinor,
that it were you who had arrived in Paris, instead of our
pretty little cousin. How I should delight in showing you
my favourite view, the quais and the island, from the Pont
Royalthe Louvre, too, and the Madeleine. As for Jane,
she will, doubtless, find her chief pleasures at Delilles', and
the Tuileries  buying finery, and showing it off: it has
often puzzled me to find out which some ladies most enjoy.
We are to be a party of four of us, on our eastern
expedition
.
In the first place, Ellsworth, whom you may have
seen; a very clever fellow, and brother-in-law to poor
Creighton. By-the-bye, Mrs. Creighton is still here, and
has been living, very quietly, with her brother, since her
husband's death; she is now going to the Howards, who are
her connexions, I believe; so says Louisa, at least.
Ellsworth
,
you know, poor fellow, lost his wife about a year ago;
he has left his little girl with her mother's friends, and has
come abroad for a year or two. Having been in Europe
before, he was very glad to make one, in our party to the
East, where he has not yet been. I mention him first, for
he is the most agreeable of our set. There is not much to
be said on the chapter of young Brown; and, I must
confess
,
that I don't quite agree with Col. Stryker, in the very
good opinion he evidently entertains of himself. By-the-bye,
American Colonels are as plenty, now-a-days, as the `
Marquis'
used to be, at Versailles, in the time of the Grand
Louis. Some simple European folk, actually believe that
each of these gentry has his regiment  in the garrison
of `Nieu Yorck,' I suppose; it would puzzle them, I
think, to find the army, if they were to cross the Atlantic; I
don't remember to have seen one of Uncle Sam's soldiers for
five years before I left home.
Many thanks, dearest Elinor, for the contents of your
box; you cannot doubt but they will accompany your
preux
chevalier
on his pilgrimage. This Eastern movement has
been such a sudden one, that I have still a thousand things
to do, which will oblige me to make my letter shorter than
I wish. Ellsworth is waiting for me, at this moment. We
expect to be gone six, or, possibly, eight months. I shall
write again from Marseilles; and, I hope, the letter from
thence will reach you. Pull Bruno's ears for me, and don't
let him forget his master; which will be one way, my dear,
kind Elinor, of obliging you to remember that individual also.
Best respects to Mr. Wyllys and Aunt Agnes, with much
love for yourself, dearest Elinor, from
Your affectionate, present and
futur
,
H. H.
P. S.Many remembrances for Mrs. Stanley, if she is
with you; I wrote to her last month.My Dear Miss Wyllys
:
You have been so kind to me, ever since we moved into
your neighbourhood, that I hope you will excuse me for
asking your assistance, this morning. I have been a good
deal plagued in my kitchen ever since we came into the
country this spring. My cook and chamber-maid, who are
sisters, are always finding some excuse for wanting to go to
the city; and last night they got a letter, or pretended to get
one from New York, saying that their father was very sick;
and as I didn't know but it might be true, I couldn't refuse
them, and they have gone for a weekthough I won't be
sure it was not for a mere frolic. As it happened, Mr.
Taylor and Adeline came back from Saratoga, last night,
and brought a house-full of company with them; an old
friend of mine whom I had not seen for years, and some new
acquaintances of Adeline's. To make matters worse, my
nurse, a faithful, good girl, who has lived with me for years,
was taken sick this morning; and John, the waiter, had a
quarrel with the coachman, and went off in a huff. You
know such things always come together. So I have now
only the coachman and his daughter, a little girl of twelve,
in the house; happily they are both willing, and can do a
little of everything. If you know of anybody that I can
find to take the place of cook, or housemaid, I shall be truly
obliged to you for giving the coachman their names and
directions.
Adeline is to have a little party this evening; she met
10*
several of our Longbridge friends on board the boat yesterday,
and took that opportunity of asking them, as she is very
anxious to make the house pleasant to her company. I dare
say she has already invited all your family, and I shall be
very sorry if you are not able to come, for we always miss
you more than any others of our neighbours.
Hoping you will excuse the trouble I give you, I remain,
dear Madam,
Very respectfully and truly yours,
Hester Taylor
.I feel unworthy of you, Elinor, and I cannot endure
longer to deceive so generous a temper as yours. You must
have remarked my emotion this morningMiss Wyllys now
knows all; I refer you to her. I shall never cease to
reproach
myself for my unpardonable ingratitude. But painful
as it is to confess it, it would have been intolerable to play
the hypocrite any longer, by continuing to receive proofs of
kindness which I no longer deserve. It is my hope, that in
time you will forgive me; though I shall never forgive myself.
H. H.I do not blame youyour conduct was but natural; one
more experienced, or more prudent than myself, would
probably
have foreseen it. Had you left me in ignorance of the
truth until too late, I should then have been miserable indeed.
My aunt will take the first opportunity of letting our mutual
friends know the position in which it is best we should
continue
for the future. May you be happy with Jane.
Elinor Wyllys
.Wyllys-Roof
,
August
13
th
, 18.
My Own Beloved Child
,
You will not receive this letter until you have reached
the age of womanhood, years after your mother has been
laid in her grave.
To separate from you, my darling child, has cost your
mother a bitter pang. There is no severer trial of faith to
a Christian woman, than to leave her little ones behind her,
in a world exposed to evil and sorrow; and yet, although
so near death myself, it is my wish that you may live, dearest,
to taste all that is good in life. Few mothers are blessed in
death, as I am, with the power of leaving their orphans to
such kind and judicious guardians as your grandfather and
aunt; should they be spared, you will scarcely feel the loss
of your parents. Oh, how fervent is my prayer that they
Vol. I.  18
may live to guard, to cherish you! And when the task they
have so piously assumed is fully completed, may they long
enjoy the fruits of their cares!
It is with singular feelings that I write to you as a woman,
my child, and appeal to thoughts and sentiments, of which
you are at this moment so utterly unconscious; sitting, as
you now are, at my feet, amid your playthings, too busy with
a doll, to notice the tears that fall upon these last lines I shall
ever have it in my power to address to you. But the hope
that this letter may, one day, long after I have left you, be a
tie between us, my Elinor, is grateful to your mother's heart,
and urges me to continue my task. I have a double object
in writing these letters; I wish to be remembered by you,
dear, and I wish to serve you.
During the last few months, since my health has failed,
and since you, my child, have been the chief object of
interest to me in this world, I have often endeavoured to
pass over in my mind, the next dozen years, that I might
fancy my child, what I trust she will then be, qualified in
every essential point to act for herself, in the position to
which she belongs. I trust that when this, my last letter, is
placed in your hands, you will already have learned to feel
and acknowledge the important truths that I have
endeavoured
to impress on you, in those you have previously
received
.
You are already convinced, I trust, that without a
religious foundation, any superstructure whatever must be
comparatively worthless. I should be miserable, indeed, at
this moment, if I could not hope that sincere, single-hearted
piety will be the chief influence of your life; without it, you
could never know true happiness, or even peace. Rest
assured, my child, that while it sweetens every blessing, it
soothes under every evil. Many have given the same
testimony
when they stood, like your mother, within the shadow
of death. I have every reason, my beloved daughter, to
hope that under the guidance of an humble, sincere
Christian
,
like your aunt, you also will arrive at the same blessed
conviction; I know that so long as she lives, her example,
her prayers, her vigilance will never be wanting. I have
every reason to believe that you will be led to seek that
which is never earnestly sought in vain.
I must be brief, dear child, lest my strength should fail.
From the many thoughts that crowd upon me, I can only
select a few, which my own experience has taught me to
value as important. In the first place, let me warn you never
to forget the difference between Christian education, and all
others. Remember that Christian education has for its
foundation
the heart-felt conviction of the weakness of human
nature; for a being bearing the name of a Christian to lose
sight of this truth, is the grossest of all inconsistencies. The
great and the learned among those who are merely
philosophers
,
preach, as though to know what is good, and to
practise
it, were equally easy to mankind. But the Christian
alone knows that he must look beyond himself for guidance,
and for support. He knows only too well, that there are
times when the practice of some plain and evident duty,
costs his feeble nature a severe strugglein no instance will
he dare trust his own strength alone. He knows that even in
those cases where duty is also a pleasure, he must still be
watchful and humble, lest he fall. One would think this
truth so obvious, from daily observation, as to be undeniable;
but it is now the fashion to laud human nature, to paint
flattering pictures only. Humility is thought debasing; but
Truth alone is honourable, and Humility is Truth. You
will find the actions of those who acknowledge this truth,
more honourable to the human race, than the deeds of those
who deny it. The true dignity of human nature consists,
not in shutting our eyes to the evil, but in restraining it;
which, with our Maker's help, we may all do, for the
blessing
of our Creator is still within our reach, still vouchsafed
to the humble Christian. If such be your views, my daughter,
you will be prepared to find difficulties in acquiring and
practising those virtues which it is the duty of life to
cultivate
;
you will be prepared to meet those difficulties with
the sincere humility of a Christian, and with Christian
exertion.
My child, love the Truth, and the Truth only.
Cultivate daily a pious, thankful, humble disposition.
Love those near you heartily; live for them as well as
for yourself.
Eschew all envy, and petty jealousies, and revalries;
there is perhaps no other evil that so often poisons our daily
blessings.
Cultivate your judgment. Never forget the difference
between things of importance and trifles; yet remember that
trifles have also their value. Never lose sight of the
difference
between form and spirit; yet remember that in this
material world, the two should seldom be put asunder. The
true substance will naturally have its shadow also.
Cultivate a sweet, frank, cheerful temper, for your own
sake, and for the sake of those you love.
Cultivate your abilities in every way that comes
naturally
within your reach; it is seldom worth while for a
woman to do more than this. In all you learn, aim at giving
pleasure to others, aim at being useful to them, as well as
at improving your own faculties.
Enjoy thankfully all the blessings of life; and they are
innumerable.
There is one subject, of some importance to you
individually
,
my child, which I have not yet alluded to in either
of my letters; I have purposely deferred it until you will be
better fitted to understand me. You will have one personal evil
to contend against, my dear Elinor; your face will be plain,
your features will be homely, darling. It is a weakness, my
child, and yet I regret you should suffer from this
disadvantage
;
rest assured, that in every little mortification to
which you may be exposed, your mother, had she lived,
would have felt with you. I trust that this will be the first
time your attention will be seriously fixed upon the subject,
and that as a child you will scarcely have thought upon it.
Let us then, dear, look upon the matter together for a moment,
calmly and steadily; we will not blind ourselves to the
advantages
of beauty, neither will we exaggerate the evils of a
want of it. You will soon discover, from your own
observation
,
that beauty in women, as in children, is delightful in
itself; it throws a charm over the words and actions of the
favoured person. In a worldly sense it is also a woman's
power; where other qualifications are equal, you will often
observe that beauty alone confers a striking superiority. In
some respects its advantages are even greater than are usually
allowed, in others again they are far less. Were we to judge
by the space it fills in general observation, and in
conversation
,
we should believe it the one all-important qualification
in women, that nothing else can be compared with it. But
to adopt this opinion would be grossly to exaggerate its
importance
.
Nor can we believe, on the other hand, what some
prudent writers for the young have affirmed, that the
superiority
of beauty is only momentary; that the eyes tire of a
beautiful face which they see daily, that in all cases it vanishes
with early youth. No, my child, I do not wish you to
believe
this, for I cannot believe it myself. For years, the
beauty of my sister Elizabeth has been a daily source of
pleasure to me, and I doubt not to others also. My aunt,
Mrs. Graham, though past fifty, is still a handsome woman,
and her appearance must be pleasing to every one who meets
her; while, on the contrary, people still amuse themselves
at the expense of Miss Townley, whose face is strikingly
plain. Hundreds of examples might be cited to prove that
the charm of beauty does not generally vanish so soon, that
one does not tire of it so easily. And then if a woman lose
her beauty entirely, still the reputation of having once
possessed
it, gives her a sort of advantage in the eyes of the
world. If mere notoriety be an advantage, and in the
opinion of the worldly it is so, the superiority of beauty
over ugliness lasts longer than life; many women are
remembered
,
18*
who had nothing but beauty to recommend them to
the notice of posterity. But observe, my child, that if these
advantages are evident, they are chiefly of a worldly nature.
A beautiful woman may receive general admiration, and that
homage which gratifies vanity, but she must depend on other
qualities if she wish to be respected, if she wish to be loved
through life. I hope, my child, you will always be superior
to that miserable vanity which thirsts for common admiration,
which is flattered by every offering, however low, however
trivial. I trust that the mere applause of the world will
have no influence upon your heart or your understanding.
Remember what it is that we call the worldit is a ground
governed by a compromise between the weaknesses of the
good among us, and the virtues of the bad; the largest
portion
of vanity and folly  sometimes even vice  mingled
with the least portion of purity and wisdom that a
community
bearing a Christian name will tolerate. You, I trust,
will learn to seek a higher standard.
If borne in a right spirit, my dear Elinor, the very want
of beauty, or of any other earthly good, may be the means
of giving you the benefit of far higher blessings. If it make
you more free from vanity, from selfishness, it will make you
far happier, even in daily life. It may dispose you to enjoy
more thankfully those blessings actually in your possession,
and to make a better use of them.
Under this and every other disadvantage, my child,
remember
two things: to give the evil its just importance only,
and to make a right use of it.
I trust that your temper will be such, that you will not
for a moment feel any inclination to repine that others should
enjoy a blessing denied to you, my love. Refrain even
from wishing for that which Providence has withheld; if you
have a right faith, you will be cheerful and contented; if you
are really humble, you will be truly thankful.
Do all in your power, my Elinor, towards making your
home, wherever it may be, a happy one; it is our natural
shelter from the world. If in public you meet with
indifference
and neglect, you can surely preserve the respect of
those who know you; and the affection of your friends may
always be gained by those quiet, simple virtues, within the
reach of every one.
In one way, my dearest child, the want of beauty may
affect your whole career in lifeit will very probably be the
cause of your remaining single. If I thought you would be
united to a husband worthy of your respect and affection, I
should wish you to marry; for such has been my own lot in
lifeI have been happy as a wife and a mother. But I am
well aware that this wish may be a weakness; the blessings
of Providence are not reserved for this or that particular
sphere. The duties and sorrows of married life are often
the heaviest that our nature knows. Other cares and other
pleasures may be reserved for you, my child. In every
civilized Christian community there have always been
numbers
of single women; and where they have been properly
educated, as a class they have been respectablenever more
so than at the present day. They often discharge many of
the most amiable and praiseworthy duties of life.
Understand
me, my child; I do not wish to urge your remaining
single; that is a point which every woman must decide for
herself, when arrived at years of discretion; but I would
have you view a single life with sufficient favour to follow
it cheerfully, rather than to sacrifice yourself by becoming
the wife of a man whom you cannot sincerely respect.
Enter life prepared to follow, with unwavering faith in
Providence
,
and with thankfulness, whichever course may be
allotted to you. If you remain single, remember that your
peace is more in your own hands than if marriedmuch
more will depend solely on the views and dispositions you
encourage. As appearance has generally so much influence
over men, and marriage is therefore a less probable event to
you than to others, my love, let your mother caution you to
watch your feelings with double care; be slow to believe
any man attached to you, unless you have the strongest
proof of it.
Whatever be your position, never lose sight, even on
trifling occasions, of common sense, and good-feeling.
Remember
,
in any case, to guard carefully against the peculiar
temptations of your lot, to bear patiently its evils, and to
enjoy thankfully its peculiar blessings.
There are many things that I should still wish to say to
you, my beloved daughter; and yet I know that the cautions
I give may be unnecessary, while other evils, which I have
never feared, may befall you. My inability to guide you as
I wish, my darling child, directs us both to a higher source
of wisdom and love. Let us both, at all times, implicitly
place our trust where it can never fail, though blessings be
not bestowed in the way we fond creatures would choose.
[Here followed a sentence, in words too solemn to be
transferred to pages as light as these.]
Love your aunt, your second mother, truly and gratefully.
She has already bestowed on you many proofs of kindness,
and she has always been a faithful friend to your father, and
to your mother. Love the memory of your parents, my
child; think of us sometimesthink of your fatherthink
of your mother. Honour their memory by a recollection of
their instructions, by a well-spent life. Since your birth, my
child, I have scarcely had a hope or a fear, unconnected with
you; if I were to ask to live, it would be only for your
sake, my darling daughter.
Your mother's tenderest blessing rests upon you, my
beloved Elinor, through life!
Mary Radcliffe Wyllys
.